Privacy Policy
radio.net App
1. Preamble
With this Privacy Policy, we would like to inform you about the nature, scope and purpose of the collection and processing of your personal data when using the mobile radio.de app (hereinafter also referred to as “App”) offered by radio.de GmbH, Mühlenkamp 59, 22303 Hamburg (hereinafter also referred to as “radio.de”, “we”, “us”). The protection of your personal data is an important matter to radio.de when collecting and processing such data when using our App.
Please note that this is a translation of the German Privacy Policy, which is available in the App after you have changed the language settings to German. In case of contradiction between the different versions, the German version will prevail.
2. Controller for data collection and data protection officer
The controller responsible for the collection and processing of your personal data in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU)
2016
⁄
679
) (hereinafter also referred to as “GDPR”) is:
radio.de GmbH
Mühlenkamp 59
22303 Hamburg
Deutschland
Phone: + 49 40 - 570 065 150
Email: datenschutz@radio.de
If you have any questions concerning data protection, you can reach the data protection officer via email datenschutz@madsack.de or by post to:
MADSACK Mediengruppe
Datenschutz
August-Madsack-Straße 1
30559 Hannover
Germany
3. Personal data and processing by radio.de
3.1 When downloading the App
When downloading the App from the Apple App Store, a service of Apple Inc, One Apple Park Way, Cupertino, California, USA, 95014 (“Apple”), the Google Play Store, a service of Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland, (“Google”), the Amazon App Store, a service of Amazon Europe Core S.à.r.l., 38, avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855 Luxembourg (“Amazon”), the Samsung Galaxy Store, a service of Samsung Electronics (UK) Limited, Samsung House, 1000 Hillswood Drive, Chertsey, Surrey KT16 0PS (“Samsung”), the Huawei AppGallery, a service of Huawei Technologies Co, Ltd, Huawei Base, Bantian, Longgang District, Shenzhen, China (“Huawei”), your personal data required for the respective download and usually contained in your respective Apple Account, Google Account, Amazon Account, Samsung Account, Huawei Account will be transferred to the Apple App Store, Google Play Store, Amazon App Store, Samsung Galaxy Store, Huawei AppGallery. radio.de has no influence on the scope of this data processing.
For more information on the scope of data collection by the respective providers, please refer to their respective data privacy policy.
3.2 When opening the app
In order to enable you to use the App optimally, radio.de collects, processes and stores data regarding your use of the App, so-called “server log files” (hereinafter also “log files”). Every access to our App is therefore logged. The log files created from this contain the following data: IP address, date and time of access, operating system version, app version. The collection and processing of the information stored in the log files only serves the anonymised evaluation for statistical purposes, i.e. to analyse your use of our App and thus to continuously improve our services. Our legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR follows from the aforementioned purposes. The data collected in this way cannot be assigned to you as a specific person. This data will not be merged with other data sources.
3.3 When using the App
In our App, we refer to third-party radio streams. In order to enable you to receive the programmes of the various stations, the respective service providers will process the following information as soon as you play the respective station: IP address, date and time, operating system of your end device. Please refer to the privacy policy of the respective service providers for more information. We have no influence on the storage and further use of your data by the service providers.
In order to be able to offer you functions and services of our App that are tailored to your location (e.g. the display of stations in your surroundings), the collection of location data is necessary for this specific use of the App. This so-called “geolocalisation”, i.e. the assignment of an app opening to the location of the app opening, is carried out on the basis of the IP address of your end device and possibly also by determining your location data via GPS. Our App therefore uses your IP address to determine your rough location in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (b) GDPR for the purpose of providing the service. At no time can conclusions be drawn about your specific location. In order to improve the display of local stations for you, our App can also access the GPS location data of your mobile device in accordance with Article 6 para. s. 1 (a) GDPR on the basis of your consent, provided that you enable the collection of location data on your device by granting the corresponding authorisation. This is initially done through a pop-up window that is displayed on the screen of your mobile device when you use the App. You can also grant or withdraw the authorisation to collect location data at any time in the device settings of your mobile device. radio.de hereby points out, however, that it cannot be guaranteed that some functions of the app cannot be used or cannot be used completely. Even when GPS data is collected, no conclusions can be drawn about your specific location at any time, as the location data determined by GPS is technically shortened by radio.de. If the location survey via GPS is active, your mobile end device will usually show you this within the scope of the screen display by using a specific symbol. This data is not merged with other data sources. If location data is also transmitted to third parties via iOS, Android, Amazon, Samsung or Huawei, radio.de has no influence on this.
3.4 Help center and contacting radio.de
If you need help with the use of our App and the contents available on it, you can use our help center by clicking on the link “FAQ” in the app settings, where the most frequently asked questions and suitable help are listed. The FAQs are stored on the servers of the operator Zendesk Inc. (for more information on Zendesk, see section 5.3.).
In addition, you can directly request help from us via email in the settings of the App under the link “Feedback”. For this purpose, we also use the services of Zendesk Inc. to improve processing your requests. You can also contact us by email, letter or telephone. In doing so, we collect, process and store your contact data and the content of your enquiry in order to be able to answer your enquiry, in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR on the basis of your consent or in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (b) GDPR, if the subject of your enquiry is (pre-)contractual information or in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR, if there is a legitimate interest of radio.de in the data processing.
3.5 Duration of storage and deletion of personal data
We process and store personal data only for the period required to achieve the processing purpose or for as long and to the extent required by law, but at least for the duration of the statutory limitation periods.
If the storage purpose no longer applies or if a legally prescribed storage period expires, the personal data will be blocked or deleted routinely after 30 days and in accordance with legal regulations.
4. Cookies and similar technologies, iab standard, Consent Management Platform
radio.de uses cookies, PPID and similar technologies to collect various device information (also known as “identifiers” or “IDs”), in particular device identifiers, IDFA and advertising IDs. The following section is intended to briefly explain the technologies and terms used in the privacy policy.
Some functions and elements of the app and the content it offers require that the mobile device you are using can be identified even after the app has been reopened. The technologies used for this purpose also enable your personal settings or advertisements to be retained over a longer period of time. The data processing that takes place in this context therefore serves the purpose of being able to provide you with all functions and to simplify the use of our app for you as a user.
Some of the technologies used by radio.de or its service providers enable us to analyze the usage behavior of users. This tells us how the app is used and enables us to optimize our app and the quality of the content it offers and adapt it to the respective user behavior. In particular, we record how often users access the app and its various functions or the frequency of advertisements accessed. The data is not stored together with other personal user data. In the Apple App Store and Google Play Store, we can also see how often the app has been downloaded and how many users actively use the app.
The legal basis on which your personal data is processed using cookies depends on whether we ask for your consent. If this is the case and you consent to the use of cookies, the legal basis for the processing of your data is the declared consent in accordance with Section 25 (1) TDDDG in conjunction with Art. 6 (1) (a) GDPR and further data processing in accordance with Art. 6 (1) GDPR. Otherwise, the data processed using cookies will be processed on the basis of Section 25 (2) TDDDG (e.g. technically necessary cookies for the error-free display of our websites) or if the use of cookies is necessary to fulfill our contractual obligations.
Processing of cookie data on the basis of consent: Before your data is processed in the context of the use of cookies, we ask for your consent, which can be revoked at any time. Before consent has not been given, cookies that are necessary for the operation of our online offer will be used. They are used on the basis of Section 25 (2) TDDDG and the user’s interest in the expected functionality of our online offering.
The data processing processes described above are carried out - unless otherwise described in this privacy policy - on the basis of your express consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.
The following technologies and device information are particularly relevant in the context of the app
Cookies
are small pieces of text information that are stored on your mobile device.
PPID
enables publishers to send an identifier to Google Ad Manager that is used for frequency capping, audience segmentation and targeting, sequential ad rotation and other audience-based ad delivery features on any device.
Opt-out: As a user, you can prevent Google from collecting the PPID by clicking
here
.
Tracking pixels
are small “invisible” graphics that are often used for statistical evaluations for online marketing
SDKs
(software development kits) are software libraries and interfaces that enable the integration of various services and functions.
Device identifiers enable the unique identification of app users’ end devices.
IDFA
(Identifier for Advertisers), or Ad-ID (iOS operating system) or Advertising ID (Android operating system), enable advertising partners to create user profiles and display personalized advertising to users.
Click URLs
with tracking parameters can be used to register when a link or other element is clicked on.
As part of the various Google Firebase services, further device information, such as instance IDs, UUIDs (Universally Unique Identifier), IDFV (Identifier for Vendors, iOS) or the Android ID (Android), are relevant, the functions of which are described in more detail in section 5.2.1.
By changing the settings in your mobile device, you can deactivate or restrict the transmission of the IDFA and advertising ID and IDFV (iOS) or the Android ID (Android). radio.de cannot, however, rule out the possibility that some content of the app may not be usable or not fully usable in this case.
For more information on which technologies we or our third-party service providers use for which purpose and on the data processed in each case, please refer to section 5.
In order to provide you with the highest level of transparency and control over the processing of your data, we follow the iab europe Transparency and Consent Framework (hereinafter “iab Standard”), including its specifications and guidelines. The iab Standard provides participating advertising partners with a common language to communicate users’ choices about the delivery of relevant online advertising and content. The majority of our advertising partners are vendors certified according to the iab Standard (an overview of participating advertising partners can be found
here
).). You can find out more about the Transparency and Consent Framework on the iab europe website: iabeurope.eu/
We have integrated a Consent Management Platform (hereinafter “CMP”) in our app, which is based on the specifications of the iab standard and is offered by Sourcepoint Technologies, Inc. (For more information on Sourcepoint Technologies, Inc., please refer to section 5.2.). The CMP provides you with information on the cookies and similar technologies used and allows you to set the use of these in relation to certain service providers. You can also give and withdraw your consent to the use of the technologies and device information described here. When you open our app for the first time and make settings via the CMP, your configuration is stored in the NSUserDefaults (iOS) or in the Shared Preferences (Android) of the app on your device, where the settings you have made are saved.
You can access and change your selection at any time under “Privacy Manager” in the app settings.
The CMP is used in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c GDPR in order to obtain and document your consent to certain data processing processes and in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR due to our legitimate interest in being able to offer you a convenient way to control the processing of your personal data.
With the CMP, we offer you the opportunity to decide for yourself in which cases you want to consent to tracking via cookies and other technologies - to display content and advertising relevant to you - or to use a paid PRIME subscription. If you opt for the PRIME subscription, only those cookies will be set that are necessary to provide essential functions of our apps or are functionally necessary for the stability and security of the apps. The storage of information in the end user’s terminal equipment or access to information already stored in the end user’s terminal equipment takes place, if this is absolutely necessary, on the basis of Section 25 (2) No. 2 TTDSG, so that we can provide the telemedia service expressly requested by the user. The legal basis for the further processing of this technically necessary personal data as part of the PRIME offer is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b or lit. f GDPR, depending on the type of service.
If you decide to USE our offer without any obligation to pay, we finance our offer through advertising. For this purpose, the advertisers set cookies that enable tracking for the display and optimization of advertising based on your usage behavior and your presumed interests and needs. In order to provide this service, we use cookies, device identifiers and similar technologies on your end devices.
The storage of information in the end user’s end device or access to information is carried out in accordance with § 25 para. 1 TTDSG in conjunction with Art. 6 para. 1 lit a. GDPR. The legal basis for further processing is your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. a GDPR. The legal basis for the transfer of data to the USA is Art. 49 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.
Note on consent: Some of the services listed in the CMP transfer data to the USA. Data processing and data protection in the USA do not meet the standard of the GDPR. The services are subject to US law and may therefore be obliged to disclose data to US authorities or intelligence agencies if legal requirements are met. Risks for you arise in particular from the difficulty of enforcing the law, the lack of control over the further processing or disclosure of data and the aforementioned access by government agencies.
5. Processing of personal data by service provider
Personal data collected in the context of your use of our App will only be processed by radio.de and third parties listed in this privacy policy. Beyond that, radio.de does not transmit personal data to other third parties. Personal data will only be transmitted on to other third parties in the exceptional case that radio.de is obliged to transmit the collected data due to an official or court order.
5.1 Amazon Web Services Inc.
radio.de cooperates with the following external web host, through which we are able to offer you our App and to process your data securely and efficiently. We have a legitimate interest in this according to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR.
Web host is Amazon Web Services Inc, 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, USA (“Amazon Web Services”). Amazon Web Services is certified according to the ISO 27001, ISO 27017 and ISO 27018 standards, which take into account aspects such as data security, data protection and reliability. The data servers used by Amazon Web Services are located within Germany in the Amazon Web Services Region Frankfurt. The Amazon Web Services privacy policy can be found at
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/
.
5.2 App Analysis Services
5.2.1 Google Firebase
The App uses various functionalities of Google Firebase (“Firebase”), a technology of Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland, (“Google”). Firebase enables us to perform various analyses on the installation and use of our App.
We use Firebase Crashlytics and Firebase Crash Reporting, which help the developers of radio.de to identify and fix app crashes. Stack traces are used to trace crashes back to an app, to display them in the Firebase interface and make them evaluable, and to send notifications (e.g. by e-mail) to radio.de. Furthermore, Crashlytics processes installation UUIDs to measure the number of users affected by a crash and minidump data, small memory images containing information about a crash, to process crashes in Android. The minidump data is stored while the crash session is being processed and then discarded. The aforementioned data is stored by Firebase for 90 days.
Furthermore, we use Firebase Dynamic Links and Firebase Remote Config. Dynamic Links uses device specifications and IP addresses on iOS to open newly installed apps for a specific page or context. Dynamic Links stores device specifications and IP addresses only temporarily to provide the service. Firebase Remote Config allows radio.de to show or hide content in the App and turn certain features on or off by processing Firebase installation IDs. Firebase stores the Firebase installation IDs until we delete them. Then the data is removed from the live and backup systems within 180 days.
Finally, we use Google Analytics for Firebase. Google Analytics for Firebase uses tracking data to be able to create evaluations about the use of the apps. For this purpose, Google Analytics uses so-called Mobile Ad IDs, IDFVs (iOS) or Android IDs (Android), Instance IDs, as well as Analytics App Instance IDs. Google Analytics stores some of the data linked to the ad ID (e.g. IDFVs, Android IDs) for 60 days and retains aggregate reporting without automatic expiry. The other aforementioned data is stored by Google Analytics for up to 14 months.
The legal basis for the collection of personal data by Firebase Remote Config is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR, as we have a legitimate interest in being able to present the content and functions to you in the best possible way; to do so Firebase Remote Config is technically necessary. Furthermore, the processing of your personal data within the scope of Firebase is based on your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR. You can give or revoke your consent at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP).
For the purpose and scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the data by Google, as well as your rights in this regard and further setting options for protecting your privacy, please refer to the data privacy information on Google Firebase at
https://firebase.google.com/terms/data-processing-terms
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy/manage-iids
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy
5.2.2. InfoOnline
radio.de uses the Scaleable Centralised Measuring System [Skalierbare Zentrale Messverfahren] (“SZM”), an analysis system of INFOnline GmbH, Brühler Str. 9, D-53119 Bonn to determine statistical values regarding the use of the App. Measurement values are collected in an anonymous manner. Your identity always remains protected. You will not receive any advertising via the system. The aim of the audience measurement is to statistically determine the intensity of use and the number of users of an app. With the statistics obtained, we can improve our offer and make it more interesting for you as a user.
SZM audience measurement uses an SDK (see section 4) to recognise mobile devices, via which various technical data on your mobile device is created and collected. IP addresses are not stored in the procedure and are only processed in anonymised form. At no time are individual users identified. Further information on the SZM procedure can be found at
https://www.infonline.de/datenschutz
.
The SZM is used on the basis of your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, which you can give or withdraw at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP).
Our App also participates in the audience measurement of the Arbeitsgemeinschaft Online-Forschung e.V. (“AGOF” - Working Group for Online Media Research) and the alliance between Informationsgemeinschaft zur Feststellung der Verbreitung von Werbeträgern e. V. (“IVW” - German Audit Bureau of Circulation) and the Arbeitsgemeinschaft Media-Analyse e.V. (“agma” - Media Analysis Council). AGOF, IVW and agma issue reports on a regular basis in studies about the usage statistics of participating services. Anonymous measured values are collected.
5.2.3 Adjust GmbH
The app uses various functionalities of Adjust, a technology of Adjust GmbH, Saarbrücker Str. 37A, 10405 Berlin, Germany, (“Adjust”). Adjust enables us to analyze the installation and use of our app in various ways. Adjust uses device specifications and IP addresses to open newly installed apps for a specific page or context. Adjust only stores device specifications and IP addresses temporarily in order to provide the service. Adjust stores the data for 12 months, after which it is automatically deleted.
Adjust uses tracking data to be able to create evaluations about the use of the apps. For this purpose, Adjust uses so-called Mobile Advertising IDs, IDFVs (iOS) or Android IDs (Android), IDFA (iOS), Adjust Device ID (ADID), App Set ID, Install Referrer. The other aforementioned data is stored by Adjust for 12 months. The legal basis for the collection of personal data by Adjust is Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR, as we have a legitimate interest in being able to present the content and functions for you in the best possible way and Adjust is technically necessary for us in this respect.
We also use Adjust Third Party Sharing. Adjust shares device IDs and app tokens with third-party marketing partners in order to measure the success of marketing campaigns. The data can be shared with the following partners AppleAds, Meta(Facebook), GoogleAds, GoogleMarketingPlatform, Snapchat, Tencent, TikTokSan, X(Twitter), YahooGemini, YahooJapanSearch. The processing of your personal data in the context of Adjust Third Party Sharing is based on your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR. You can give or withdraw your consent to Adjust Third Party Sharing at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP).
The purpose and scope of the data collection and the further processing and use of the data by Adjust as well as your rights in this regard and further setting options to protect your privacy can be found in the Adjust data protection information at
https://www.adjust.com/terms/general-terms-and-conditions/
5.3 Ticketing system and help centre for customer enquiries
Zendesk
radio.de uses Zendesk, a customer service platform of Zendesk Inc, 1019 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA (“Zendesk”, see also section 3.4). Zendesk is a ticket system for processing customer enquiries. To use Zendesk, necessary data such as your contact details and the content of your request are collected via our App in order to be able to process your support ticket. The data processed in each case is stored on Zendesk servers, which may also be located outside the EU, in particular the USA or the Asia-Pacific region. Zendesk processes the personal data exclusively in accordance with our instructions pursuant to a commissioned processing agreement and using the standard contractual clauses pursuant to Art. 46 para. 5 s. 2 GDPR. The legal basis for the use of Zendesk is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, insofar as you have given us your express consent, as well Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR, insofar as we have a legitimate interest in using a third-party service provider for the purpose of simplifying our operational processes when answering your questions about our services.
The purpose and scope of the data collection and the further processing of the data by Zendesk as well as the related rights and setting options for the protection of privacy can be found in the data protection information of Zendesk:
https://www.zendesk.com/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.87503192.1116616280.1609951268-2106221984.1609951268
,
https://support.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/360022366953-Complying-with-Privacy-and-Data-Protection-Law-in-Zendesk-products
.
5.4 Consent Management Platform
Sourcepoint Technologies, Inc.
In our App we use the “Consent Management Platform” (CMP) of the service provider Sourcepoint Technologies, Inc., 228 Park Avenue South, #87903, New York, NY 10003-1502, USA (hereinafter “Sourcepoint”). When you open our App for the first time and make settings via the CMP, your configuration is stored in the NSUserDefaults (iOS) or in the Shared Preferences (Android) of the app on your end device, where the settings you have made are saved. The settings collected via the configuration are transmitted to Sourcepoint servers located in France. Sourcepoint processes the personal data exclusively according to our instructions in accordance with an order processing agreement. Any transfer to a country outside the EU or the EEA that may be necessary in individual cases is based on data protection guarantees in accordance with Art. 45 ff. GDPR, in particular in the form of data transfer agreements containing the standard contractual clauses approved by the EU Commission. Sourcepoint is used in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR due to our legitimate interest in using a suitable service provider for the documentation of your consent.
Sourcepoint is a member of iab europe (
https://iabeurope.eu/members/sourcepoint/
). Further information on data protection and the CMP of Sourcepoint can be found at www.sourcepoint.com/privacy-policy;
https://documentation.sourcepoint.com/web-implementation/sourcepoint-gdpr-and-tcf-v2-support
.
5.5 Push-Messages
Airship
radio.de uses the push message service of Airship Group, Inc., 1225 West Burnside, Suite 401, Portland, OR  97209, USA („Airship“). While using our App, it is possible that you will receive push messages in order to offer you functions and services that are tailored to your use. An example of such a push message is “Your favourite station misses you - tune in now”. You will only receive such push messages if you have given your explicit consent for radio.de in the settings of your device’s operating system. You can adjust the authorisations at any time, also in the settings of your operating system, so you can allow or withdraw the sending of push messages at any time in the device settings of your mobile device. Airship stores your IP address, data about your mobile device such as device number and operating system, push notification token and usage data about your use of the app. We also ask you for your consent to collect, process and store the data necessary for sending the push notifications. The legal basis for the collection and processing of your personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, which you can also give or withdraw at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP). Further information on data protection can be found in Airship’s data protection information:
https://www.airship.com/legal/privacy/
.
Accengage
radio.de uses the push message service of Accengage S.A.S, 31, rue du 4 Septembre, 75002 Paris, France (“Accengage”). While using our App, it is possible that you will receive push messages in order to offer you functions and services that are tailored to your use. An example of such a push message is “Your favourite station misses you - tune in now”. You will only receive such push messages if you have given your explicit consent for radio.de in the settings of your device’s operating system. You can adjust the authorisations at any time, also in the settings of your operating system, so you can allow or withdraw the sending of push messages at any time in the device settings of your mobile device. Accengage stores your IP address, data about your mobile device such as device number and operating system, push notification token and usage data about your use of the app. We also ask you for your consent to collect, process and store the data necessary for sending the push notifications. The legal basis for the collection and processing of your personal data is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, which you can also give or withdraw at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP). Further information on data protection can be found in Accengage’s data protection information:
https://www.accengage.com/privacy-policy/
.
5.6 Advertising
radio.de uses the following additional external advertisers for marketing purposes. Advertisers market online advertising space in digital services - including our App. In doing so, we comply with the data protection regulations and - where necessary - have concluded contracts for the processing of personal data. Insofar as personal data is transferred to countries outside the EU or EEA for the purpose of advertising marketing, any transfer is based on data protection guarantees pursuant to Art. 45 ff. GDPR, in particular in the form of data transfer agreements containing the standard contractual clauses approved by the EU Commission.
5.6.1 Google Ad Manager
radio.de uses Google Ad Manager, a tool of Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland, („Google“) for marketing advertising space. Google Ad Manager uses technologies to show you advertisements that are relevant to you. This involves assining a pseudonymous identification number (ID) with your mobile device by means of a cookie and/or similar pseudonymous user identification in order to verify which ads have been shown in an App and which ads have been clicked on. This use of Ad Manager user IDs enables Google and its partner sites and other third parties on whose behalf Google solely works to serve ads based on previous visits of our App and other digital content on the internet. When Google receives an ad request, it usually also collects the IP address of the App user, which is transmitted to the relevant advertising partners for the purpose of delivering advertisements. Google Ad Manager is used on the basis of your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, which you can give or withdraw at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP). You can find more information about the Google Ad Manager at
https://support.google.com/admanager/answer/9035987?hl=de
and about data protection at Google in general at
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
5.6.2 Marketing by iab TCF v2.0 verified partners
For the digital advertising marketing of our services, we use vendors that are certified according to the iab standard in accordance with TCF v2.0 (for more information on the iab standard, please see section 4). Our cooperation with these vendors is not continuous; some vendors only become active through our contractual cooperation with the service providers listed under 5.6.3. For this reason, the vendors operating within the scope of our services may change. An overview of the vendors certified according to the iab standard with whom our cooperation is currently considered likely, can be found here. Here you can also find out to what extent and on what legal basis the vendors are active and specify and configure their preferences for the processing of their data by them.
5.6.3 Forms of advertising
The advertising marketing carried out by us and/or in our App takes place in different forms. In the following, we will explain to you which forms of advertising are used and which recipients (or categories of recipients, also “advertising partners”) can process the personal data collected in this context. The service providers listed in this section operate within the framework of specific agreements with us and exclusively on the basis of your consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR which you can give or withdraw at any time via our Consent Management Platform (CMP) and are largely certified in accordance with the IAB standard. Please note that other advertising partners may process your data within the framework of the iab network (for more details, please refer to section 5.6.2).
5.6.3.1 Direct campaigns
Occasionally we carry out direct campaigns with different changing advertising partners or agencies with limited runtimes and targeting. Such advertising partners are themselves responsible for data processing.
Possible technical implementation:
Redirects and VAST advertising media
- Via the Google Ad Manager we establish a technical connection between our advertising spaces and the advertising partner’s ad server. A pixel-code and click URLs can also be integrated directly.
Physical advertising material
(videospots and graphics)- Some files are stored directly in the Google Ad Manager – in that case no personal data is transmitted to the advertising partner.
Pixel-code
- An “invisible” graphic is delivered at the same time as the advertising material. The graphic is located on an external server of the advertising partner. In most cases, a third-party service provider works for the advertising partner.
Click URLs with tracking parameters
- If you click on the advertising material, you may be directed to the target page of the advertising partner via a tracking service provider. The tracking service provider will not collect any data until you click on the ad.
Type of personal data
Online identifier (IP addresses, cookie IDs, device IDs)
Transaction data (such as time of an ad impression, time of an ad click)
Nature and scope of data processing
Shortened IP addresses and cookie or device IDs are used to create monthly reports and to deliver advertising material within the App.
5.6.3.2 Reach marketing
With other advertising partners we carry out campaigns with fixed technical setups for an unlimited period of time.
Technical implementation
Redirects and VAST advertising media
- Via the Google Ad Manager we establish a technical connection between our advertising spaces and the ad server of the advertising client. A pixel-code and click URLs can also be directly integrated.
Type of personal data
Online identifiers (IP addresses, cookie IDs, device IDs)
Transaction data (such as time of an ad impression, time of an ad click)
Nature and scope of data processing
IP addresses and cookie or device IDs are used to create monthly reports and to deliver advertising material.
radio.de’s advertising partners for reach marketing
smartclip Europe GmbH
Privacy Policy:
https://privacy-portal.smartclip.net/en/
SMARTSTREAM.TV GmbH
Privacy Policy:
https://www.smartstream.tv/en/productprivacy
Goldbach Germany GmbH
Privacy Policy:
https://goldbach.com/de/de/datenschutz/goldbach-germany
Goldbach Austria GmbH
Privacy Policy:
https://goldbach.com/at/de/datenschutz/datenschutz-goldbach-austria
YOC AG
Privacy Policy:
https://yoc.com/privacy/
Spot X
Privacy Policy:
https://www.spotx.tv/privacy-policy/
Weischer.Media GmbH & Co. KG
Privacy Policy:
https://weischer.media/de/de/datenschutzerklaerung/
5.6.3.3 Programmatic Advertising and Real Time Bidding
Via Google’s Ad Manager we are connected to various networks that bid on the advertising space within our App. Some of these networks are active in the Google ADX, a digital real-time marketplace, where they bid on our advertising space, while others are activated separately for that purpose. The selection and delivery of the advertising is then carried out via the Google Ad Manager. The entire process is carried out automatically with regard to both the control of the advertising contact opportunities (so-called
“Programmatic Advertising”
) and the pricing between the supply and demand side (so-called
“Real Time Bidding”
).
Technical implementation
Redirects and VAST advertising media
- Via the Google Ad Manager we establish a technical connection between our advertising spaces and the ad server of the advertising client. A pixel-code and click URLs can also be directly integrated.
Type of personal data
Online identifiers (IP addresses, cookie IDs, device IDs)
Transaction data (such as time of an ad impression, time of an ad click)
Technical parameters of the browser (browser identifier, operating system, screen resolution, device classes, device manufacturer)
Nature and scope of data processing
The personal data used to create monthly reports and to deliver advertising material.
radio.de’s advertising partners for Programmatic Advertising and Real Time Bidding
Google ADX (You can find a list on all advertising partners that are connected via Google ADX
here
.)
Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Google Adsense
Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Index Exchange
Privacy Policy:
https://www.indexexchange.com/privacy/
Rubicon
Privacy Policy:
https://rubiconproject.com/rubicon-project-advertising-technology-privacy-policy/
Xandr (Appnexus)
Privacy Policy:
https://www.xandr.com/privacy/platform-privacy-policy/
Sovrn
Privacy Policy:
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/
Pubmatic
Privacy Policy:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/privacy/
RhythmOne
Privacy Policy:
https://www.rhythmone.com/privacy-policy/
Improve Digital
Privacy Policy:
https://www.improvedigital.com/platform-privacy-policy/
Media.net
Privacy Policy:
https://www.media.net/privacy-policy/
YOC AG
Privacy Policy:
https://yoc.com/privacy/
Smart
Privacy Policy:
https://smartadserver.com/end-user-privacy-policy
Ströer SSP GmbH
Privacy Policy:
https://www.stroeer.de/en/data-protection/
5.7 Other Marketing Tools
Google Ads
radio.de uses Google Ads, a service provided by Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Irland („Google“), to display advertisements. If you open our App, we and Google can recognise this. radio.de thus learns the total number of users who open the App. The measurement and statistical analysis described above is carried out by Google Analytics for Firebase (see under 5.2.1). The use of Google Analytics for Firebase is based on your consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (a) GDPR, which you can give or withdraw at any time via our CMP.
Maze
For surveys and user tests radio.net utilizes Maze that is a service of Maze.Design Ltd, England. Upon usage of this app you may be asked to participate in a survey or user test.
If you choose to participate, you will be directed to Maze. You will find the privacy policy of Maze here:
https://maze.co/privacy-policy/
6. Your data protection rights
In accordance with the GDPR as well as in accordance with the relevant provisions of European law and national law, you have the following rights within the scope of the respective provision, which you can exercise over radio.de - unless otherwise stated - e.g. by sending an email to datenschutz@radio.de or to the contact data stated under section 2. radio.de will fulfil your rights if the relevant conditions are met:
Right of access
In accordance with Art. 15 GDPR, you can obtain confirmation from radio.de as to whether or not your personal data is collected, processed and stored by radio.de. If such a collection, processing and storage exists, you can, among other things, obtain information from radio.de about the purposes for which the personal data is collected and processed and the planned duration of storage of your personal data or, if specific information on this is not possible, about criteria for determining the duration of storage.
Right to rectification
If the personal data collected and processed concerning you is incorrect or incomplete, you have the right of rectification and/or completion of your personal data in accordance with Art. 16 GDPR towards radio.de.
Right to restriction of processing
In accordance with Art. 18 GDPR, you can request the restriction of the processing of your personal data.
Right to erasure
In accordance with Art. 17 GDPR, you can obtain from radio.de the erasure of your personal will be deleted immediately. radio.de may be obliged to delete this data immediately if the personal data relating to you is no longer necessary for the purposes for which it was collected or otherwise processed, or if you have withdrawn your consent to which the collection, processing and storage relates. The right to deletion does not exist, among other things, if the processing is necessary to fulfil a legal obligation which requires the collection and processing according to the law of the EU or the member states to which radio.de is subject and if the collection and processing is necessary for the assertion, exercise or defence of legal claims.
Right to data portability
In accordance with Art. 20 GDPR, you have the right to receive your personal data that you have provided to us as the data controller in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format. You also have the right to transmit those data to another person in charge, without hindrance from us.
Right to object
**According to Art. 21 GDPR, you have the right to object to the processing of personal data concerning you. Pursuant to Art. 21 para. 1 GDPR, you may at any time, for reasons arising from your particular situation, object to the processing of personal data carried out on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 (f) GDPR. **
Right to withdraw consent
If you have given us your consent to the collecting and processing of your personal data, you have the right to withdraw your consent under data protection law at any time in accordance with Art. 7 para. 3 GDPR. Processing that took place before the withdrawal remains unaffected by this.
Right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority
According to Art. 77 GDPR, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, in particular in the member state of your place of residence, your place of work or the place of the alleged infringement, in case that you believe that the collection and processing of your personal data infringes the GDPR.
7. Miscellaneous
In the further development of the services offered and the implementation of new technologies, radio.de reserves the right to update this data protection declaration at any time. radio.de therefore asks you to regularly take note of our privacy policy available here.
Last updated: November 2024
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 1
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy/manage-iids:
Skip to main content
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Developer Support
Contact Support
Scope of no-cost support
Support Guides
Overview
FAQ
Security checklist
Launch checklist
Firebase-related service accounts
Troubleshoot initialization options
Enable the AdSupport framework
Dynamic Links deprecation
Deprecation FAQ
Export Dynamic Links metadata
Migrate to App Links & Universal Links
Migrate from Parse
Android
iOS+
Cloud Audit Logs
Firebase Management
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase App Check
Firebase Security Rules
Firebase Realtime Database
Android Device Streaming
Recent Changes and Updates
Release Notes
iOS Release Notes
Android Release Notes
JavaScript Release Notes
Flutter Release Notes
C++ Release Notes
Unity Release Notes
Admin Node.js Release Notes
Admin Java Release Notes
Admin Python Release Notes
Admin Go Release Notes
Admin .NET Release Notes
Security Rules Release Notes
Firebase CLI Release Notes
Policies for changes and versioning
Overview
Introducing and communicating changes
Versioning and maintenance
Legal Information
Terms of Service
Paid Services Terms
Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase: Standard Contractual Clauses
Service Level Agreement for Hosting and Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase Service Level Agreement
Firebase App Indexing User Data Policy
Crashlytics and App Distribution Terms
Firebase Subprocessors
Privacy and Security Information
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Designate Data Protection Officers and EU Representatives
Firebase Data Privacy Inquiries
Manage Instance ID data
Clear and export users' data
Storing privacy settings with Firebase
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Support
Send feedback
Manage Instance ID data
Stay organized with collections
Save and categorize content based on your preferences.
Warning:
The Instance ID API is deprecated.
If you need to access unique
app installation identifiers, use the
Firebase installations
API.
See also
Firebase installations and Instance ID
.
The
server-side topic management API
is still available.
Instance IDs identify individual installations of your app. Since each Instance
ID is unique to a particular app and device, they give Firebase services a way
to refer to specific app instances. For example,
Cloud Messaging
uses
Instance IDs to determine which devices to send messages to.
Several Firebase services use Instance IDs to power their features:
Analytics
Crashlytics
Cloud Messaging
Remote Config
Manage app data associated with Instance IDs
Services that use Instance IDs to identify installations also use them as a key to
associate relevant data with that device. For example,
Crashlytics
uses
Instance IDs to record crashes that happen on the device,
Remote Config
uses
them to fetch configurations, and
Analytics
uses Instance IDs to track
particular audiences.
Data associated with Instance IDs is generally
not
personally-identifying,
but it can still be helpful to give users an option to manage it. To that
end, Firebase offers two ways to manage Instance-ID-related data collection:
Delete Instance IDs.
You can delete an Instance ID with a server- or
client-side API call. Deleting an Instance ID deletes the ID itself and all data
associated with it.
Disable services that generate IDs.
Most Firebase services that use Instance
IDs automatically generate a new ID if there isn't one on the device when they
start up. To ensure your app doesn't create unwanted Instance IDs, disable
auto-initialization for those services.
Delete an Instance ID
Deleting an Instance ID also deletes data associated with that ID in any of the
Firebase services listed above. That makes ID deletion a helpful tool in
clearing user data, but also comes with a caveat: if you're using multiple
services that rely on Instance IDs, deleting an ID clears data from
all
of
them.
The Instance ID service creates a new ID within a few days, unless you
disable all Instance-ID-generating services in your app. Firebase considers the
newly-created ID to be a brand new app instance, and doesn't associate it with
the previous ID in any way.
Note:
Google Analytics
uses its own form of Instance ID to keep track of
analytics data. Deleting a regular Instance ID does
not
delete Analytics data.
Learn how to
delete Analytics data associated with end users
.
Delete an ID with a client API call
To delete IDs generated by Firebase services, call the appropriate method from
the Firebase Instance ID API:
Swift
InstanceID
.
instanceID
().
deleteID
{
error
in
if
let
error
=
error
{
print
(
"Error deleting instance ID:
\(
error
)
"
)
}
}
Objective-C
[
FIRInstanceID
instanceID
]
deleteIDWithHandler
:^
(
NSError
*
error
)
{
if
error
!=
nil
{
NSLog
(
@"Error deleting instance ID: %@"
,
error
);
}
}];
Android
FirebaseInstanceId.deleteInstanceId();
Delete an ID with a server API call
To delete an Instance ID with server API calls,
add the Firebase Admin SDK to your server
,
if you haven't already.
Once it's added, delete IDs through a call to the Instance ID deletion function
in your language of choice:
Node.js
// An Instance ID sent from a client service SDK
const
idToDelete
=
'INSTANCE_ID'
;
admin
.
instanceId
().
deleteInstanceId
(
idToDelete
);
Java
// An Instance ID sent from a client service SDK
String
idToDelete
=
"INSTANCE_ID"
;
FirebaseInstanceId
.
getInstance
().
deleteInstanceIdAsync
(
idToDelete
).
get
();
Python
from
firebase_admin
import
instance_id
# An Instance ID sent from a client service SDK
id_to_delete
=
'INSTANCE_ID'
instance_id
.
delete_instance_id
(
id_to_delete
)
Go
client
,
err
:=
app
.
InstanceId
(
ctx
)
if
err
!=
nil
{
log
.
Fatalln
(
"error initializing client"
,
err
)
}
iidToDelete
:=
"INSTANCE_ID"
if
err
:=
client
.
DeleteInstanceId
(
ctx
,
iidToDelete
);
err
!=
nil
{
log
.
Fatalln
(
"error deleting iid"
,
err
)
}
When you delete an Instance ID with a server API call, Firebase services delete
the associated data, stop accepting new data for that ID, and, within a few days,
notify the client app that the ID was deleted. Until Firebase notifies the client
app, some of the app's services might experience reduced functionality.
If you want to delete the current Instance ID and immediately use Firebase
services with a new, independent ID, use one of the Client APIs above to
handle the deletion.
Disable Instance ID generation
Services that use Instance IDs automatically generate a new ID when they're
initialized in an app that doesn't currently have one. Typically, those services
also automatically initialize when your app launches. To disable Instance
ID generation, you have to disable auto-initialization for services that use
them.
A common approach is to give users an option to
opt-in to data collection: disable auto-initialization for
the services that use Instance IDs, implement a dialog that prompts
users for their consent to data collection, and re-enable the services manually
once you have consent.
Read the guides below to find out how to disable auto-initialization for
Instance-ID-using services and instead manually initialize them:
Cloud Messaging
:
Prevent Auto-initialization (Android)
or
Prevent Auto-initialization (iOS+)
Crash Reporting
:
Enable Opt-in Reporting
Analytics
:
Configure Analytics Data Collection
Note:
Firebase Remote Config also generates Instance IDs, but isn't
automatically initialized on app start. To delay ID generation in Remote Config,
don't use the service until you're ready to generate an ID.
Send feedback
Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the
Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 License
, and code samples are licensed under the
Apache 2.0 License
. For details, see the
Google Developers Site Policies
. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.
Last updated 2025-03-11 UTC.
Sub-policy 2
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy:
Skip to main content
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Developer Support
Contact Support
Scope of no-cost support
Support Guides
Overview
FAQ
Security checklist
Launch checklist
Firebase-related service accounts
Troubleshoot initialization options
Enable the AdSupport framework
Dynamic Links deprecation
Deprecation FAQ
Export Dynamic Links metadata
Migrate to App Links & Universal Links
Migrate from Parse
Android
iOS+
Cloud Audit Logs
Firebase Management
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase App Check
Firebase Security Rules
Firebase Realtime Database
Android Device Streaming
Recent Changes and Updates
Release Notes
iOS Release Notes
Android Release Notes
JavaScript Release Notes
Flutter Release Notes
C++ Release Notes
Unity Release Notes
Admin Node.js Release Notes
Admin Java Release Notes
Admin Python Release Notes
Admin Go Release Notes
Admin .NET Release Notes
Security Rules Release Notes
Firebase CLI Release Notes
Policies for changes and versioning
Overview
Introducing and communicating changes
Versioning and maintenance
Legal Information
Terms of Service
Paid Services Terms
Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase: Standard Contractual Clauses
Service Level Agreement for Hosting and Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase Service Level Agreement
Firebase App Indexing User Data Policy
Crashlytics and App Distribution Terms
Firebase Subprocessors
Privacy and Security Information
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Designate Data Protection Officers and EU Representatives
Firebase Data Privacy Inquiries
Manage Instance ID data
Clear and export users' data
Storing privacy settings with Firebase
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Support
Send feedback
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Stay organized with collections
Save and categorize content based on your preferences.
This page outlines Firebase's key security and privacy information. Whether
you're looking to kick off a new project with Firebase, or curious about how
Firebase works with your existing project, read on to see how Firebase can help
protect you and your users.
Last modified: February 20, 2025
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
On May 25th, 2018, the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the
1995 EU Data Protection Directive. On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer
Privacy Act (CCPA) took effect. On January 1, 2023, the California Privacy
Rights Act (CPRA), which is a data privacy law that amends and expands upon the
CCPA, took effect. Google is committed to helping our customers succeed under
these privacy regulations, whether they are large software companies or
independent developers.
The GDPR imposes obligations on data controllers and data processors, and the
CCPA/CPRA imposes obligations on businesses and their service providers.
Firebase customers typically act as the "data controller" (GDPR) or "business"
(CCPA/CPRA) for any personal data or information about their end-users they
provide to Google in connection with their use of Firebase, and Google generally
operates as a "data processor" (GDPR) or "service provider" (CCPA/CPRA).
This means that data is under the customer's control. Customers are
responsible for obligations like fulfilling an individual's rights with respect
to their personal data or information.
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
When customers use Firebase, Google is generally a data processor under GDPR and
processes personal data on their behalf. Similarly, when customers use Firebase,
Google generally operates as a service provider under the CCPA/CPRA handling
personal information on their behalf. Firebase terms include
Data Processing
and Security Terms
detailing these
responsibilities.
Certain Firebase services governed by the
Google Cloud Platform (GCP) Terms of Service
are already covered by associated data processing terms, the
Cloud Data Processing Addendum
.
A complete list of Firebase services currently governed by the GCP Terms of
Service is available in the
Terms of Service for Firebase Services
.
Google Analytics is a separate service that can be used together with Firebase,
and is subject to separate
terms
.
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
ISO and SOC compliance
All Firebase services (aside from App Indexing) have successfully completed the
ISO
27001
and
SOC
1
,
SOC
2
,
and
SOC 3
evaluation
process, and some have also completed the
ISO
27017
and
ISO
27018
certification
process. Compliance reports and certificates for Firebase services governed by
the GCP Terms of Service may be requested via the
Compliance Reports
Manager
.
Service name
ISO 27001
ISO 27017
ISO 27018
SOC 1
SOC 2
SOC 3
Cloud Firestore
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Functions for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Storage for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase A/B Testing
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Check
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Distribution
check
check
check
check
Firebase Authentication
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase Cloud Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase Crashlytics
check
check
check
check
Firebase Dynamic Links
check
check
check
check
Firebase Hosting
check
check
check
check
Firebase In-App Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase ML
check
check
check
check
Firebase Performance Monitoring
check
check
check
check
Firebase Platform
check
check
check
check
Firebase Realtime Database
check
check
check
check
Firebase Remote Config
check
check
check
check
Firebase Test Lab
check
check
check
check
check
check
Gemini in Firebase
check
check
check
check
Vertex AI in Firebase
check
check
check
check
International Data Transfers
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework
certification
,
we comply with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the
EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. Google LLC (and its wholly-owned US
subsidiaries unless explicitly excluded) has certified that it adheres to the
DPF Principles. Google remains responsible for any of your personal information
that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for
external processing on our behalf, as described in the
"Sharing your
information" section of our Privacy
Policy
. To learn more about
the DPF, and to view Google's certification, please visit the
DPF
website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF
certification, we encourage you to
contact
us
. Google is
subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade
Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection
authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain
circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to
resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the
DPF
Principles
.
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Some Firebase services process your end users' data to provide their service.
The chart below has examples of how various Firebase services use and handle
end-user data that may potentially be identifying. In addition, many Firebase
services offer the ability to request deletion of specific data or control how
data is handled.
Firebase service
End-user data
How data helps provide the service
Cloud Functions for Firebase
IP addresses
How it helps:
Cloud Functions uses IP addresses to
            execute event-handling functions and HTTP functions based on end-user actions.
Retention:
Cloud functions only saves IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase App Check
Attestation material from supported attestation providers
App Check tokens from successful attestations
How it helps:
Firebase App Check uses attestation
            material required by the corresponding attestation provider and
            received from end-user's devices to help establish the integrity of
            the device and/or the app. Attestation materials are sent to the
            corresponding attestation provider for validation based on the
            developer's configuration. App Check tokens obtained from successful
            attestations are sent with every request to supported Firebase
            services to access resources protected by App Check.
Retention:
Attestation material is not retained by
            App Check, but when it is sent to attestation providers, it is
            subject to the terms of those attestation providers. App Check
            tokens returned from successful attestations are valid throughout
            their TTL duration, which cannot be longer than 7 days. For
            developers who use replay protection features, App Check stores the
            App Check tokens used with these features for at most 30 days. Other
            App Check tokens not used with replay protection features are not
            retained by Firebase services.
Firebase App Distribution
Users' names
Email addresses
iOS UDIDs
Secure Android IDs
Firebase
installation IDs
Tester feedback (screenshots and text)
How it helps:
Firebase App Distribution uses the data to distribute
            app builds to testers, monitor tester activity, enable tester features like in-app
            feedback, and associate data with tester devices.
Retention:
Firebase App Distribution retains user information
            until the Firebase customer requests its deletion, after which data is removed from live
            and backup systems within 180 days.
Firebase Authentication
Passwords
Email addresses
Phone numbers
User agents
IP addresses
How it helps:
Firebase Authentication uses the data to enable end-user
            authentication, and facilitate end-user account management. It also uses user-agent
            strings and IP addresses to provide added security and prevent abuse during sign-up and
            authentication.
Retention:
Firebase Authentication keeps logged IP addresses for a few
            weeks. It retains other authentication information until the Firebase customer initiates
            deletion of the associated user, after which data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase Cloud Messaging uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Crashlytics
Crashlytics Installation UUIDs
Firebase installations ID
Crash traces
Breakpad minidump formatted data
(NDK crashes only)
How it helps:
Firebase Crashlytics uses crash stack
            traces to associate crashes with a project, send email alerts to
            project members and display them in the Firebase Console, and help
            Firebase customers debug crashes. It uses Crashlytics Installation
            UUIDs to measure the number of users impacted by a crash and
            minidump data to process NDK crashes. The minidump data is stored
            while the crash session is being processed and then discarded. The
            Firebase installation ID enables upcoming features that will enhance
            crash reporting and crash management services. Refer to
Examples of stored device information
for more detail on the types of user information gathered.
Retention:
Firebase Crashlytics keeps crash stack traces,
            extracted minidump data, and associated identifiers (including
            Crashlytics Installation UUIDs and Firebase installation IDs) for 90 days before
            starting the process of removing it from live and backup systems.
Note:
Firebase Crashlytics stores minidump data only temporarily in order to
            process NDK crashes.
Firebase Dynamic Links
Device specs (iOS)
IP Addresses (iOS)
How it helps:
Dynamic Links uses device specs and IP addresses on iOS to open
            newly-installed apps to a specific page or context.
Retention:
Dynamic Links only stores device specs and IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase Hosting
IP addresses
How it helps:
Hosting uses IP addresses of incoming requests to detect
            abuse and provide customers with detailed analysis of usage data.
Retention:
Hosting retains IP data for a few months.
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase In-App Messaging
uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase ML
Uploaded Images
installation auth tokens
How it helps:
The Cloud based APIs store uploaded images temporarily,
            to process and return the analysis to you. Stored images are typically deleted within a
            few hours. See the Cloud Vision
Data Usage FAQ
for more
            information.
installation auth tokens
are used by
Firebase ML
for device authentication when interacting with app
            instances, for example, to distribute developer models to app instances.
Retention:
installation auth tokens remain valid until their
            expiration date. The default token lifetime is one week.
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Firebase
installation IDs
IP addresses
How it helps:
Performance Monitoring
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to calculate the number of unique Firebase installations that access network resources,
            to ensure that access patterns are sufficiently anonymous. It also uses
Firebase
installation IDs with
Firebase Remote Config
to manage the rate of performance event reporting. Additionally, it uses IP
            addresses to map performance events to the countries they originate from. For more
            information, see
Data collection
.
Retention:
Performance Monitoring
keeps IP-associated
            events for 30 days, and it keeps installation-associated and de-identified performance
            data for 60 days before starting the process of removing it from live and backup
            systems.
Firebase Realtime Database
IP addresses
User agents
How it helps:
Realtime Database uses IP addresses and user agents to
            enable the
profiler
            tool
, which helps Firebase customers understand usage trends and platform
            breakdowns.
Retention:
Realtime Database keeps IP addresses and user agent
            information for a few days, unless a customer chooses to save it for longer.
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Remote Config
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to select configuration
            values to return to end-user devices.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs until the Firebase customer makes an API call to delete the
          ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup systems within 180 days.
Vertex AI in Firebase
Customer's inputs and outputs data sent and received from the AI model
How it helps:
Vertex AI in Firebase
uses Vertex AI's Generative AI
            API to predict content.
Retention:
During prediction, Google doesn't log Customer Data to
            generate a customer's output or train foundation models. By default, Google caches a
            customer's inputs and outputs for the Gemini models to accelerate responses to
            subsequent prompts from the customer.
See more details at
Generative
              AI and Data Governance | Generative AI on Vertex AI | Google Cloud
.
Examples of information collected by Crashlytics
An RFC-4122 UUID which permits us to deduplicate crashes
The Crashlytics Installation UUID
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
The timestamp of when the crash occurred
The app's bundle identifier and full version number
The device's operating system name and version number
A boolean indicating whether the device was jailbroken/rooted
The device's model name, CPU architecture, amount of RAM and disk
      space
The uint64 instruction pointer of every frame of every currently running
      thread
If available in the runtime, the plain-text method or function name
      containing each instruction pointer.
If an exception was thrown, the plain-text class name and message value
      of the exception
If a fatal signal was raised, its name and integer code
For each binary image loaded into the application, its name, UUID, byte
      size, and the uint64 base address at which it was loaded into RAM
A boolean indicating whether or not the app was in the background at the
      time it crashed
An integer value indicating the rotation of the screen at the time of
      crash
A boolean indicating whether the device's proximity sensor was
      triggered
The contents of
version-control-info.textproto
(only for Android apps
configured
        to use the version control system (VCS) integration
)
Examples of information collected by Performance Monitoring
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
General device information, such as model, OS, and orientation
RAM and disk size
CPU usage
Carrier (based on Mobile Country and Network Code)
Radio/Network information (for example, WiFi, LTE, 3G)
Country (based on IP address)
Locale/language
App version
App foreground or background state
App package name
Firebase
installation IDs
Duration times for automated traces
Network URLs (not including URL parameters or payload content)
      and the following corresponding information:
Response codes (for example, 403, 200)
Payload size in bytes
Response times
See a
full list
of the
    automatic traces collected by
Performance Monitoring
.
Note:
For more info on deleting data associated with installations, see
Delete a Firebase installation
.
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Services in the table above need some amount of end-user data to function. As a
result, it's not possible to entirely disable data collection while using those
services.
If you're a customer who would like to offer users a chance to opt-in to a
service, and the data collection that comes with it, in most cases that just
requires adding a dialog or settings toggle before using the service.
Some services, however, start up automatically when included in an app. To give
users a chance to opt-in before using those services, you can choose to disable
auto-initialization for each service, and manually initialize them at run time
instead. To find out how, read the guides below:
Cloud Messaging
:
Prevent Auto-initialization (Android)
or
Prevent Auto-initialization (iOS+)
Crashlytics
:
Enable Opt-in Reporting (iOS+)
or
Enable Opt-in Reporting (Android)
Performance Monitoring
:
Enable Opt-in Monitoring
If you integrate Firebase with Google Analytics, learn how to
configure Analytics data collection
.
Data storage and processing locations
Unless a service or feature offers data location selection, Firebase may process
and store your data anywhere Google or its agents maintain facilities. Potential
facility locations vary by service.
US-only services
The
Firebase Authentication
service is run only from US data centers. As a result,
Firebase Authentication
processes data exclusively in the United States.
Global services
The majority of Firebase services run on global Google infrastructure.
They could process data at any of the
Google Cloud Platform locations
or
Google data center locations
.
For some services, you can make a specific data location selection, which
restricts processing to that location (for more information, see the
service specific terms
of the Google Cloud Platform Terms of Service).
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase ML
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Dynamic Links
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Hosting
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Security information
Data encryption
Firebase services encrypt data in transit using HTTPS and logically isolate
customer data.
In addition, several Firebase services also encrypt their data at rest:
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Authentication
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Security practices
To keep personal data safe, Firebase employs extensive security measures to
minimize access:
Firebase restricts access to a select employees who have a business purpose to access personal data.
Firebase logs employee access to systems that contain personal data.
Firebase only permits access to personal data by employees who sign in with Google Sign-In and
2-factor authentication
.
Firebase Service Data
Firebase Service Data is personal information that Google collects and generates
during the provision and administration of the Firebase services
*
,
excluding Customer Data
**
as defined in our customer agreements
covering Firebase services and
Google Cloud Service Data
.
Examples of Firebase Service Data include information about service usage,
resource identifiers like application IDs and package name/bundle IDs, technical
and operational details of usage such as IP addresses, and direct communications
with developers from feedback and support related conversations.
*Services covered include Firebase A/B Testing, Firebase App Distribution,
  Firebase Cloud Messaging, Firebase Crashlytics, Firebase Dynamic Links,
  Firebase Hosting, Firebase In-App Messaging, Firebase ML,
  Firebase Performance Monitoring, Firebase Realtime Database,
  Firebase Remote Config, and Firebase User Segmentation Storage.
**For more information about how we process Customer Data, see our
Firebase Data Processing and Security
  Terms
.
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Google uses Firebase Service Data in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms.
Firebase Service Data is used, for example, to:
Provide Firebase services you request
Make recommendations to optimize use of Firebase services
Maintain and improve Firebase services
Provide and improve other services you request
Understand your use of Firebase and other Google services
Provide better support to and communicate with you
Protect you, our users, the public and Google
Comply with legal obligations
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
You can control whether your Firebase Service Data may be used by Google to
provide more in depth analysis, insights, and recommendations about
non-Firebase
Google services and improve
non-Firebase
Google services.
You can configure this in your Firebase data privacy settings page.
If this control is disabled, Firebase Service Data will continue to be used
for other purposes, such as those mentioned above, in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms, including
to make recommendations about and improve
Firebase
services, and to deliver
and improve other services you request, such as Google products you link to your
Firebase project.
Still have questions? Contact us
For any privacy-related questions you have that aren't covered here,
reach out to Firebase Support
. If you're a Firebase developer, include your Firebase App ID. Find your Firebase App ID in the
Your apps
card of your
settings
Project
settings
.
Send feedback
Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the
Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 License
, and code samples are licensed under the
Apache 2.0 License
. For details, see the
Google Developers Site Policies
. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.
Last updated 2025-03-04 UTC.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.zendesk.com/company/customers-partners/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.87503192.1116616280.1609951268-2106221984.1609951268:
Skip to main content
Agreements and Terms
Policies and Guidelines
Trademarks and Intellectual Property
Procurement and Suppliers
Data Protection and Privacy
Customer Agreements and User Terms for Products and Services
Main Services Agreement
Region-Specific Terms
Professional Services Terms
How We Protect Your Service Data (Enterprise Services)
How We Protect Your Service Data (Innovation Services)
Innovation Services List
Application Developer and API License Agreement
Marketplace Terms of Use
Assignments and Transfers
Reseller Subscription Services Agreement
Data Protection and Privacy
Zendesk Trust Center
Privacy Notice
Cookie Notice
Data Processing Agreement
CCPA Addendum PowerForm
LGPD Addendum Powerform
BAA Powerform
Government Data Request Policy
Policies
Data Deletion Policy
Promotional Credits Policy
Regional Data Hosting Policy
Sub-processor Policy
Zendesk User Content and Conduct Policy
Product Terms
Accessibility Policy
In-Product Cookies Policy
Service-Specific Terms
Free Trial and Beta Services Terms
Free Trials
Beta Services
Privacy Notice
Effective Date:
March 10, 2025
For the prior version of our Privacy Notice, click
here
.
For the prior version of our Zendesk Events Policy, click
here
.
Hello! Zendesk is a service-first CRM company that builds software designed to improve customer relationships. We’ve developed this Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) to explain to you how we collect, use, disclose, and store personal data.
This Notice
only
applies when Zendesk is the Controller of personal data (example: Zendesk website visitors’ personal data and business-to-business contact data).
Zendesk is a
Processor
, not a Controller, of personal data that we process on behalf of our Subscribers when they use Zendesk products and Services. For clarity, this means that this Notice does
not
apply to where Zendesk processes personal data as a processor in its products and Services. If you have questions related to how a Zendesk Subscriber utilizes your personal data, please contact them directly. We are not responsible for the privacy or data security practices of our Subscribers. This Notice also does not apply to personal data about current and former Zendesk employees, job candidates, or contractors and agents acting in similar roles.
Table of Contents:
Introduction
Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
How We Process Personal Data
Sources of Personal Data
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Security and Retention
Children’s Privacy
External Links
Contact Information
Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K.
Supplemental Information for Other Regions
English Version Controls
Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
1. Introduction
This Notice applies to Zendesk, Inc. and its relevant Affiliates listed in
Section 14
(“
Zendesk
,” “
us
,” “
we
,” or “
our”
). Capitalized terms that we use but are not defined in the Notice (such as Site, Services, Subscriber, Agent, Agent Contact Information, etc.) have the meaning provided in our
Main Services Agreement
. If you are located in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (“
U.K.
”), please refer to
Section 11
of this Notice for more information about which specific entity or entities act as a controller of your personal data.
When Does This Notice Apply?
This Notice only applies to personal data that Zendesk handles as a Controller (meaning where Zendesk controls how and why your personal data is processed). This includes when you:
Visit or interact with the Zendesk.com Site, the Zendesk mobile applications, the Zendesk Marketplace, the Zendesk Developer Portal, our branded social media pages, and other Sites which we operate (collectively, our “
Digital Properties
”);
Register for or participate in our webinars, events, programs, marketing, and promotional activities;
Interact with us in person, such as when you visit our offices; and
Inquire about or engage in commercial transactions with us.
Changes
: We may update this Notice from time to time. Please check back periodically for updates. If you do not agree with any changes we make, you should stop interacting with us. When required under applicable law, we will notify you of any changes to this Notice by posting an update on our Site or in another appropriate manner.
2. Personal Data We Collect and Disclose
The below table describes what personal data we collect about you and to whom we disclose personal data. California individuals: This table includes the parties we disclose personal data to for a business or commercial purpose, as defined by California law.
Categories of Personal Data Collected
Disclosures of Personal Data
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g., advertising identifiers and IP address).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners
With third parties at your direction, such as event sponsors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
With third parties that are necessary to complete a transaction, such as credit card processors
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, accountants, and auditors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g., if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g., for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as security and platform vendors.
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to react positively to.
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Affiliates and subsidiaries within the Zendesk Group, which includes parent and ultimate holding companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, business units, and other companies that we acquire in the future after they are made part of the Zendesk Group
Service providers, such as platform vendors
Entities involved in a corporate transaction, including if we sell, acquire, or merge all or some of our assets
To which you have consented to the disclosure
In addition to the above disclosures, we may share your personal data to respond to lawful requests by law enforcement or other government authorities, including to meet national security requirements, in accordance with our
Government Data Request Policy
. We may also de-identify, anonymize, or aggregate personal data to use or share with third parties for any purpose, where legally permitted.
3. How We Process Personal Data
We may process your personal data for the below purposes:
Purpose of Processing
Lawful Basis
To provide our products, Services, and Digital Properties to you
, including  processing and fulfilling transactions; enabling you to access the Digital Properties and our Services; operating, maintaining, and improving our Digital Properties and Services; communicating with you, such as by completing your support requests or providing security updates; and diagnosing, repairing, and tracking service and quality issues.
Legitimate interests; Contract; Legal obligations
For our own business purposes
, including maintaining internal business records and conducting internal reporting; collecting payments and performing accounting and similar business functions; auditing and managing projects related to our Services; performing IT security management and IT-related tasks, such as administration of our technologies and network; evaluating and improving our business, Services, and Digital Properties; and performing research and development of new products and services; and processing your survey and questionnaire responses.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
For legal, safety, or security reasons
, including to comply with legal requirements; establish, exercise, or defend against legal claims; protect the safety, security, and integrity of our property and the rights of those who interact with us or others; investigate any content or conduct policy violations; and detect, prevent, and respond to security incidents or other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity.
These safety purposes may also involve collecting and processing special categories of personal data (i.e., health data), for office visits and events where necessary for public health or as required by applicable law.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations; Public interest
For marketing our products and Services or those of third parties, such as our business partners
, including to solicit or publish testimonials or feedback about our products and Services; send you marketing and promotional communications or product recommendations (via email, phone, or other online and offline channels) about our Services or those of third parties; facilitate your participation in a contest or event; assess ad impressions or engage in contextual ad customization.
You may opt out of marketing communications
here
or by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of our marketing communications. You may also manage your email preferences
here
. Note that some of our marketing materials and information may use tracking technologies and analytics tools to help us understand your preferences. For further information, please see
Section 5
below and our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
To fulfill a referral request when you use our referral service to tell a friend about our Services
, including by using the name, email address, title, and company name that you provide us to contact the person you are referring.
You must only provide others’ personal data if you have their consent to do so.
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Diversity, equity, and inclusion
, such as promoting diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives and representation within our business (where authorized by applicable law).
Consent (where required by law); Legitimate interests
Corporate transactions
, such as sales, mergers, acquisitions, reorganizations, bankruptcy, and other corporate events.
Legitimate interests; Legal obligations
When you have voluntarily agreed
to have your personal data processed.
Consent
Zendesk will honor data subject rights to the extent required by law. You may have the right to access, correct, update, and, in some cases, request deletion of your personal data (subject to exceptions). You may submit a request
here
.
Zendesk uses a limited number of third-party service providers to assist us in processing data for certain purposes. These third-party providers help support certain site features, perform database monitoring and other technical operations, assist with the transmission of data, and provide data storage services. These third parties may process or store personal data while providing their services. Zendesk maintains contracts with these third parties restricting their access, use and disclosure of personal data in compliance with our obligations under applicable laws and privacy certifications described more fully below.
4. Sources of Personal Data
Information you provide to us directly
, including when you register and communicate with us directly through our Digital Properties, visit our offices, or participate in our events, marketing, and outreach activities.
Information collected from your employer
, coworkers, or friends, including information about representatives or other employees of our current, past, and prospective customers, suppliers, investors, and business partners. We may also receive your information from a friend as part of a referral for our Services.
Information automatically collected
, including technical information about your interactions with our Digital Properties (such as IP address, browsing preferences, and purchase history). More information is available in
Section 5
below and in our
Cookie Notice
.
Information from public sources
, including information from public records and information you share in public forums, such as social media.
Information from other third parties
, including information from third-party service and content providers, entities with whom we partner to sell or promote products and services, and social media networks (including widgets related to such networks, such as the “Facebook Like” button).
We may combine information that we receive from the various sources described in this Notice, including third-party sources and public sources, and use or disclose it for the purposes identified above.
5. Cookies and Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and other tracking technologies and offer you the option to manage these settings as described in our
Cookie Notice
. Some tracking technologies enable us to track your device activity over time and across devices and websites. While some browsers have incorporated Do Not Track or DNT preferences, we do not honor such signals from web browsers at this time.
6. Security and Retention
We maintain appropriate security procedures and technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, disclosure, alteration, or use.
Your personal data will be generally retained as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we collected the personal data. Once you and/or your company have terminated the contractual relationship with us or otherwise ended your relationship with us, we may retain your personal data in our systems and records to ensure adequate fulfillment of surviving provisions in terminated contracts or for other legitimate business purposes, such as to evidence our business practices and contractual obligations, to provide you with information about our products and services, or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need nor lawful legal ground to process your personal data, we will delete, anonymize, or aggregate it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you want to know more about retention periods applicable to your particular circumstance, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
7. Children’s Privacy
Our Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, and we do not knowingly collect online personal data directly from children. If you are a parent or guardian of a minor child and believe that the child has disclosed online personal data to us, please contact us using the details provided in
Section 9
below.
8. External Links
When interacting with us, you may encounter links to external sites or other online services, including those embedded in third-party advertisements. We do not control and are not responsible for privacy and data collection policies for such third-party sites and services. You should consult such third parties and their respective privacy notices for more information or if you have any questions about their practices.
9. Contact Information
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Notice or about the Zendesk Group’s privacy practices, please contact us by email at
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
, or at:
Zendesk, Inc.
Attn: Privacy Team
181 Fremont Stree
San Francisco, CA 94105, United States
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF,  we commit to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF,  the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
here
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
10. Supplemental Terms for California Residents
Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”), this Section 10 applies to certain personal data collected about California individuals where Zendesk controls how and why the personal data is processed (which the CCPA calls a “business”) and supplements the rest of our Notice above. This Section 10 does not apply to current or former employees, applicants, contractors, or agents.
a. Additional Data Processing Disclosures:
The below table provides the categories of personal data we have sold, shared, or disclosed to third parties, as defined by the California Privacy Rights Act. For reference, the table in
Section 2
provides the categories of personal data collected and our disclosures of personal data.
Categories of Personal Data We Collect
California Privacy Rights Act Details: Categories of Third Parties to Whom Personal Data is “Sold or Shared”
Identifiers
, such as your name, email address, postal address, phone number, and device identifiers (e.g., advertising identifiers and IP address).
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Business partners who we partner with to jointly market or sell our products and Services, such as channel partners.
Commercial information
, including preferences, such as purchasing history or tendencies and transactional information, such as banking information.
Not applicable
Internet or other electronic network activity information and device information
, such as your browsing history, search history, device information, and other information (whether passive browsing or active engagement) regarding your interactions with us and use of our products, Services, emails, and other Digital Properties.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Geolocation information
, such as approximate location based on your IP address, mobile device location, or information you provide to us (such as city and state you provide through a webform). You may be able to control collection of this data through the settings of your device.
Companies that operate Cookies and Tracking Technologies, described in
Section 5
, such as marketing and advertising partners.
Audio, electronic, visual, and other sensory information
, such as CCTV recordings of our premises (e.g., if you visit our offices); recordings of your interactions with our sales or advocacy teams (e.g., for quality assurance or training purposes, in accordance with applicable laws); or customer support chat or messaging logs.
Not applicable
Inferences as defined by California law
, such as marketing you are likely to positively react to.
Not applicable
Sensitive Personal Data
, such as proof of vaccination or race and ethnicity (optional) (where permissible under applicable law).
Not applicable
Although we have not “sold” or “shared” personal data for money in the past 12 months, we engage in routine practices with our Digital Properties involving third parties that could be considered a “sale” or “sharing” as defined under California law. We do not knowingly sell or share any personal data of minors under the age of 16. We do not collect or process “sensitive personal information,” as defined by California law, to infer characteristics about you. Zendesk only uses sensitive personal information consistent with the exceptions to the right to limit sensitive personal information.
Financial Incentives
: We may offer a benefit or offering in exchange for you providing personal data, such as a discount or coupon to individuals who respond to a survey. As part of these surveys we may collect personal data, such as your name, contact information, preferences, experiences, beliefs, opinions, and other responses to the survey questions. Participation in surveys is governed by the applicable terms and conditions for the survey, which will describe any financial incentives associated with that survey and how to participate. The value of your data is the value of the offer presented to you. We have calculated such value by using the expense related to the benefit. You may withdraw from any financial incentive at any time by emailing us at
privacy@zendesk.com
. If we offer another type of financial incentive, we will share with you the material terms of each offer when we ask you to participate.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Subject to legal limitations, certain California residents may have the below rights.
Right to Know.
You have the right to request information about the categories of personal data we have collected about you, the categories of sources from which we collected the personal data, the purposes for collecting the personal data, the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed your personal data, and the purpose for which we disclosed your personal data (“
Categories Report
”). You may also request information about the specific pieces of personal data we have collected about you (“
Specific Pieces Report
”).
Right to Delete.
You have the right to request that we delete personal data that we have collected from you.
Right to Correct.
You have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal data that we maintain about you.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing.
We do not sell personal data to third parties in exchange for money. However, as we explain in
Section 5
, we share information with advertising partners and allow advertising partners to collect information from our Digital Properties. This exchange may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” under California law, and you have the right to opt out of this “sale” or “sharing” of personal data.
California residents may request to exercise the Right to Know, the Right to Delete, and the Right to Correct by using our
webform
. We will not discriminate against you, in any manner prohibited by applicable law, for exercising these rights.
How to Fully Exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing:
In order to fully exercise the Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing with respect to any “sale” or “sharing” of information, you must undertake both of the following steps:
Submit a Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request using our
webform
; and
Disable the use of advertising cookies and other tracking technologies by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link in our website footer. You must complete this step on each of our Sites from each browser and on each device that you use. These steps are necessary so that we can place a first-party cookie signaling that you have opted out on each browser and each device you use.
If you block cookies, we will be unable to comply with your Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing request for device data that we automatically collect and disclose to third parties online using cookies, pixels, and other tracking technologies. If you clear the cookies in your browser, you will need to follow Step 2 above again. To the extent required by California law, we will honor “Do Not Sell or Share” opt-out preference signals sent in a format commonly-used and recognized by businesses at the browser level, such as an HTTP header field or JavaScript object.
Verification:
To process California data protection requests, we will need to obtain information to locate you in our records or verify your identity, depending on the nature of the request. In most cases, we will request information about you, which may include your name, email address, or other information. If you submit a Right to Know “Specific Pieces Report,” we may also request a signed declaration, under penalty of perjury, that you are who you say you are. We may request alternative information under certain circumstances and/or use third parties to help verify your identity.
Authorized Agents:
Authorized agents may exercise California data protection rights on behalf of California individuals, but we reserve the right to verify the individual’s identity directly as described above. Authorized agents must contact us by submitting a request through our
webform
and indicate that they are submitting the request as an agent. We may require the agent to demonstrate authority to act on your behalf by providing signed permission from you. We may also require you to verify your own identity directly with us or to directly confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Timing:
We will process Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing requests within fifteen business days from the date we received the request. We will respond to Requests to Delete and Requests to Know within forty-five days unless we need more time, in which case we will notify you, and it may take up to ninety days to respond to your request.
11. Supplemental Information for the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K.
The following terms supplement the Notice with respect to our processing of EEA (i.e., European Union Member States, Iceland, Liechtenstein, and Norway), Swiss, and U.K. personal data. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between the other parts of the Notice and the terms of this Section 11, Section 11 shall govern and prevail with regard to the processing of EEA, Swiss, and U.K. Personal Data, to the extent applicable.
Data Controller:
The Zendesk entity with which you have a primary relationship (such as the entity that concluded the Services contract with you; the entity that has provided you with marketing materials and promotional communications; or the primary entity in the region where you access our Site) is the controller within the scope of this Notice. In the majority of cases, this will be Zendesk, Inc., unless we specifically inform you otherwise.
a. Legal Basis for Processing:
Please see
Section 3
for the legal basis on which we rely for the collection, processing, and use of personal data.
b. Your Data Protection Rights:
Under applicable data protection laws, you may exercise certain rights regarding your personal data:
Right to Access.
You have the right to obtain confirmation from us whether we are processing your personal data and related information, as well as the right to obtain a copy of your personal data undergoing processing.
Right to Data Portability.
You may receive your personal data, that you have provided to us, in a structured, commonly-used, and machine-readable format, and you may have the right to transmit it to other data controllers without hindrance. This right only exists if the processing is based on your consent or a contract, and the processing is carried out by automated means.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to request the rectification of inaccurate personal data and to have incomplete data completed.
Right to Objection.
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Restrict Processing.
You may request that we restrict the processing of your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Erasure.
You may request that we erase your personal data in certain cases.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
You have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we commit to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of  the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF,  the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Right to Refuse or Withdraw Consent.
In case we ask for your consent to process your personal data, you are free to refuse to give it. If you have given your consent, you may withdraw it at any time without any adverse consequences. The lawfulness of any processing of your personal data that occurred prior to the withdrawal of your consent will not be affected.
Right to Not Be Subject to Automated Decision-making.
The types of automated decision-making referred to in Article 22(1) and (4) EU/UK General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) do not take place in connection with your personal data. Should this change, we will inform you about why and how any such decision was made, the significance of it, and the possible consequences of it. You will also have the right to human intervention, to express your point of view, and to contest the decision.
You may exercise these rights by contacting us using the details provided in
Section 9
above. Please note that we may refuse to act on requests to exercise data protection rights in certain cases, such as where providing access might infringe someone else’s privacy rights or impact our legal obligations.
c. International Transfers of Personal Data:
Due to the global nature of our operations, some of the recipients mentioned in
Section 2
of the Notice may be located in countries outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the U.K., which do not provide an adequate level of data protection as defined by data protection laws in the EEA, Switzerland, and the U.K. Transfers within the Zendesk Group or to third parties located in such third countries take place using a valid data transfer mechanism, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses and/or the U.K. Addendum to such clauses, approved Binding Corporate Rules, approved codes of conduct and certifications mechanisms, on the basis of permissible statutory derogations, or any other valid data transfer mechanism issued or approved by the EEA, Swiss, or U.K. authorities. More information on (including a copy of) our Binding Corporate Rules is available
here
, and evidence of our Binding Corporate Rules approval is available on the European Data Protection Board’s website
here
. Certain third countries have been officially recognized by the EEA, Swiss, and U.K. authorities as providing an adequate level of protection and no further safeguards are necessary. Please reach out to us using the contact information in
Section 9
above, if you wish to receive further information about how we transfer personal data or, where available, a copy of the relevant data transfer mechanism.
Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (collectively, the “Principles”).  Zendesk, Inc. FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc.  have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Zendesk, Inc. FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  For complaints regarding EU-U.S. DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, you have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration. Further information can be found on the official DPF website:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In the context of onward transfers, Zendesk is accountable for the processing of personal data it receives under the Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. Zendesk remains liable under the Principles if Zendesk’s agent processes personal data in a manner inconsistent with the Principles, unless Zendesk proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to damage.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Zendesk, Inc., FutureSimple Inc., and Smooch Technologies US Inc. compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
Data Protection Officer:
The contact details for our data protection officer are as follows: Zendesk, Inc., Attn: Privacy Team and DPO, 181 Fremont Street, San Francisco, CA 94105, United States,
euprivacy@zendesk.com
or
privacy@zendesk.com
.
12. Supplemental Information for Other Regions
Australia:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Commonwealth) and the Australia Privacy Principles. If you are dissatisfied with our handling of a complaint or do not agree with the resolution proposed by us, you may make a complaint to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”) by contacting the OAIC using the methods listed on
their website
. Alternatively, you may request that we pass on the details of your complaint to the OAIC directly.
Brazil:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“
LGPD
”). Those individuals who use or access our Sites or Services expressly consent to the collection, use, storage, and processing of their personal data by us for the purposes described in this Notice.
Canada:
Personal data, as defined in the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“
PIPEDA
”) will be collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under PIPEDA.
Japan:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with Japan’s Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“
APPI
”).
Nevada:
We do not presently sell personal data as defined under Nevada law. If you are a Nevada resident, you may nevertheless email us using the information above to exercise your right to opt-out of sale under Nevada Revised Statutes §603A et seq.
New Zealand:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with New Zealand’s Privacy Act 2020 and its 13 Information Privacy Principles (“
NZ IPPs
”).
Singapore:
Personal data collected, stored, used and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“
PDPA
”).
United Kingdom:
Personal data collected, stored, used, and/or processed by the Zendesk Group, as described in this Privacy Notice, is collected, stored, used, and/or processed in accordance with the Zendesk Group’s obligations under the UK Data Protection Act 2018, as amended by the Data Protection, Privacy and Electronic Communications (Amendments etc.) (EU Exit) Regulations 2019, as amended, superseded or replaced (“
U.K. GDPR
”).
13. English Version Controls
Non-English translations of this notice are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
14. Zendesk, Inc. Affiliates
Zendesk, Inc.; Zendesk Brasil Software Corporativo Ltda; Zendesk UK Limited; Zendesk International Limited; Zendesk APS; Zendesk Pty., Ltd; Kabushiki Kaisha Zendesk; Zendesk Incorporated; Zendesk GmbH; Zendesk Singapore Pte. Ltd.; Zendesk France SAS; Base sp. z o. o. (Base spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością); Zendesk Technologies Private Limited; FutureSimple Inc.; Zendesk Korea LLC; Smooch Technologies ULC; Cleverly, Unipessoal, LDA.; ZD Sub Holdings (U.S.); Zendesk Sweden AB.; Smooch Technologies US Inc. (U.S.); Zendesk S. de R.L. de C.V. (Mexico); Zendesk Technologies Spain S.L. (Spain); Zoro TopCo, LP; Zendesk Netherlands B.V.; Zendesk Italy S.r.l.; Tymeshift Inc; Tymeshift doo Novi Sad; Tymeshift Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Sub-policy 4
https://support.zendesk.com/hc/en-us/articles/360022366953-Complying-with-Privacy-and-Data-Protection-Law-in-Zendesk-products:
Home
Product guides
Managing people
Complying with privacy and data protection law
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection Law in Zendesk products
Follow
Follow
Charles Nadeau
Zendesk Documentation Team
Edited Feb 26, 2025
This guide describes how certain features and functionality in Zendesk
                        products can assist with your obligations under privacy law, for example, as
                        a
data controller
under the General Data Protection Regulation
                        (GDPR), or as a
business
under the California Consumer Privacy Act
                        (CCPA). Zendesk is considered a third-party
data processor
under the
                        GDPR, and a
service provider
under the CCPA, because it handles the
                        personal data or personal information of its customers' end users on behalf
                        of its customers (or subscribers).
Data controllers and businesses bear the primary responsibility for ensuring that
                        their processing of personal data is compliant with relevant data protection
                        law.
See the following articles in this guide:
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk Support
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in Zendesk Insights
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in Zendesk Guide
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in Zendesk Chat
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in standalone Chat accounts
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in Zendesk Talk
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law  in Zendesk Explore
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk Bime
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk Sell
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk Sunshine
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk Sunshine
                                Conversations
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk WFM (Tymeshift)
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in Zendesk QA (Klaus)
Complying with Privacy and
                                        Data Protection Law in AI agents - Advanced
                                        (Ultimate)
For instructions on deleting a user's personal data in Zendesk products, see
Forgetting a user in
                        Zendesk
.
For more information on privacy law and Zendesk, see our
Privacy and Data Protection
website.
What is personal data
Personal data, or personal information, is any data that can be used to identify an individual.
                Examples include an email address, a phone number, or a social security number.
                Personal data may also include any data that could be used indirectly to identify an
                individual. For example, a person's nickname such as "Gerry" may not be personal
                data because many people may have the same nickname. However, if the nickname can be
                combined with other data such as a work address, the nickname could be considered
                personal data because it helps identify the individual.
Your organization needs to decide what personal data is. Is it simply an email address or phone
                number, or do you further disambiguate using a combination of identities or
                attributes? This decision is up to you.
If you’re unsure whether or not a piece of information is personal data, it’s best to err on the
                side of caution. Another option is to seek legal advice.
Common terms
The following terms are sometimes used in this document.
Soft delete
Soft deleting
an item deletes the item such that it is not visible
                                to any users, including admins using either the product interface or
                                the API. The item is still in the Zendesk database and accessible by
                                Zendesk on a limited basis only to its employees with certain
                                database privileges. Soft deleted tickets are automatically
                                permanently deleted after 30 days.
Hard delete, permanently delete, scrub
Hard deleting
or
scrubbing
an item permanently deletes the
                                item. The item is completely removed from the Zendesk database. No
                                one, including Zendesk employees with database privileges, can
                                access the item any longer.
4
0
0 comments
Date
Article is closed for comments.
ADDITIONAL CONTENT
Related articles
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection Law in Zendesk Support
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection Law in Zendesk Chat
Zendesk AI Data Use Information
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection Law in AI agents - Advanced (Ultimate)
Complying with Privacy and Data Protection Law in Zendesk QA (Klaus)
We use cookies to provide visitors with the best possible experience on our website. These include analytics, functionality, and targeting cookies, which may also be used in our marketing efforts. Click the 'Accept All' button to agree to the use of cookies or click 'Cookie Settings' to manage your preferences. To opt out of non-essential cookies, click 'Reject All'.
Cookie Notice
Cookie settings
Reject all
Accept all
Privacy Preference Center
Zendesk uses web cookies to collect information about you when you visit our Site. This information might be about you, your preferences, or your device. At Zendesk, we may use this information for purposes that include ensuring basic functionality of our Sites; remembering user preferences, including your cookie preferences; measuring the effectiveness of our Sites, marketing campaigns, and email communications; and personalizing online content.
Please review the different category headings below to learn more and adjust the cookie settings on your current device. Please note that you will need to ensure that each web browser is adjusted to reflect your preferences if you use different computers or mobile devices.
For more information about how Zendesk uses web cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
Essential cookies enable core site functionality. These cookies are necessary for the Site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. You may set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but parts of the website may not function properly.
View Vendor Details‎
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies enable the Site to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. These cookies may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we have added to our Site.
View Vendor Details‎
Analytics Cookies
Analytics cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Site. These cookies help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the Site.
View Vendor Details‎
Targeting Cookies
Targeting cookies, such as social media cookies, may be set through our Site by our advertising service providers, third-party advertisers, ad networks, or data exchange partners. These cookies may be used to show you relevant advertising on other third-party sites.
View Vendor Details‎
Back Button
Vendors List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://www.airship.com/legal/privacy/:
Legal
Legal
›
Airship Corporate
›
Privacy Statement
Airship Corporate
Website Terms of Use
Privacy Statement
California Privacy Rights Notice
California Employee and Candidate Privacy Notice
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
Airship Products and Services
Terms of Subscription Service
Support Services Description
Acceptable Use Policy
Definition of Billing Metrics
Data Retention Schedule
Terms of Subscription Service – Gummicube ASO Services
Conditions Générales de Vente – Accengage
Global Data Privacy & Security
Global Data Privacy
Airship Data Processing Addendum
New SCCs DPA Amendment
Airship Subprocessors
Security Measures
Full Disclosure Security Policy
Airship Intellectual Property
Trademark and Patent Notice
Effective as of January 15, 2025 —
Previous Version
Please note that this Privacy Statement has been updated to reflect our new headquarters address. There have been no substantive changes to the terms or our practices regarding the handling of your personal information.
Airship Group, Inc. and its affiliates, including, Apptimize, LLC., Urban Airship UK Ltd., Urban Airship Germany GmbH, Airship France SAS, Airship Business France SAS, Urban Airship India Private Ltd., and Airship Global Pte. Ltd. (collectively, “Airship,” “we” or “us”) offers mobile and customer engagement platforms through the Airship Service, the Apptimize Service and the Gummicube ASO Services, (collectively referred to as the “Airship Platform”). Airship is committed to protecting the privacy of Personal Information you provide to us, and applies the Privacy by Design and Data Protection by Default principles across our Airship Platform product enhancement, development, and operations.
When referring to “Personal Information” in this Statement, we mean information that personally identifies (e.g. your name, email address, device information, IP Address) an individual or other data that relates to or could be reasonably linked to such information. Accordingly, Airship informs you via this privacy and information practices statement about our information practices, the kinds of information we collect, how we intend to use and share that information, and the rights you have with respect to the processing of such information by us, (“Privacy Statement”).
1. What this Privacy Statement covers
1.1 Scope of this Privacy Statement
This Privacy Statement applies to Personal Information that we collect when you: (i) visit websites we operate and that link to this Privacy Statement, including
www.airship.com
,
https://www.airship.com/de/home/
,
www.airship.com/fr/
,
https://go.airship.com/accounts/register/plan/starter/
,
https://go.airship.com/accounts/login/
,
www.gummicube.com
, and
www.apptimize.com
(the “Sites”); (ii) use our training and testing versions of the Airship Platform for mobile or software applications, mobile wallet passes, or any other software applications made available by us for use on or through computers and mobile devices that link to this Privacy Statement; (iii) download or otherwise engage with content and publications such as viewing videos, reading content our Site, interact with our chat bot, or visit our branded social media pages; (iv) visit our offices; (v) receive communications from us, including emails, phone calls or texts; (vi) register for, attend and/or otherwise take part in our events, webinars or contests; (vii) participate in recorded meetings; (viii) submit a job application to us; (ix) submit information to us in connection with a potential business relationship with us; (x) register to use the Airship Platform as an authorized user (for example, as an employee of one of our customers who provided you with login access to the Airship Platform) (which is referred to in this Statement as “Account Information”); (xi) contact us for support or information; or (xii) work at partners or suppliers of Airship and interact with Airship in the course of doing business or contemplating a potential business relationship with us. This Privacy Statement also applies to our recruitment practices. However, for California job candidates and Airship employees, then
Airship’s California Employee Privacy Notice
applies to you and describes how we collect and use Personal Information about you during and after candidacy, job application, and your employment with us. In addition, for Singapore job candidates and Airship employees,
Airship’s Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
applies to you and describes how we collect and use Personal Information about you during and after candidacy, job application, and your employment with us. In this Privacy Statement, the terms Sites and Airship Platform collectively are referred to as the “Services”. “You” refers to any individual who visits or uses the Services.
1.2 Controller for processing within the scope of this Privacy Statement
Airship is the data controller for the data processing within the scope of this Privacy Statement. This means that as a data controller we determine the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Information for our marketing and business purposes, as further described below in this Privacy Statement.
1.3 Out of Scope of this Privacy Statement
Except as provided with respect to Account Information as described in Section 1.1. (Scope of this Privacy Statement) above, this Privacy Statement  does not apply to our security and privacy practices concerning the Personal Information we receive and process on behalf of our customers through the Airship Platform). In this capacity, Airship processes Personal Information of people who interact with customer applications or websites that are offered by Airship’s customers and that have incorporated the Airship Platform. As such, Airship acts in the role of a data processor or service provider on behalf of our customers, and our security and privacy commitments are detailed in and governed by our agreements with our customers, including the
Terms of Subscription Service
, the
Airship Data Processing Addendum
entered into with such customers,or such other applicable agreement entered into between our customer and Airship and that is related to our customer’s access to and use of the Airship Platform. This Privacy Statement does not cover any Personal Information that our customers choose to collect and share with Airship, where Airship is not the Data Controller, but is instead the Data Processor. For privacy information related to our customers’ uses of the Airship Platform in connection with their mobile applications, websites, emails, texts or other digital properties, please reach out to the respective customer directly.
In addition, the Services may contain links to other third party websites. The privacy statements and policies of such third party websites govern their respective privacy and security practices as provided in Section 12 of this Privacy Statement.
California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
here. Our California Privacy Notice applies to Personal Information we collect and process about California residents in operating our business in circumstances where Airship controls how and why the Personal Information is processed.
2. What Personal Information does Airship collect?
The Personal Information we collect will be determined by the type of interaction you have with Airship, as described in further detail in the following categories:
2.1 Personal Information we collect directly.
Site usage.
When you use the Services or fill out forms on our Site, we may provide you with opportunities to sign up to receive specific information or Services, download content, register for an online or in-person event or webinar, or attend an online or in-person event or webinar for marketing purposes, and we ask for your contact information. Personal Information we collect is, is: name, title, company name, industry, company address, phone number,email address, country, downloads and engagement with Airship content and other publications, marketing subscription status, communications that we exchange with you including when you contact us with questions or feedback, through online web portals, emails, our chat features, social media, or online assessments or survey participation. Our sites use cookies and other technologies, and as a result we also collect information as described in
Section 5
(What device and usage data does Airship process?) below as well as internet connection data transmitted by your browser, meaning your IP address or proxy server, your browser (type/version), your operating system, date and time of your inquiry, websites from which your system accesses our website (Referrer-URL) and hostname of the accessing computer, location, internet service provider and / or mobile carrier, pages and files viewed, exchanges through our chat features, searches, and date/ time stamps associated with your usage. When activating or installing updates to our mobile applications or mobile wallet passes, we collect information about your device (manufacturer, model, IP address), or information about the application such as the version, date of activation, successful or unsuccessful updates.
Registering for and attending a meeting or an event.
If you register to attend a meeting (whether in person or virtually) in connection with entering into a contract with Airship or one of its third party partners or in the course of an already existing contractual relationship, we ask for your contact information (name and email address), job title, employer, and retain copies of meeting audio and video recording in accordance with our Corporate Data Retention Policy and based on your consent to participate in a recorded meeting. If you attend an event, we, with your consent, scan your attendee badge which will provide us with your information, such as name, title, company name, address, country, phone number, email address, industry, and record of event attendance.
Your communications with us.
We collect your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, job title, marketing subscription status, and information regarding your engagement with Airship content and other publications, communications that we exchange with you through online web portals, emails, our chat features, or social media when you request information about our Services, register for our newsletter, download or otherwise engage with our content and publications, request customer or technical support, or otherwise communicate with us.
Account Information for Airship Platform.
If you register to use the Airship Platform as an authorized user or sign up for a free account, we collect your name, email address, IP address, company name, job title, and website name or information.
Surveys.
If we may contact you to participate in surveys and you decide to participate, you will be asked to provide your name, email address, employer, job title and other contact information..
Social media content.
We maintain publicly accessible Airship social media sites (“Company Social Media Webpages”) on various social media platforms, i.e. Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, Soundcloud, Slideshare. We offer forums, blogs, and content on such Company Social Media Webpages. Any content you provide on these channels will be considered “public” and provided voluntarily.
The individual processing of Personal Information by the respective social media platform providers differ. It is likely that, in addition to the storage of Personal Information specifically provided by you on the Company Social Media Webpages, the social media platform provider will also process further information. Additional information as to data transfers for social media platform providers is available below in Section 6 (International data transfers) below. For details about the collection and storage of your Personal Information as well as the type, scope and purpose of their use by a social media platform providing the Company Social Media Webpage, please refer to the respective platform’s privacy policy:
The privacy policy for Facebook, which is operated by Meta Platforms, Inc. can be found at
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy
.
The privacy policy for LinkedIn, which is operated by LinkedIn Inc., can be found at
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
The privacy policy for Twitter, which is operated by Twitter, Inc. can be found at
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
.
The privacy policy for SoundCloud, which is operated by SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG, can be found at
https://soundcloud.com/pages/privacy
.
The privacy policy for Slideshare, which is operated by Scribd, Inc., can be found at
https://support.scribd.com/hc/en-us/articles/210129366-Privacy-Policy
.
In the following, we set out our own processing activities regarding your visit to the Company Social Media Webpages. Based on the type of Personal Information processed, we explain for which purposes and on which legal basis we process your Personal Information.
Visiting our Company Social Media Webpages
When you visit our Company Social Media Webpages, your Personal Information is also collected, used and stored by the providers of the respective social media platform. This may happen even if you do not have a profile in the respective social media platform. If you are logged in with your personal user account of the respective social media platform while visiting this Company Social Media Webpage, the respective social media platform provider can link the visit to your account. If you do not wish such a linking to occur, you must log out of your account before visiting our Company Social Media Webpage and delete the cookies if necessary. You can find details in the privacy policies of the respective social media platform providers linked above.
As the owner of the Company Social Media Webpage, we can view the information stored in your respective public profile when you visit our Company Social Media Webpage. However, we can only do this if you have such a profile on the relevant social media platform and are logged in to it when you access our respective Company Social Media Webpage. Accordingly, you can also visit our Company Social Media Webpage without us having access to the aforementioned information. If we view the information stored in your public profile, we do so in order to be able to offer you and the rest of our target group the most interesting content possible related to the Services.
In addition, the social media platforms providers share with us anonymous usage statistics, which we use to improve the user experience for visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage. However, we do not have access to the usage data (Personal Information) that the social media platform providers collect to compile these statistics. The social media platform providers are therefore always to be considered as the data controller with regard to the processing of this data.
Our own data processing in connection with our social media profiles serves and is based on our (and your) legitimate interest (legal basis) in improving the user experience when visiting the respective Company Social Media Webpage.
Contact via the messenger of a social media feature
If you communicate with us via a messenger functionality of a social media platform or contact us by linking in your own posts or by reacting (e.g. likes or comments) to one of our posts, we process the following Personal Information in connection with this:
your respective profile name
your first and last name, insofar as this is publicly visible
if applicable, further information stored as public in your profile
your message or the statement of your post or your reaction
the date and time of your interaction
information on whether you are already a customer or possibly interested in our Services.
Furthermore, when contacting us via messenger functionality of a social media platform, you can voluntarily provide additional information that you believe is necessary to process your request.
If your contact contains a request, we process the Personal Information listed here above to process your request and the associated technical administration and also store it in the event that follow-up questions arise. Otherwise, we only process the aforementioned Personal Information to understand whether visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage like our content.
The processing of the aforementioned Personal Information takes place if you express interest in our products on the basis of contractual necessity, i.e. in the initiation of a contractual relationship. Otherwise, it takes place on the basis of mutual interest in good support for visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage and is therefore based on our legitimate interest (legal basis).
There is no obligation to provide the aforementioned Personal Information, but it is not possible for us to process requests or for you to interact with us without it.
Registration for sweepstakes or contests.
We may run sweepstakes and contests. Contact information you provide is used to reach you about the sweepstakes or contest and for other promotional, marketing and business purposes, if permitted by law. In some jurisdictions, we are required to publicly share information of winners.
Visiting our offices.
If you visit our offices, you are required to register as a visitor and provide your name, email address, phone number, company name and time and date of arrival.
Employment applications.
We collect your Personal Information from you such as name, email address, phone number, mailing address, job title, CV/resume and work history, education, interests, professional references, and information regarding your engagement with Airship content and other publications, communications that we exchange with you through online web portals, emails, our chat features, or social media when you request information about our job posting, apply for a job or engage with a job posting, or otherwise communicate with us. For more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about California job candidates and Airship employees, please refer to our
Job Applicant
and
Employee Privacy Notice for California Residents
which applies to all California residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship. Furthermore, for information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about Singapore job candidates and Airship employees, please refer to our
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
which applies to all Singapore residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
2.2 Personal Information collected from others.
Information from Other Sources.
We may also receive other information including your Personal Information from service providers, from joint marketing partners, or from publicly available information such as public databases and social media platforms. In particular, we collect the following Personal Information from such other sources: contact information, including mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), information regarding your business use case for our Services, IP addresses, social media profiles including LinkedIn URLs, and custom profiles for purposes of targeted advertising, delivering relevant email content regarding our Services, event promotion, determining eligibility and verifying contact information. When acquiring information from third parties, we will obtain contractual or other legally compliant commitments from the third parties that the information was acquired lawfully and with the appropriate level of consent.
Billing Information.
Through our third-party billing and payment processors, and to the extent we charge you a fee for the Services, we may collect billing, payment, and contract related information from you if you are a business representative of one of our customers. Personal Information collected for billing, payment and contract related purposes is name, title, company name, company address, phone number or email address, country, and payment related information such as accounts.
Under certain circumstances, the credit or debit card or other payment method information you provide in this context may be transmitted by the payment processor. Our payment processor provider is Stripe, Inc. The purpose of this transmission is to process the payment made on an invoice due to us for our Services. The payment processor’s terms and conditions and data protection terms entered into by Airship with the payment processor as our data processor or service provider apply to such payment transactions..
3. How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?
We use Personal Information that we collect about you or that you provide to us for a range of different business purposes. Depending on how you interact with us, we and our third-party service providers use Personal Information in a variety of ways, including:
3.1 Providing information and Services you requested.
We use the Personal Information about you to fulfill requests for programs, Services, or information that you may request such as information about potential or future Services, namely to: (a) generally manage your information and accounts; (b) respond to questions, comments and requests; (c) provide access to certain areas and features of the Services; (d) link or combine information we get from others to help understand your needs and provide you with better Services; and (e) allow you to register for events, participate in a contest or promotion, post in a forum or participate in webinars, and provide related information and communications.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Performance of a contract, e.g. when we provide you with Services, or communicate with you about them. This includes when we use your Personal Information to process Orders or payments orders, or deliver the Services you requested;
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to process your request, and further (to the extent our interests also prevail in this regard) to improve our Services, to detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly to provide you with advertising based on the interests you indicate to us; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a link or by combining information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
3.2 To fulfill a contract or take steps linked to a contract.
This is relevant when you register for or subscribe to the Airship Platform. We use the Personal Information about you to take steps to enter into a contract or to fulfill the obligations of a contract to which you are a party, namely: (a) to fulfill your and prospective customers’ requests related to the Airship Platform or other products that you have requested; (b) to provide you with the Airship Platform for which you have registered; (c) perform internal quality control; (d) to provide, maintain, and improve our Services; (e) verify identity; (f) send communications regarding the Services, your account, or any changes to any Airship policy or terms of use; (g) process payments; (h) provide technical and customer support; and (i) enforce our Terms of Use, Acceptable Use Policy or other agreement entered into with you.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Performance of a contract, e.g. when we provide you with Services, or communicate with you about them. This includes when we use your Personal Information to process orders, deliver Services, and process payments; or
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to fulfill our contractual obligations, and further (to the extent our interests prevail in this regard) to improve our Services.
3.3 Marketing products and services.
We use Personal Information about you, in most cases with your prior consent, to provide you with materials about offers, products and services offered by us, including new content or information about future services. We provide you with these materials by phone, postal mail, text or email, as permitted by applicable law. Such uses include: (a) to tailor content, advertisements, and offers; (b) to notify you about offers, products, and services that may be of interest to you; (c) measure interest in the Services; (d) process and deliver contest entries and rewards; (e) monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities in connection with our Services; or (f) for other purposes disclosed at the time that you provide Personal Information;. If you do not wish us to use your Personal Information for marketing purposes, you may contact us at any time to opt out of the use of your Personal Information for such purposes, as further described below in Section 11 (Your Privacy Rights).
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) to improve our Services, to detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly to provide you with interest-based advertising; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you, e.g. link or combine information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop the processing of your data for that purpose.
3.4 Research and development.
We use your Personal Information to create de-identified information that we use alone or in the aggregate with information obtained from other sources, in order to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services,develop new products, processes and services, or develop content related to industry trends and market reports and analyses. De-identified or aggregated information is used for a variety of functions, including the measurement of visitors’ interest in and use of various portions or features of the Services, and usage trends for mobile applications and websites. After this process of de-identification, de-identified or aggregated information is not Personal Information, does not identify you or any individual, and we use such information in a number of ways, including research, internal analysis, analytics, benchmark or industry reports, and any other legally permissible purposes. We share this information internally within Airship and with our customers or partners for our or their purposes in a de-identified or aggregated form that is designed to prevent anyone from identifying you.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) to improve our Services; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a link, contract, or by combined information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
3.5 Recruitment and employment.
Based on your interest in a role with Airship, we use Personal Information within the recruitment and job application process for the assessment of your application and, if an employment relationship is established, also for the execution of the employment relationship.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
The performance of a contact (e.g. in entering in an employment agreement with you).
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) in recruiting, employment, and responding to any potential legal claims.
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a job application link or post, contract, or by combined information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
Compliance with a legal obligation when we use your Personal Information to comply with laws, including local labor and employment laws.
For California residents, more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about California job candidates and Airship employees is available in our Job Applicant and Employee Privacy Notice for California Residents which applies to all California residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
For Singapore residents, more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about Singapore job candidates and Airship employees is available in our
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
which applies to all Singapore residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
3.6 Public content.
If you post any content to our website forums or social media accounts, we publish this content and make it generally available to any user or visitor of our website or Company Social Media Webpages.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Your consent to publish your content when you decide to post it on our website forums or Company Social Media Webpages. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose; or
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to provide you with the requested information, when we detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly when we provide you with interest-based advertising, and further (to the extent our interests also prevail in this regard) to improve our Services.
3.7 Complying with legal obligations.
As permitted by local laws, we use your Personal Information when cooperating with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our legal obligation under applicable laws to protect our rights or as necessary to protect against misuse or abuse of our Sites or Services, prevent potentially prohibited or illegal activities and fraud, promote safety and security of the Services and in protecting our rights and the rights of others, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, complying with judicial proceedings, court orders or legal processes or to respond to lawful requests.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Compliance with a legal obligation when we use your Personal Information to comply with laws. For instance, we collect customer place of establishment and bank account information for identity verification purposes.
4. With whom does Airship share Personal Information?
We disclose your information to third parties only as necessary to carry out your request, for a variety of our professional or legitimate business purposes, including to provide our Services, to protect us or others, in the event of a major business transaction such as a merger, sale, or asset transfer, as described below, or as otherwise required or permitted by law. Where we do transfer your Personal Information to third parties or service providers, appropriate safeguards will be in place in order to ensure correct and secure data processing in compliance with applicable data protection law.
4.1 Disclosures to provide our Services.
Service Providers.
Airship may share Personal Information with our service providers that we have retained to perform services on our behalf for business purposes and to support our internal operations including (i) provision of IT, hosting, backup, storage, and related services; (ii) provision of information and Services you have requested; (iii) payment processing and to collect amounts owed to Airship; (iv) customer service activities; (v) recruitment activities and job postings; and (vi) professional advisors including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers. These third-party service providers may have access to or process your Personal Information for the purpose of providing these services for us. Payment information will be used and shared only to effectuate your order and may be stored by a service provider for purposes of future orders. Airship has executed appropriate contracts with our service providers that prohibit service providers from using or sharing your Personal Information except as necessary to perform the contracted services on our behalf or to comply with applicable legal requirements. We retain control over the Personal Information in question and remain the data controller.
Business Partners.
From time to time, Airship may partner with other companies to jointly offer products, services or programs (such as webinars, events or downloadable content). If you purchase, specifically express interest in, or register for a jointly-offered product, service or program from or through Airship, we may share your Personal Information with our business partners. We also share your Personal Data with technology and solution partners in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development and account management. In such instances, our partner will process the relevant Personal Data as a separate data controller and the partner’s use and control over your Personal Data will be governed by their privacy policy. If you do not wish for your Personal Information to be shared in this manner, you may opt not to purchase or to specifically express interest in a jointly-offered product service, or program, or you may otherwise opt-out through any mechanism offered at the time the Personal Information is collected.
Affiliates.
We may share Personal Information with our affiliated companies including from other countries in which the Airship Group has operations in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development, recruiting, operations, account management, events or webinars, for general business purposes, in order to protect, exercise, establish or defend legal rights, where we are legally required to do so and to receive professional advice. Unless there is an adequacy decision by the European Commission for the respective third country outside the European Economic Area, such sharing is carried out on the basis that the transfer is necessary for the performance of a contract.
Advertising Partners.
Through our Sites, we may allow third-party advertising partners to set technologies and other tracking tools to collect information regarding your activities and your device ( your IP address, mobile identifiers, page(s) visited, location, time of day). Subject to the legal bases described in Section 3 (How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?) above, we may also combine and share such information and other information (such as demographic information and past purchase history) with third-party advertising partners. These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements regarding our Services to you when you visit third-party websites within their networks. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “online behavioral advertising.” We may allow access to other data collected by the Sites to share information that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest to you based on the interest you indicated via our Sites. Please refer to Section 5 (What device and usage data does Airship process?) below for more information on how these technologies and tracking tools work. If you prefer not to share your Personal Information with third-party advertising partners, you may follow the instructions in Section 11 (Your privacy rights. ) below. For California Residents, additional information is available in our
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
4.2 Disclosures to protect us or others.
Protection of Airship and others.
We may disclose Personal Information about you when we have a good faith belief that we are required to provide information: (a) if we are required to do so by law, court order or legal process; (b) in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements (but only in accordance with Airship’s Policy on Response to Public Authority Requests for Personal Data); (c) under the discovery process in litigation; (d) to enforce Airship policies or contracts; (e) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity; or (f) if we, believe that disclosure is otherwise necessary or advisable. In addition, from time to time, server logs and other systems may be reviewed for security purposes (e.g., to detect unauthorized activity on the Services). In such cases, records containing Personal Information may be shared with service providers, third parties and law enforcement bodies in order that they may prevent fraud or a security issue in accordance with the Airship Acceptable Use Policy and/or identify users in connection with their investigation of the unauthorized activities.
4.3 Disclosure in the event of merger, sale, or other asset transfers.
Business Transfers.
We reserve the right to disclose or transfer any Personal Information in the event of a proposed or actual purchase, any reorganization, sale, lease, merger, joint venture, assignment, amalgamation or any other type of acquisition, disposal or financing of all or any portion of our business or of any of the business assets or shares (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
5. What device and usage data does Airship process?
Like many companies, Airship uses services that employ cookies and other technologies to collect Personal Information (including the identifiers and internet activity information described here) about your use of our Sites or Services, which helps us to deliver to you improved Services performance, relevant information, or targeted ads. As part of this process, we use common information-gathering tools for collecting usage data, cookies, web beacons and similar technologies to automatically collect information that may contain Personal Information from your computer or mobile device as you navigate our Sites or use our Services.
5.1 Cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies in our Services.
As you navigate the Sites and use the Services, certain passive information is also collected through the use of cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to obtain certain information about your computer, device, browsing actions, and patterns. This includes IP addresses, cookie IDs, navigational data, content clicked, the name of the domain and host from which you access the Internet, the browser software you use and your operating system, your browser settings, your device type and similar information, the date and time you access our Services and other device identifiers. This type of information is used for the purposes of gathering data to provide improved administration of our Services and to improve the quality of your experience when interacting with our Services (see Your Privacy Rights section below for more information). If you consent to the use of cookies and web beacons when you navigate and use the Services, we will collect information through those tools.
Where your Personal Information is collected through these technologies by Airship as Controller, it will be processed in accordance with the provisions of this Privacy Statement.
Where third party technologies allow our partners to collect and process your Personal Information, we encourage you to review their privacy policy to see the terms and conditions under which your Personal Information will be processed by them. A link to these privacy policies is included for each of our partners in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement. For California residents, additional information is included in our
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
Cookies.
A cookie is a small text file that a website saves on your computer or mobile device when you visit the website. Cookies are then sent back to the originating website on each subsequent visit, or to another website that recognizes that cookie, to develop a record of the user’s online activity. When you visit our Sites, we or an authorized third party may place a cookie on your browser and/or device which collects information, including Personal Information, about your online activities over time and across different sites. Cookies allow us to track usage, determine your browsing preferences and improve and customize your browsing experience. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
(French version:
https://www.allaboutcookies.org/fr/
. German version:
https://www.allaboutcookies.org/ge/
).
We use both session-based and persistent cookies on our Sites. Session-based cookies exist only during one session and disappear from your computer when you close your browser or turn off your computer or device. Persistent cookies remain on your computer or device after you close or turn off. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, but choosing to disable cookies may limit your use of certain features or functions on our Services.
Types of cookies on our Sites:
Essential Cookies.
These cookies are necessary for the Sites to function and cannot be switched off. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the Sites, authentication cookies, and security cookies. These cookies also support certain features on the Sites, such as the live chat feature. Further description of the purposes of the essential cookies used in our Sites is available in the Cookies Settings at the bottom of this web page. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the Sites will then not work.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, session identifiers, browser and/or terminal information, browsing data and preferences (including your choice of cookies). The legal basis for the processing of this Personal Information is the legitimate interest of Airship in ensuring that the Sites function correctly to the preferences indicated by each user. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our partners authorized to deposit essential cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
Functional and Analytics Cookies.
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance and services on the Services. They enable us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Services. Functional cookies also enable us to improve how our Services function and to help us provide you with more relevant communications, including marketing communications. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around and use the Services. We may use our own technology or third-party technology to track and analyze usage information to provide enhanced interactions and more relevant communications and to enable certain features on the Services. We also use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting and other similar providers to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on some of our Services, and to develop website content. Further description of the purposes of the functional and analytics cookies used in our Services is available in the Cookies Settings at the bottom of this web page.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, browser and/or terminal information, navigational data and content clicked. The legal basis for processing this Personal Information is your prior consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each Functional and Analytics cookie. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our partners authorized to deposit functional and analytics cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
Marketing Cookies.
These cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a visitor’s interest, and to direct specific marketing to them. Targeting and advertising cookies may be set through our Sites by our service providers. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant advertisements on other sites. Further description of the purposes of the targeting cookies used in our Sites is available in the Cookies Settings.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, unique identifier, location information, information about your browser and/or terminal, your interests as identified through your browsing, the advertising content you have viewed and your interactions with that content. The legal basis for processing this Personal Information is your prior consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each Marketing cookie. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our service providers authorized to deposit targeting cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
For more information about cookies, and how to disable them, please see “Your Privacy Choices” below.
Web beacons.
We also use web beacons (sometimes called “pixel tags” or “tracking pixels”). These are tiny graphics files that contain a unique identifier that is embedded in our Sites and in our emails or other communications that are sent through our Services. This enables us, for example, to monitor the traffic patterns of users from one page within our Site to another, to track access to the communications sent through our Services, to understand whether you have come to our Sites from an online advertisement displayed on a third-party website or whether you have viewed advertisements on our Sites or through the Services, or to improve our Sites’ performance.
Legal basis for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws in relation to Web beacons is your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each of such Web beacons.
To change your cookie settings (including Web beacon settings) and preferences for the Sites you are visiting, use the Cookie Settings link at the bottom of the webpage.
For more information about Web beacons, and how to disable them, please see “Your Privacy Choices” below. SDKs. We may use third party APIs and software development kits (“SDKs”) as part of the functionality of our Services. APIs and SDKs may allow third parties, including analytics and advertising partners, to collect your Personal Information for various purposes including to provide analytics services and content that is more relevant to you.
5.2 Social media features.
Airship collects Personal Information as described above in Section 2.1 in the Social Media Content to enable individuals to use online social media resources offered either by Airship or a third party. We may also enable you to use these social media resources to post or share Personal Information with others. When using social media resources, you should take into careful consideration what Personal Information you share with others.
In addition, social media links such as Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, Instagram,YouTube, SoundCloud and Slideshare (that might include widgets such as the “share this” button or other interactive mini-programs) are on our Site. These features collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our site, and set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These social media features are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Site. Your interactions with these features apart from your visit to our Site are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
5.3 Chat Technologies
We use chat technologies provided by third-party service providers that employ cookies and software code to operate the chat features you can use to communicate with us through our Sites. We and such third-party vendors may monitor, record and use information from your interactions with our Sites. This information includes details you have shared through online chats, data on sections of the Sites you have visited, your IP address and your general geographic information (e.g., city, state). This Personal Information may be processed for the purposes outlined in Sections 3.1 (Providing information and Services you requested.) and 3.4 (Research and development.) of this Privacy Statement.
6. International data transfers.
We store Personal Information sent or collected via or by us in the United States or the European Economic Area, in the cloud, our servers, the servers of our affiliates or the servers of our service providers. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer, store and access such information from the locations where Airship has operations – specifically the United States, France, Germany, the United Kingdom, Singapore, or India. Your Personal Information may be processed in any of these countries, and they may have data protection laws that are different or that may not provide the same level of data protection as your country. In the event of data transfers outside of the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, or Singapore among Airship affiliates, and with our service providers and data processors , we rely on international transfer mechanisms such as the European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses, as described in Section 7 below (EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”), adequacy decisions about certain countries, or we will ask you for your prior consent for the transfer of your Personal Information, as applicable. In addition, we ensure the recipient of your Personal Information has in place adequate levels of protection for your Personal Information.
When you visit one of our Company Social Media Webpages on a social media platform as described in Section 2.1 (2.1 Personal Information we collect directly. Social Media Content.) above, Personal Information may be transferred to providers in countries outside the European Economic Area, which, from the perspective of the European Union (“EU”), do not ensure an “adequate level of protection” for the processing of Personal Information in line with EU standards. Please bear this in mind before clicking on a link or visiting directly a Company Social Media Webpage and thereby triggering a transfer of your data.
For more information about the protections in place and a sample copy of the model contractual clauses, please contact us at
privacy@airship.com
.
7. EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”)*
Airship complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Airship has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of Personal Information received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Airship has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the relevant Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your Personal Information.  EU, UK, or Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Airship at:
privacy@airship.com
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you. Under certain conditions, an individual may invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by JAMS as described here above.  More information is available at:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human resources data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in the context of the employment relationship.
Airship remains liable for the processing of Personal Information received under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF and subsequently transferred to a third party acting on our behalf if this entity processes such Personal Information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Airship’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Information  in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements and we will do so in accordance with the
Airship’s Policy on Response to Public Authority Requests for Personal Data
.
*The EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF  do not apply to Airship Group, Inc.’s affiliate, Apptimize, LLC, and the Apptimize Service.
8. What
security measures
does Airship have in place?
The security of Personal Information provided to us is of utmost importance to us. We have implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Information is no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@airship.com
.
9. How long does Airship retain Personal Information?
We retain the Personal Information we receive as described in this Privacy Statement for a period consistent with the original purpose of collection (see Section 3 (How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?) above) or as long as necessary to fulfill our legal obligations. We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information on the basis of the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Information being processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the Personal Information, whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, and on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation). The Airship corporate Data Retention Policy sets forth the period for Personal Information described in Section 2 (What Personal Information does Airship collect?) of this Privacy Statement. The corporate Data Retention Policy does not apply to customer data collected via the Services, which is subject to data agreements entered into between Airship and the customer. For information specific to data retention periods related to the Airship corporate Data Retention Policy, which is Airship confidential information, please email
privacy@airship.com
. The Data Retention Schedule available here specifies the default data retention settings for the Airship Platform.
After expiry of the applicable retention periods set forth in the Airship corporate Data Retention Policy, your Personal Information will be deleted. If there is any Personal Information that we are unable, for technical reasons, to delete entirely from our systems, we will implement appropriate measures to prevent any further use of such Personal Information.
For more information on data retention periods, please contact us by emailing
privacy@airship.com
.
10. Are Airship’s Sites intended for children?
Due to the nature of our business, Services are not marketed to or intended for minors under the age of 18. Airship does not knowingly solicit or collect Personal Information from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe your child has provided us with Personal Information without your consent, please contact us by using the Contact Us information below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Information from our Services.
11. Your privacy rights.
You have certain choices available to you when it comes to your Personal Information. Below is a summary of those choices, how to exercise them and any limitations.
California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
Singapore job applicants and employees of Airship Global Pte. Ltd. may read our supplemental
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
.
Opt-out.
Where you have consented to our processing of your Personal Information, you may withdraw that consent at any time and opt out by following the instructions in this Section 11. Additionally, before we use Personal Information for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and give you the opportunity to opt in to the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Information is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the applicable law or contract. Note that, due to the nature of the Services you may have to log in to your account or provide the email and/or other identifying value or information that is associated with your Personal Information in order for us to be able to complete your request. Note that if you withdraw your consent to processing, some features of the Services may not be available.
Email unsubscribe.
An “Unsubscribe” link will be provided in each email communication sent by us so that you can opt out. However, we may continue to send non-promotional, transaction-related emails in response to your request regarding any products or services of the Airship Platform you have requested. We may also need to send you certain important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications regarding updates to our Terms of Use or this Privacy Statement, service announcements or security information, and you will not be able to opt out of those communications.
Opt-out of cookies and ads.
We will only use cookies with your permission in compliance with applicable laws. You may stop or restrict the placement of technologies on your device or remove them by selecting “Reject All” in the cookie consent manager banner, by adjusting your preferences as your browser or device permits, or for this Site using the Cookies Settings link at the bottom of the webpage in the cookie consent manager banner. You may also opt out by enabling Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law as further described below in the Do Not Track subsection. The online advertising industry also provides websites from which you may opt out of receiving targeted ads from data partners and other advertising partners that participate in self-regulatory programs. You can access these and learn more about targeted advertising and consumer choice and privacy, at
www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
,
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
,
https://youradchoices.ca/choices/
, and
www.aboutads.info/choices/
. To separately make choices for mobile apps on a mobile device, you can download DAA’s AppChoices application from your device’s app store. Alternatively, for some devices you may use your device’s platform controls in your settings to exercise choice.
Please note you must separately opt out in each browser and on each device. Advertisements on third-party websites that contain the AdChoices link may have been directed to you based on information collected by advertising partners over time and across websites. These advertisements provide a mechanism to opt out of the advertising partners’ use of this information for interest-based advertising purposes.
Do Not Track.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. You may opt out by enabling Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law. Enabling GPC will automatically set your cookie settings to opt out of the sharing of Personal Information for behavioral advertising. If you choose to use GPC, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Other than GPC, Airship does not recognize or respond to browser-initiated DNT signals, whether that signal is received on a computer or a mobile device. For information about “do-not-track”, visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.org
.
Access, correct, amend, port, restrict processing, or delete Personal Information. You have the right to control or change certain uses and disclosures of your Personal Information, as set out in this Privacy Statement. Subject to any exemptions provided by law, you have the right to: seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request to know more details about the categories or specific pieces of Personal Information we collect; to ask that we correct, update, amend or delete your Personal Information; to ask that we do not sell your Personal Information (where “sale” is defined according to the local regulations in your state of residency); and to not be discriminated against for exercising these rights. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information as “sales” are defined under the laws of Nevada or California, as further detailed below in the sections dedicated to those locations. We will respond to such requests within a reasonable timeframe. California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
for information in addition to and as a complement to the rights listed here as to your rights under the California privacy laws.
You may email
privacy@airship.com
to exercise one of the individual rights outlined above with regard to Personal Information held about you by us. Such requests will be processed in accordance with local laws. We will respond to such requests within a reasonable timeframe. Although we make good faith efforts to provide individuals with access to their Personal Information, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to the individual’s privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. If we determine that access should be restricted in any particular instance, we will provide you with an explanation of why that determination has been made and a contact point for any further inquiries. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Information. In addition, please note that we may need to retain certain information for record keeping purposes, to complete transactions or to comply with our legal obligations. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the GDPR, CCPA, the Singapore Personal Data Protection Act 2012  or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations.
EU residents.
If you are located in the European Economic Area or the UK, in addition and as a complement to the rights mentioned above, you also have the following rights:
The right of access means that you may, at any time, request to be informed as to whether we are processing any Personal Information concerning you, and, where that is the case, what Personal Information we are processing, as well as the characteristics of the processing activities carried out.
The right of rectification means that you may request rectification of your Personal Information where it is incorrect. You may also request, where your Personal Information is incomplete, that it be completed insofar as it is relevant to the purpose of the processing activity in question.
The right to erasure means that you may request erasure of your Personal Information, particularly where: (i) they are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected (ii) your Personal Information are processed on the basis of your consent, you wish to withdraw consent and there is no other legal ground for the processing of your data (iii) you object to the processing of your Personal Information and wish therefore to have them deleted (iv) your Personal Information have been unlawfully processed; (v) your Personal Information must be deleted to meet a legal obligation provided either under European Union law.
The right of limitation means that you may request that we limit the processing of your Personal Information (i) where you challenge the accuracy of your Personal Information, for a period of time enabling us to verify the accuracy of said Personal Information, (ii) where, processing has been proved to be non-compliant and you prefer that we limit the processing of your Personal Information instead of full erasure, (iii) we no longer need your Personal Information for the purposes of processing but you still need them for the establishment, exercise or defense of a legal claim; (iv) where you have objected to the processing of your Personal Information and you wish to limit processing for the period of time required to verify whether the legitimate reason you present is indeed justified. Limited processing means that processing of your Personal Information will be limited to the mere storage of the corresponding personal data. We will not carry out any other operation involving the Personal Information in question.
The right of objection means that you may object to the processing of your Personal Information, where such processing is based on the pursuit of our legitimate interests (or those of a third party). The right of objection may be exercised where a legitimate reason concerning your particular situation can be proven. In particular, you have a right to object if we process your data for direct marketing purposes. We will cease the processing of your Personal Information unless there is an imperative and legitimate reason for us to keep carrying out this processing activity in accordance with the applicable regulations.
The right to define guidelines regarding what happens to your Personal Information after your death allows you to indicate your instructions concerning your Personal Information and how they are kept, deleted and communicated after your death.
The right to portability means that you may receive, on your request, and according to the applicable legislation, your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, or, on your request, have them communicated directly to a third-party of your choice, where this is legally and technically possible.
The right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you believe our processing of your Personal Information violates applicable law.
In addition, you have the right to be informed whether you are subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects (“Automated Decision-Making”) or not. Automated Decision-Making currently does not take place on our Sites or Services.
Special Consent Terms for German Residents
: If you are located in Germany, the following consent terms apply to Personal Information shared by you with Airship via the Sites:
You hereby consent to Airship Group, Inc. (“Airship”) processing your voluntarily provided Personal Information in order to occasionally receive the latest resources, reports and events information from Airship about its mobile marketing and engagement services. Except as otherwise described in this Privacy Statement, your Personal Information will not be forwarded to third parties.
You can withdraw your consent to receive information from Airship about its mobile marketing and engagement services at any time (without any cost) by clicking at the unsubscribe link at the bottom of each of our emails (if applicable, also with regard to the use of your telephone number) or by sending an email to
privacy@airship.com
. The withdrawal of consent shall not affect the lawfulness of the processing carried out on the basis of the consent until revocation.
By submitting your Personal Information via the form on the Sites, you confirm that you agree to the processing of your Personal Information by Airship as described above in this Privacy Statement, which also informs you about your other data subject rights.
California residents.
Please refer to the
California Privacy Rights Notice here
.
Colorado residents.
If you are a resident of Colorado, you have the right to: opt out of the processing of Personal Information; seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request deletion of Personal Information; request correction of inaccuracies in your Personal Information; opt out of processing of your Personal Information for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer; or obtain and transfer your Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Colorado Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account.
Nevada residents.
If you are a resident of Nevada, you have the right to: opt out of the processing of Personal Information; opt-out of the sale of certain Personal Information to third parties who intend to license or sell that Personal Information; or request correction of inaccuracies in your Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Nevada Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information as sales are defined in Nevada Revised Statutes Chapter 603A.
Singapore residents.
If you are a job applicant or employee located in Singapore, you have the rights as described in the
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
.  You may exercise these rights by contacting us at privacy@airship.com.
Virginia residents.
If you are a resident of Virginia, you have the right to: seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request corrections of inaccuracies in your Personal Information; request deletion of Personal Information; or to opt out of processing of your Personal Information for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information or engage in profiling as those terms are defined in the Virginia Data Consumer Protection Act. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Virginia Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account.
Customer Data.
If you are an individual seeking to exercise your data protection rights (including to seek access to, or to correct, amend, delete, port or restrict processing) in respect of Personal Information stored or processed by us on behalf of one of our customers within the Airship Platform, then you should direct your request to our customer (the data controller). Upon receipt of a request from one of our customers for us to remove the personal data, we will respond to their request within provided in our agreements with the customer. We will retain Personal Information that we process and store on behalf of our customers for as long as needed to provide the services to our customers.
Redress, compliance and accountability.
If, after reviewing this Privacy Statement, you would like to submit a request or you have any questions or privacy concerns, please contact:
privacy@airship.com
or use the contact information in Section 14 (Contact Us) below.
Airship will address your concerns and attempt to resolve any privacy issues in a timely manner.
If you are an EU, Swiss or UK citizen and feel that Airship is not abiding by the terms of this Privacy Statement, please contact us at the contact information provided below. If any request remains unresolved, you may contact the national data protection authority for your EU Member State, Switzerland or United Kingdom.
EU Representative:
Airship France S.A.S has been appointed as Airship’s representative in the EU for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the EU GDPR. To make an inquiry on matters related to the processing of Personal Information under the EU GDPR, please contact Airship France S.A.S at:
Airship France S.A.S
33 rue La Fayette
75009
Paris, France
AirshipLegalEU@airship.com
UK Representative:
Urban Airship UK Ltd. has been appointed as Airship’s representative in the UK for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the UK GDPR. To make an inquiry on matters related to the processing of Personal Information under the EU GDPR, please contact Urban Airship UK, Ltd. at:
Urban Airship UK Ltd.
WeWork
c/o Urban Airship UK
1 St Katharine’s Way
LondonE1W 1UN, United Kingdom
AirshipLegalUK@airship.com
12. Third party sites
Please note that our Services may contain links to other websites or digital properties for your convenience and information. We do not control third-party websites, digital properties or their privacy practices, which may differ from those set out in this Privacy Statement. We do not endorse or make any representations about partner or third-party websites or digital properties. Any Personal Information you choose to give to an unrelated third party is not covered by this Privacy Statement. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of any company, website or digital property before submitting your Personal Information. Some third parties may choose to share their users’ Personal Information with us; that sharing is governed by that company’s privacy policy, not this Privacy Statement.
13. Changes to this Privacy Statement
We may update this Privacy Statement from time to time as deemed necessary in our sole discretion. We will provide notification of any material changes to this Privacy Statement through our Sites or as otherwise required by applicable law. We encourage you to review this Privacy Statement periodically to be informed regarding how we are using and protecting your Personal Information and to be aware of any policy changes. Your continued relationship with us after the posting or notice of any amended Privacy Statement shall constitute your agreement to be bound by any such changes. Any changes to this Privacy Statement take effect immediately after being posted or otherwise provided by us.
14. Contact Us
If you have any questions about our privacy practices or this Privacy Statement, or if you wish to submit a request to exercise your rights, please contact us at:
Airship Group, Inc.
548 Market St
PMB 698370
San Francisco, California 94104-5401
privacy@airship.com
1-855-391-5311
Cookie Providers for Airship.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
CloudFlare
https://www.cloudflare.com/en-ca/privacypolicy/
Django
https://www.djangoproject.com/
F5
https://www.f5.com/company/policies/f5-big-ip-services-privacy-statement
OneTrust
https://www.onetrust.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bizible / Marketo
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/privacy/
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Hotjar
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
New Relic
https://newrelic.com/termsandconditions/privacy
Segment
https://segment.com/legal/privacy/
Unbounce
https://unbounce.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Atlassian Jira Servicedesk
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy
Bing Ads
https://about.ads.microsoft.com/en-gb/resources/policies/microsoft-advertising-privacy-policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Twitter
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Cookie Providers for Apptimize.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
CloudFlare
https://www.cloudflare.com/en-ca/privacypolicy/
F5
https://www.f5.com/company/policies/f5-big-ip-services-privacy-statement
OneTrust
https://www.onetrust.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bizible / Marketo
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/privacy/
CloudFoundry
https://www.linuxfoundation.org/privacy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Hotjar
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
New Relic
https://newrelic.com/termsandconditions/privacy
Segment
https://segment.com/legal/privacy/
Stripe
https://stripe.com/privacy
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bing Ads
https://about.ads.microsoft.com/en-gb/resources/policies/microsoft-advertising-privacy-policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Heap Analytics (heap.io)
https://heap.io/privacy
Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Pardot (Salesforce)
https://www.salesforce.com/eu/gdpr/pardot/
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/
Twitter
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Cookie Providers for Gummicube.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Opt in to Web Notifications to stay up-to-date.
Opt In
Not Now
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, personalize content and to help us better understand how you use our sites. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners. To set your own preferences and to learn more about the cookies we use click "Cookie Settings" in the footer. If we have detected the GPC opt-out preference signal, then it will be honored.
Privacy Policy
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Your Privacy
Essential Cookies
Functional Cookies
Marketing Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit our website, we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Privacy Statement
Always Active
These cookies are essential for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not gather information about you that are used for marketing purposes.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 6
https://www.accengage.com/privacy-policy/:
Legal
Legal
›
Airship Corporate
›
Privacy Statement
Airship Corporate
Website Terms of Use
Privacy Statement
California Privacy Rights Notice
California Employee and Candidate Privacy Notice
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
Airship Products and Services
Terms of Subscription Service
Support Services Description
Acceptable Use Policy
Definition of Billing Metrics
Data Retention Schedule
Terms of Subscription Service – Gummicube ASO Services
Conditions Générales de Vente – Accengage
Global Data Privacy & Security
Global Data Privacy
Airship Data Processing Addendum
New SCCs DPA Amendment
Airship Subprocessors
Security Measures
Full Disclosure Security Policy
Airship Intellectual Property
Trademark and Patent Notice
Effective as of January 15, 2025 —
Previous Version
Please note that this Privacy Statement has been updated to reflect our new headquarters address. There have been no substantive changes to the terms or our practices regarding the handling of your personal information.
Airship Group, Inc. and its affiliates, including, Apptimize, LLC., Urban Airship UK Ltd., Urban Airship Germany GmbH, Airship France SAS, Airship Business France SAS, Urban Airship India Private Ltd., and Airship Global Pte. Ltd. (collectively, “Airship,” “we” or “us”) offers mobile and customer engagement platforms through the Airship Service, the Apptimize Service and the Gummicube ASO Services, (collectively referred to as the “Airship Platform”). Airship is committed to protecting the privacy of Personal Information you provide to us, and applies the Privacy by Design and Data Protection by Default principles across our Airship Platform product enhancement, development, and operations.
When referring to “Personal Information” in this Statement, we mean information that personally identifies (e.g. your name, email address, device information, IP Address) an individual or other data that relates to or could be reasonably linked to such information. Accordingly, Airship informs you via this privacy and information practices statement about our information practices, the kinds of information we collect, how we intend to use and share that information, and the rights you have with respect to the processing of such information by us, (“Privacy Statement”).
1. What this Privacy Statement covers
1.1 Scope of this Privacy Statement
This Privacy Statement applies to Personal Information that we collect when you: (i) visit websites we operate and that link to this Privacy Statement, including
www.airship.com
,
https://www.airship.com/de/home/
,
www.airship.com/fr/
,
https://go.airship.com/accounts/register/plan/starter/
,
https://go.airship.com/accounts/login/
,
www.gummicube.com
, and
www.apptimize.com
(the “Sites”); (ii) use our training and testing versions of the Airship Platform for mobile or software applications, mobile wallet passes, or any other software applications made available by us for use on or through computers and mobile devices that link to this Privacy Statement; (iii) download or otherwise engage with content and publications such as viewing videos, reading content our Site, interact with our chat bot, or visit our branded social media pages; (iv) visit our offices; (v) receive communications from us, including emails, phone calls or texts; (vi) register for, attend and/or otherwise take part in our events, webinars or contests; (vii) participate in recorded meetings; (viii) submit a job application to us; (ix) submit information to us in connection with a potential business relationship with us; (x) register to use the Airship Platform as an authorized user (for example, as an employee of one of our customers who provided you with login access to the Airship Platform) (which is referred to in this Statement as “Account Information”); (xi) contact us for support or information; or (xii) work at partners or suppliers of Airship and interact with Airship in the course of doing business or contemplating a potential business relationship with us. This Privacy Statement also applies to our recruitment practices. However, for California job candidates and Airship employees, then
Airship’s California Employee Privacy Notice
applies to you and describes how we collect and use Personal Information about you during and after candidacy, job application, and your employment with us. In addition, for Singapore job candidates and Airship employees,
Airship’s Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
applies to you and describes how we collect and use Personal Information about you during and after candidacy, job application, and your employment with us. In this Privacy Statement, the terms Sites and Airship Platform collectively are referred to as the “Services”. “You” refers to any individual who visits or uses the Services.
1.2 Controller for processing within the scope of this Privacy Statement
Airship is the data controller for the data processing within the scope of this Privacy Statement. This means that as a data controller we determine the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Information for our marketing and business purposes, as further described below in this Privacy Statement.
1.3 Out of Scope of this Privacy Statement
Except as provided with respect to Account Information as described in Section 1.1. (Scope of this Privacy Statement) above, this Privacy Statement  does not apply to our security and privacy practices concerning the Personal Information we receive and process on behalf of our customers through the Airship Platform). In this capacity, Airship processes Personal Information of people who interact with customer applications or websites that are offered by Airship’s customers and that have incorporated the Airship Platform. As such, Airship acts in the role of a data processor or service provider on behalf of our customers, and our security and privacy commitments are detailed in and governed by our agreements with our customers, including the
Terms of Subscription Service
, the
Airship Data Processing Addendum
entered into with such customers,or such other applicable agreement entered into between our customer and Airship and that is related to our customer’s access to and use of the Airship Platform. This Privacy Statement does not cover any Personal Information that our customers choose to collect and share with Airship, where Airship is not the Data Controller, but is instead the Data Processor. For privacy information related to our customers’ uses of the Airship Platform in connection with their mobile applications, websites, emails, texts or other digital properties, please reach out to the respective customer directly.
In addition, the Services may contain links to other third party websites. The privacy statements and policies of such third party websites govern their respective privacy and security practices as provided in Section 12 of this Privacy Statement.
California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
here. Our California Privacy Notice applies to Personal Information we collect and process about California residents in operating our business in circumstances where Airship controls how and why the Personal Information is processed.
2. What Personal Information does Airship collect?
The Personal Information we collect will be determined by the type of interaction you have with Airship, as described in further detail in the following categories:
2.1 Personal Information we collect directly.
Site usage.
When you use the Services or fill out forms on our Site, we may provide you with opportunities to sign up to receive specific information or Services, download content, register for an online or in-person event or webinar, or attend an online or in-person event or webinar for marketing purposes, and we ask for your contact information. Personal Information we collect is, is: name, title, company name, industry, company address, phone number,email address, country, downloads and engagement with Airship content and other publications, marketing subscription status, communications that we exchange with you including when you contact us with questions or feedback, through online web portals, emails, our chat features, social media, or online assessments or survey participation. Our sites use cookies and other technologies, and as a result we also collect information as described in
Section 5
(What device and usage data does Airship process?) below as well as internet connection data transmitted by your browser, meaning your IP address or proxy server, your browser (type/version), your operating system, date and time of your inquiry, websites from which your system accesses our website (Referrer-URL) and hostname of the accessing computer, location, internet service provider and / or mobile carrier, pages and files viewed, exchanges through our chat features, searches, and date/ time stamps associated with your usage. When activating or installing updates to our mobile applications or mobile wallet passes, we collect information about your device (manufacturer, model, IP address), or information about the application such as the version, date of activation, successful or unsuccessful updates.
Registering for and attending a meeting or an event.
If you register to attend a meeting (whether in person or virtually) in connection with entering into a contract with Airship or one of its third party partners or in the course of an already existing contractual relationship, we ask for your contact information (name and email address), job title, employer, and retain copies of meeting audio and video recording in accordance with our Corporate Data Retention Policy and based on your consent to participate in a recorded meeting. If you attend an event, we, with your consent, scan your attendee badge which will provide us with your information, such as name, title, company name, address, country, phone number, email address, industry, and record of event attendance.
Your communications with us.
We collect your name, email address, phone number, mailing address, job title, marketing subscription status, and information regarding your engagement with Airship content and other publications, communications that we exchange with you through online web portals, emails, our chat features, or social media when you request information about our Services, register for our newsletter, download or otherwise engage with our content and publications, request customer or technical support, or otherwise communicate with us.
Account Information for Airship Platform.
If you register to use the Airship Platform as an authorized user or sign up for a free account, we collect your name, email address, IP address, company name, job title, and website name or information.
Surveys.
If we may contact you to participate in surveys and you decide to participate, you will be asked to provide your name, email address, employer, job title and other contact information..
Social media content.
We maintain publicly accessible Airship social media sites (“Company Social Media Webpages”) on various social media platforms, i.e. Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, Soundcloud, Slideshare. We offer forums, blogs, and content on such Company Social Media Webpages. Any content you provide on these channels will be considered “public” and provided voluntarily.
The individual processing of Personal Information by the respective social media platform providers differ. It is likely that, in addition to the storage of Personal Information specifically provided by you on the Company Social Media Webpages, the social media platform provider will also process further information. Additional information as to data transfers for social media platform providers is available below in Section 6 (International data transfers) below. For details about the collection and storage of your Personal Information as well as the type, scope and purpose of their use by a social media platform providing the Company Social Media Webpage, please refer to the respective platform’s privacy policy:
The privacy policy for Facebook, which is operated by Meta Platforms, Inc. can be found at
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/policy
.
The privacy policy for LinkedIn, which is operated by LinkedIn Inc., can be found at
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
The privacy policy for Twitter, which is operated by Twitter, Inc. can be found at
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
.
The privacy policy for SoundCloud, which is operated by SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG, can be found at
https://soundcloud.com/pages/privacy
.
The privacy policy for Slideshare, which is operated by Scribd, Inc., can be found at
https://support.scribd.com/hc/en-us/articles/210129366-Privacy-Policy
.
In the following, we set out our own processing activities regarding your visit to the Company Social Media Webpages. Based on the type of Personal Information processed, we explain for which purposes and on which legal basis we process your Personal Information.
Visiting our Company Social Media Webpages
When you visit our Company Social Media Webpages, your Personal Information is also collected, used and stored by the providers of the respective social media platform. This may happen even if you do not have a profile in the respective social media platform. If you are logged in with your personal user account of the respective social media platform while visiting this Company Social Media Webpage, the respective social media platform provider can link the visit to your account. If you do not wish such a linking to occur, you must log out of your account before visiting our Company Social Media Webpage and delete the cookies if necessary. You can find details in the privacy policies of the respective social media platform providers linked above.
As the owner of the Company Social Media Webpage, we can view the information stored in your respective public profile when you visit our Company Social Media Webpage. However, we can only do this if you have such a profile on the relevant social media platform and are logged in to it when you access our respective Company Social Media Webpage. Accordingly, you can also visit our Company Social Media Webpage without us having access to the aforementioned information. If we view the information stored in your public profile, we do so in order to be able to offer you and the rest of our target group the most interesting content possible related to the Services.
In addition, the social media platforms providers share with us anonymous usage statistics, which we use to improve the user experience for visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage. However, we do not have access to the usage data (Personal Information) that the social media platform providers collect to compile these statistics. The social media platform providers are therefore always to be considered as the data controller with regard to the processing of this data.
Our own data processing in connection with our social media profiles serves and is based on our (and your) legitimate interest (legal basis) in improving the user experience when visiting the respective Company Social Media Webpage.
Contact via the messenger of a social media feature
If you communicate with us via a messenger functionality of a social media platform or contact us by linking in your own posts or by reacting (e.g. likes or comments) to one of our posts, we process the following Personal Information in connection with this:
your respective profile name
your first and last name, insofar as this is publicly visible
if applicable, further information stored as public in your profile
your message or the statement of your post or your reaction
the date and time of your interaction
information on whether you are already a customer or possibly interested in our Services.
Furthermore, when contacting us via messenger functionality of a social media platform, you can voluntarily provide additional information that you believe is necessary to process your request.
If your contact contains a request, we process the Personal Information listed here above to process your request and the associated technical administration and also store it in the event that follow-up questions arise. Otherwise, we only process the aforementioned Personal Information to understand whether visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage like our content.
The processing of the aforementioned Personal Information takes place if you express interest in our products on the basis of contractual necessity, i.e. in the initiation of a contractual relationship. Otherwise, it takes place on the basis of mutual interest in good support for visitors to our Company Social Media Webpage and is therefore based on our legitimate interest (legal basis).
There is no obligation to provide the aforementioned Personal Information, but it is not possible for us to process requests or for you to interact with us without it.
Registration for sweepstakes or contests.
We may run sweepstakes and contests. Contact information you provide is used to reach you about the sweepstakes or contest and for other promotional, marketing and business purposes, if permitted by law. In some jurisdictions, we are required to publicly share information of winners.
Visiting our offices.
If you visit our offices, you are required to register as a visitor and provide your name, email address, phone number, company name and time and date of arrival.
Employment applications.
We collect your Personal Information from you such as name, email address, phone number, mailing address, job title, CV/resume and work history, education, interests, professional references, and information regarding your engagement with Airship content and other publications, communications that we exchange with you through online web portals, emails, our chat features, or social media when you request information about our job posting, apply for a job or engage with a job posting, or otherwise communicate with us. For more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about California job candidates and Airship employees, please refer to our
Job Applicant
and
Employee Privacy Notice for California Residents
which applies to all California residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship. Furthermore, for information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about Singapore job candidates and Airship employees, please refer to our
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
which applies to all Singapore residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
2.2 Personal Information collected from others.
Information from Other Sources.
We may also receive other information including your Personal Information from service providers, from joint marketing partners, or from publicly available information such as public databases and social media platforms. In particular, we collect the following Personal Information from such other sources: contact information, including mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), information regarding your business use case for our Services, IP addresses, social media profiles including LinkedIn URLs, and custom profiles for purposes of targeted advertising, delivering relevant email content regarding our Services, event promotion, determining eligibility and verifying contact information. When acquiring information from third parties, we will obtain contractual or other legally compliant commitments from the third parties that the information was acquired lawfully and with the appropriate level of consent.
Billing Information.
Through our third-party billing and payment processors, and to the extent we charge you a fee for the Services, we may collect billing, payment, and contract related information from you if you are a business representative of one of our customers. Personal Information collected for billing, payment and contract related purposes is name, title, company name, company address, phone number or email address, country, and payment related information such as accounts.
Under certain circumstances, the credit or debit card or other payment method information you provide in this context may be transmitted by the payment processor. Our payment processor provider is Stripe, Inc. The purpose of this transmission is to process the payment made on an invoice due to us for our Services. The payment processor’s terms and conditions and data protection terms entered into by Airship with the payment processor as our data processor or service provider apply to such payment transactions..
3. How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?
We use Personal Information that we collect about you or that you provide to us for a range of different business purposes. Depending on how you interact with us, we and our third-party service providers use Personal Information in a variety of ways, including:
3.1 Providing information and Services you requested.
We use the Personal Information about you to fulfill requests for programs, Services, or information that you may request such as information about potential or future Services, namely to: (a) generally manage your information and accounts; (b) respond to questions, comments and requests; (c) provide access to certain areas and features of the Services; (d) link or combine information we get from others to help understand your needs and provide you with better Services; and (e) allow you to register for events, participate in a contest or promotion, post in a forum or participate in webinars, and provide related information and communications.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Performance of a contract, e.g. when we provide you with Services, or communicate with you about them. This includes when we use your Personal Information to process Orders or payments orders, or deliver the Services you requested;
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to process your request, and further (to the extent our interests also prevail in this regard) to improve our Services, to detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly to provide you with advertising based on the interests you indicate to us; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a link or by combining information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
3.2 To fulfill a contract or take steps linked to a contract.
This is relevant when you register for or subscribe to the Airship Platform. We use the Personal Information about you to take steps to enter into a contract or to fulfill the obligations of a contract to which you are a party, namely: (a) to fulfill your and prospective customers’ requests related to the Airship Platform or other products that you have requested; (b) to provide you with the Airship Platform for which you have registered; (c) perform internal quality control; (d) to provide, maintain, and improve our Services; (e) verify identity; (f) send communications regarding the Services, your account, or any changes to any Airship policy or terms of use; (g) process payments; (h) provide technical and customer support; and (i) enforce our Terms of Use, Acceptable Use Policy or other agreement entered into with you.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Performance of a contract, e.g. when we provide you with Services, or communicate with you about them. This includes when we use your Personal Information to process orders, deliver Services, and process payments; or
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to fulfill our contractual obligations, and further (to the extent our interests prevail in this regard) to improve our Services.
3.3 Marketing products and services.
We use Personal Information about you, in most cases with your prior consent, to provide you with materials about offers, products and services offered by us, including new content or information about future services. We provide you with these materials by phone, postal mail, text or email, as permitted by applicable law. Such uses include: (a) to tailor content, advertisements, and offers; (b) to notify you about offers, products, and services that may be of interest to you; (c) measure interest in the Services; (d) process and deliver contest entries and rewards; (e) monitor and analyze trends, usage and activities in connection with our Services; or (f) for other purposes disclosed at the time that you provide Personal Information;. If you do not wish us to use your Personal Information for marketing purposes, you may contact us at any time to opt out of the use of your Personal Information for such purposes, as further described below in Section 11 (Your Privacy Rights).
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) to improve our Services, to detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly to provide you with interest-based advertising; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you, e.g. link or combine information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop the processing of your data for that purpose.
3.4 Research and development.
We use your Personal Information to create de-identified information that we use alone or in the aggregate with information obtained from other sources, in order to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services,develop new products, processes and services, or develop content related to industry trends and market reports and analyses. De-identified or aggregated information is used for a variety of functions, including the measurement of visitors’ interest in and use of various portions or features of the Services, and usage trends for mobile applications and websites. After this process of de-identification, de-identified or aggregated information is not Personal Information, does not identify you or any individual, and we use such information in a number of ways, including research, internal analysis, analytics, benchmark or industry reports, and any other legally permissible purposes. We share this information internally within Airship and with our customers or partners for our or their purposes in a de-identified or aggregated form that is designed to prevent anyone from identifying you.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) to improve our Services; or
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a link, contract, or by combined information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
3.5 Recruitment and employment.
Based on your interest in a role with Airship, we use Personal Information within the recruitment and job application process for the assessment of your application and, if an employment relationship is established, also for the execution of the employment relationship.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
The performance of a contact (e.g. in entering in an employment agreement with you).
Our legitimate business interests (to the extent our interests prevail) in recruiting, employment, and responding to any potential legal claims.
Your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you via a job application link or post, contract, or by combined information we get from others. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose.
Compliance with a legal obligation when we use your Personal Information to comply with laws, including local labor and employment laws.
For California residents, more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about California job candidates and Airship employees is available in our Job Applicant and Employee Privacy Notice for California Residents which applies to all California residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
For Singapore residents, more information specific as to Personal Information we collect and process about Singapore job candidates and Airship employees is available in our
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
which applies to all Singapore residents who are either job applicants, candidates, or current and former employees of Airship.
3.6 Public content.
If you post any content to our website forums or social media accounts, we publish this content and make it generally available to any user or visitor of our website or Company Social Media Webpages.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Your consent to publish your content when you decide to post it on our website forums or Company Social Media Webpages. When you consent to our processing your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and we will stop processing of your data for that purpose; or
Our legitimate business interests and the interests of our customers to provide you with the requested information, when we detect and prevent fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, ourselves, or others, and partly when we provide you with interest-based advertising, and further (to the extent our interests also prevail in this regard) to improve our Services.
3.7 Complying with legal obligations.
As permitted by local laws, we use your Personal Information when cooperating with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our legal obligation under applicable laws to protect our rights or as necessary to protect against misuse or abuse of our Sites or Services, prevent potentially prohibited or illegal activities and fraud, promote safety and security of the Services and in protecting our rights and the rights of others, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, complying with judicial proceedings, court orders or legal processes or to respond to lawful requests.
Legal bases for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws are:
Compliance with a legal obligation when we use your Personal Information to comply with laws. For instance, we collect customer place of establishment and bank account information for identity verification purposes.
4. With whom does Airship share Personal Information?
We disclose your information to third parties only as necessary to carry out your request, for a variety of our professional or legitimate business purposes, including to provide our Services, to protect us or others, in the event of a major business transaction such as a merger, sale, or asset transfer, as described below, or as otherwise required or permitted by law. Where we do transfer your Personal Information to third parties or service providers, appropriate safeguards will be in place in order to ensure correct and secure data processing in compliance with applicable data protection law.
4.1 Disclosures to provide our Services.
Service Providers.
Airship may share Personal Information with our service providers that we have retained to perform services on our behalf for business purposes and to support our internal operations including (i) provision of IT, hosting, backup, storage, and related services; (ii) provision of information and Services you have requested; (iii) payment processing and to collect amounts owed to Airship; (iv) customer service activities; (v) recruitment activities and job postings; and (vi) professional advisors including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers. These third-party service providers may have access to or process your Personal Information for the purpose of providing these services for us. Payment information will be used and shared only to effectuate your order and may be stored by a service provider for purposes of future orders. Airship has executed appropriate contracts with our service providers that prohibit service providers from using or sharing your Personal Information except as necessary to perform the contracted services on our behalf or to comply with applicable legal requirements. We retain control over the Personal Information in question and remain the data controller.
Business Partners.
From time to time, Airship may partner with other companies to jointly offer products, services or programs (such as webinars, events or downloadable content). If you purchase, specifically express interest in, or register for a jointly-offered product, service or program from or through Airship, we may share your Personal Information with our business partners. We also share your Personal Data with technology and solution partners in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development and account management. In such instances, our partner will process the relevant Personal Data as a separate data controller and the partner’s use and control over your Personal Data will be governed by their privacy policy. If you do not wish for your Personal Information to be shared in this manner, you may opt not to purchase or to specifically express interest in a jointly-offered product service, or program, or you may otherwise opt-out through any mechanism offered at the time the Personal Information is collected.
Affiliates.
We may share Personal Information with our affiliated companies including from other countries in which the Airship Group has operations in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development, recruiting, operations, account management, events or webinars, for general business purposes, in order to protect, exercise, establish or defend legal rights, where we are legally required to do so and to receive professional advice. Unless there is an adequacy decision by the European Commission for the respective third country outside the European Economic Area, such sharing is carried out on the basis that the transfer is necessary for the performance of a contract.
Advertising Partners.
Through our Sites, we may allow third-party advertising partners to set technologies and other tracking tools to collect information regarding your activities and your device ( your IP address, mobile identifiers, page(s) visited, location, time of day). Subject to the legal bases described in Section 3 (How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?) above, we may also combine and share such information and other information (such as demographic information and past purchase history) with third-party advertising partners. These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements regarding our Services to you when you visit third-party websites within their networks. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “online behavioral advertising.” We may allow access to other data collected by the Sites to share information that may be useful, relevant, valuable or otherwise of interest to you based on the interest you indicated via our Sites. Please refer to Section 5 (What device and usage data does Airship process?) below for more information on how these technologies and tracking tools work. If you prefer not to share your Personal Information with third-party advertising partners, you may follow the instructions in Section 11 (Your privacy rights. ) below. For California Residents, additional information is available in our
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
4.2 Disclosures to protect us or others.
Protection of Airship and others.
We may disclose Personal Information about you when we have a good faith belief that we are required to provide information: (a) if we are required to do so by law, court order or legal process; (b) in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements (but only in accordance with Airship’s Policy on Response to Public Authority Requests for Personal Data); (c) under the discovery process in litigation; (d) to enforce Airship policies or contracts; (e) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation or prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity; or (f) if we, believe that disclosure is otherwise necessary or advisable. In addition, from time to time, server logs and other systems may be reviewed for security purposes (e.g., to detect unauthorized activity on the Services). In such cases, records containing Personal Information may be shared with service providers, third parties and law enforcement bodies in order that they may prevent fraud or a security issue in accordance with the Airship Acceptable Use Policy and/or identify users in connection with their investigation of the unauthorized activities.
4.3 Disclosure in the event of merger, sale, or other asset transfers.
Business Transfers.
We reserve the right to disclose or transfer any Personal Information in the event of a proposed or actual purchase, any reorganization, sale, lease, merger, joint venture, assignment, amalgamation or any other type of acquisition, disposal or financing of all or any portion of our business or of any of the business assets or shares (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
5. What device and usage data does Airship process?
Like many companies, Airship uses services that employ cookies and other technologies to collect Personal Information (including the identifiers and internet activity information described here) about your use of our Sites or Services, which helps us to deliver to you improved Services performance, relevant information, or targeted ads. As part of this process, we use common information-gathering tools for collecting usage data, cookies, web beacons and similar technologies to automatically collect information that may contain Personal Information from your computer or mobile device as you navigate our Sites or use our Services.
5.1 Cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies in our Services.
As you navigate the Sites and use the Services, certain passive information is also collected through the use of cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to obtain certain information about your computer, device, browsing actions, and patterns. This includes IP addresses, cookie IDs, navigational data, content clicked, the name of the domain and host from which you access the Internet, the browser software you use and your operating system, your browser settings, your device type and similar information, the date and time you access our Services and other device identifiers. This type of information is used for the purposes of gathering data to provide improved administration of our Services and to improve the quality of your experience when interacting with our Services (see Your Privacy Rights section below for more information). If you consent to the use of cookies and web beacons when you navigate and use the Services, we will collect information through those tools.
Where your Personal Information is collected through these technologies by Airship as Controller, it will be processed in accordance with the provisions of this Privacy Statement.
Where third party technologies allow our partners to collect and process your Personal Information, we encourage you to review their privacy policy to see the terms and conditions under which your Personal Information will be processed by them. A link to these privacy policies is included for each of our partners in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement. For California residents, additional information is included in our
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
Cookies.
A cookie is a small text file that a website saves on your computer or mobile device when you visit the website. Cookies are then sent back to the originating website on each subsequent visit, or to another website that recognizes that cookie, to develop a record of the user’s online activity. When you visit our Sites, we or an authorized third party may place a cookie on your browser and/or device which collects information, including Personal Information, about your online activities over time and across different sites. Cookies allow us to track usage, determine your browsing preferences and improve and customize your browsing experience. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
(French version:
https://www.allaboutcookies.org/fr/
. German version:
https://www.allaboutcookies.org/ge/
).
We use both session-based and persistent cookies on our Sites. Session-based cookies exist only during one session and disappear from your computer when you close your browser or turn off your computer or device. Persistent cookies remain on your computer or device after you close or turn off. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, but choosing to disable cookies may limit your use of certain features or functions on our Services.
Types of cookies on our Sites:
Essential Cookies.
These cookies are necessary for the Sites to function and cannot be switched off. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the Sites, authentication cookies, and security cookies. These cookies also support certain features on the Sites, such as the live chat feature. Further description of the purposes of the essential cookies used in our Sites is available in the Cookies Settings at the bottom of this web page. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the Sites will then not work.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, session identifiers, browser and/or terminal information, browsing data and preferences (including your choice of cookies). The legal basis for the processing of this Personal Information is the legitimate interest of Airship in ensuring that the Sites function correctly to the preferences indicated by each user. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our partners authorized to deposit essential cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
Functional and Analytics Cookies.
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance and services on the Services. They enable us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Services. Functional cookies also enable us to improve how our Services function and to help us provide you with more relevant communications, including marketing communications. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around and use the Services. We may use our own technology or third-party technology to track and analyze usage information to provide enhanced interactions and more relevant communications and to enable certain features on the Services. We also use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting and other similar providers to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on some of our Services, and to develop website content. Further description of the purposes of the functional and analytics cookies used in our Services is available in the Cookies Settings at the bottom of this web page.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, browser and/or terminal information, navigational data and content clicked. The legal basis for processing this Personal Information is your prior consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each Functional and Analytics cookie. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our partners authorized to deposit functional and analytics cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
Marketing Cookies.
These cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a visitor’s interest, and to direct specific marketing to them. Targeting and advertising cookies may be set through our Sites by our service providers. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant advertisements on other sites. Further description of the purposes of the targeting cookies used in our Sites is available in the Cookies Settings.
Through the use of some of these cookies, Airship collects and processes certain Personal Information about you in order to carry out the above purposes. This includes your IP address, unique identifier, location information, information about your browser and/or terminal, your interests as identified through your browsing, the advertising content you have viewed and your interactions with that content. The legal basis for processing this Personal Information is your prior consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each Marketing cookie. Your Personal Information will be kept only for the time necessary to fulfill the above-mentioned purposes.
The list of our service providers authorized to deposit targeting cookies is available in the cookie providers table provided at the end of this Privacy Statement and in the Cookies Setting at the bottom of this page.
For more information about cookies, and how to disable them, please see “Your Privacy Choices” below.
Web beacons.
We also use web beacons (sometimes called “pixel tags” or “tracking pixels”). These are tiny graphics files that contain a unique identifier that is embedded in our Sites and in our emails or other communications that are sent through our Services. This enables us, for example, to monitor the traffic patterns of users from one page within our Site to another, to track access to the communications sent through our Services, to understand whether you have come to our Sites from an online advertisement displayed on a third-party website or whether you have viewed advertisements on our Sites or through the Services, or to improve our Sites’ performance.
Legal basis for our use of your Personal Information under applicable data protection laws in relation to Web beacons is your consent when we ask for your consent to process your Personal Information for the specific purpose of each of such Web beacons.
To change your cookie settings (including Web beacon settings) and preferences for the Sites you are visiting, use the Cookie Settings link at the bottom of the webpage.
For more information about Web beacons, and how to disable them, please see “Your Privacy Choices” below. SDKs. We may use third party APIs and software development kits (“SDKs”) as part of the functionality of our Services. APIs and SDKs may allow third parties, including analytics and advertising partners, to collect your Personal Information for various purposes including to provide analytics services and content that is more relevant to you.
5.2 Social media features.
Airship collects Personal Information as described above in Section 2.1 in the Social Media Content to enable individuals to use online social media resources offered either by Airship or a third party. We may also enable you to use these social media resources to post or share Personal Information with others. When using social media resources, you should take into careful consideration what Personal Information you share with others.
In addition, social media links such as Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, Instagram,YouTube, SoundCloud and Slideshare (that might include widgets such as the “share this” button or other interactive mini-programs) are on our Site. These features collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our site, and set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These social media features are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Site. Your interactions with these features apart from your visit to our Site are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
5.3 Chat Technologies
We use chat technologies provided by third-party service providers that employ cookies and software code to operate the chat features you can use to communicate with us through our Sites. We and such third-party vendors may monitor, record and use information from your interactions with our Sites. This information includes details you have shared through online chats, data on sections of the Sites you have visited, your IP address and your general geographic information (e.g., city, state). This Personal Information may be processed for the purposes outlined in Sections 3.1 (Providing information and Services you requested.) and 3.4 (Research and development.) of this Privacy Statement.
6. International data transfers.
We store Personal Information sent or collected via or by us in the United States or the European Economic Area, in the cloud, our servers, the servers of our affiliates or the servers of our service providers. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer, store and access such information from the locations where Airship has operations – specifically the United States, France, Germany, the United Kingdom, Singapore, or India. Your Personal Information may be processed in any of these countries, and they may have data protection laws that are different or that may not provide the same level of data protection as your country. In the event of data transfers outside of the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, or Singapore among Airship affiliates, and with our service providers and data processors , we rely on international transfer mechanisms such as the European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses, as described in Section 7 below (EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”), adequacy decisions about certain countries, or we will ask you for your prior consent for the transfer of your Personal Information, as applicable. In addition, we ensure the recipient of your Personal Information has in place adequate levels of protection for your Personal Information.
When you visit one of our Company Social Media Webpages on a social media platform as described in Section 2.1 (2.1 Personal Information we collect directly. Social Media Content.) above, Personal Information may be transferred to providers in countries outside the European Economic Area, which, from the perspective of the European Union (“EU”), do not ensure an “adequate level of protection” for the processing of Personal Information in line with EU standards. Please bear this in mind before clicking on a link or visiting directly a Company Social Media Webpage and thereby triggering a transfer of your data.
For more information about the protections in place and a sample copy of the model contractual clauses, please contact us at
privacy@airship.com
.
7. EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”)*
Airship complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Airship has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of Personal Information received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Airship has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the relevant Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your Personal Information.  EU, UK, or Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Airship at:
privacy@airship.com
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you. Under certain conditions, an individual may invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by JAMS as described here above.  More information is available at:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Airship commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human resources data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in the context of the employment relationship.
Airship remains liable for the processing of Personal Information received under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF and subsequently transferred to a third party acting on our behalf if this entity processes such Personal Information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Airship’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Information  in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements and we will do so in accordance with the
Airship’s Policy on Response to Public Authority Requests for Personal Data
.
*The EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF  do not apply to Airship Group, Inc.’s affiliate, Apptimize, LLC, and the Apptimize Service.
8. What
security measures
does Airship have in place?
The security of Personal Information provided to us is of utmost importance to us. We have implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Information is no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@airship.com
.
9. How long does Airship retain Personal Information?
We retain the Personal Information we receive as described in this Privacy Statement for a period consistent with the original purpose of collection (see Section 3 (How does Airship use Personal Information and what are the legal bases for these uses?) above) or as long as necessary to fulfill our legal obligations. We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information on the basis of the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Information being processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the Personal Information, whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, and on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation). The Airship corporate Data Retention Policy sets forth the period for Personal Information described in Section 2 (What Personal Information does Airship collect?) of this Privacy Statement. The corporate Data Retention Policy does not apply to customer data collected via the Services, which is subject to data agreements entered into between Airship and the customer. For information specific to data retention periods related to the Airship corporate Data Retention Policy, which is Airship confidential information, please email
privacy@airship.com
. The Data Retention Schedule available here specifies the default data retention settings for the Airship Platform.
After expiry of the applicable retention periods set forth in the Airship corporate Data Retention Policy, your Personal Information will be deleted. If there is any Personal Information that we are unable, for technical reasons, to delete entirely from our systems, we will implement appropriate measures to prevent any further use of such Personal Information.
For more information on data retention periods, please contact us by emailing
privacy@airship.com
.
10. Are Airship’s Sites intended for children?
Due to the nature of our business, Services are not marketed to or intended for minors under the age of 18. Airship does not knowingly solicit or collect Personal Information from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe your child has provided us with Personal Information without your consent, please contact us by using the Contact Us information below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Information from our Services.
11. Your privacy rights.
You have certain choices available to you when it comes to your Personal Information. Below is a summary of those choices, how to exercise them and any limitations.
California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
.
Singapore job applicants and employees of Airship Global Pte. Ltd. may read our supplemental
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
.
Opt-out.
Where you have consented to our processing of your Personal Information, you may withdraw that consent at any time and opt out by following the instructions in this Section 11. Additionally, before we use Personal Information for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and give you the opportunity to opt in to the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Information is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the applicable law or contract. Note that, due to the nature of the Services you may have to log in to your account or provide the email and/or other identifying value or information that is associated with your Personal Information in order for us to be able to complete your request. Note that if you withdraw your consent to processing, some features of the Services may not be available.
Email unsubscribe.
An “Unsubscribe” link will be provided in each email communication sent by us so that you can opt out. However, we may continue to send non-promotional, transaction-related emails in response to your request regarding any products or services of the Airship Platform you have requested. We may also need to send you certain important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications regarding updates to our Terms of Use or this Privacy Statement, service announcements or security information, and you will not be able to opt out of those communications.
Opt-out of cookies and ads.
We will only use cookies with your permission in compliance with applicable laws. You may stop or restrict the placement of technologies on your device or remove them by selecting “Reject All” in the cookie consent manager banner, by adjusting your preferences as your browser or device permits, or for this Site using the Cookies Settings link at the bottom of the webpage in the cookie consent manager banner. You may also opt out by enabling Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law as further described below in the Do Not Track subsection. The online advertising industry also provides websites from which you may opt out of receiving targeted ads from data partners and other advertising partners that participate in self-regulatory programs. You can access these and learn more about targeted advertising and consumer choice and privacy, at
www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
,
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
,
https://youradchoices.ca/choices/
, and
www.aboutads.info/choices/
. To separately make choices for mobile apps on a mobile device, you can download DAA’s AppChoices application from your device’s app store. Alternatively, for some devices you may use your device’s platform controls in your settings to exercise choice.
Please note you must separately opt out in each browser and on each device. Advertisements on third-party websites that contain the AdChoices link may have been directed to you based on information collected by advertising partners over time and across websites. These advertisements provide a mechanism to opt out of the advertising partners’ use of this information for interest-based advertising purposes.
Do Not Track.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. DNT is a way for users to inform websites and services that they do not want certain information about their webpage visits collected over time and across websites or online services. You may opt out by enabling Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law. Enabling GPC will automatically set your cookie settings to opt out of the sharing of Personal Information for behavioral advertising. If you choose to use GPC, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Other than GPC, Airship does not recognize or respond to browser-initiated DNT signals, whether that signal is received on a computer or a mobile device. For information about “do-not-track”, visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.org
.
Access, correct, amend, port, restrict processing, or delete Personal Information. You have the right to control or change certain uses and disclosures of your Personal Information, as set out in this Privacy Statement. Subject to any exemptions provided by law, you have the right to: seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request to know more details about the categories or specific pieces of Personal Information we collect; to ask that we correct, update, amend or delete your Personal Information; to ask that we do not sell your Personal Information (where “sale” is defined according to the local regulations in your state of residency); and to not be discriminated against for exercising these rights. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information as “sales” are defined under the laws of Nevada or California, as further detailed below in the sections dedicated to those locations. We will respond to such requests within a reasonable timeframe. California residents and customers with business in the State of California may read our supplemental
California Privacy Rights Notice
for information in addition to and as a complement to the rights listed here as to your rights under the California privacy laws.
You may email
privacy@airship.com
to exercise one of the individual rights outlined above with regard to Personal Information held about you by us. Such requests will be processed in accordance with local laws. We will respond to such requests within a reasonable timeframe. Although we make good faith efforts to provide individuals with access to their Personal Information, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to the individual’s privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. If we determine that access should be restricted in any particular instance, we will provide you with an explanation of why that determination has been made and a contact point for any further inquiries. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Information. In addition, please note that we may need to retain certain information for record keeping purposes, to complete transactions or to comply with our legal obligations. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the GDPR, CCPA, the Singapore Personal Data Protection Act 2012  or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations.
EU residents.
If you are located in the European Economic Area or the UK, in addition and as a complement to the rights mentioned above, you also have the following rights:
The right of access means that you may, at any time, request to be informed as to whether we are processing any Personal Information concerning you, and, where that is the case, what Personal Information we are processing, as well as the characteristics of the processing activities carried out.
The right of rectification means that you may request rectification of your Personal Information where it is incorrect. You may also request, where your Personal Information is incomplete, that it be completed insofar as it is relevant to the purpose of the processing activity in question.
The right to erasure means that you may request erasure of your Personal Information, particularly where: (i) they are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected (ii) your Personal Information are processed on the basis of your consent, you wish to withdraw consent and there is no other legal ground for the processing of your data (iii) you object to the processing of your Personal Information and wish therefore to have them deleted (iv) your Personal Information have been unlawfully processed; (v) your Personal Information must be deleted to meet a legal obligation provided either under European Union law.
The right of limitation means that you may request that we limit the processing of your Personal Information (i) where you challenge the accuracy of your Personal Information, for a period of time enabling us to verify the accuracy of said Personal Information, (ii) where, processing has been proved to be non-compliant and you prefer that we limit the processing of your Personal Information instead of full erasure, (iii) we no longer need your Personal Information for the purposes of processing but you still need them for the establishment, exercise or defense of a legal claim; (iv) where you have objected to the processing of your Personal Information and you wish to limit processing for the period of time required to verify whether the legitimate reason you present is indeed justified. Limited processing means that processing of your Personal Information will be limited to the mere storage of the corresponding personal data. We will not carry out any other operation involving the Personal Information in question.
The right of objection means that you may object to the processing of your Personal Information, where such processing is based on the pursuit of our legitimate interests (or those of a third party). The right of objection may be exercised where a legitimate reason concerning your particular situation can be proven. In particular, you have a right to object if we process your data for direct marketing purposes. We will cease the processing of your Personal Information unless there is an imperative and legitimate reason for us to keep carrying out this processing activity in accordance with the applicable regulations.
The right to define guidelines regarding what happens to your Personal Information after your death allows you to indicate your instructions concerning your Personal Information and how they are kept, deleted and communicated after your death.
The right to portability means that you may receive, on your request, and according to the applicable legislation, your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format, or, on your request, have them communicated directly to a third-party of your choice, where this is legally and technically possible.
The right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you believe our processing of your Personal Information violates applicable law.
In addition, you have the right to be informed whether you are subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects (“Automated Decision-Making”) or not. Automated Decision-Making currently does not take place on our Sites or Services.
Special Consent Terms for German Residents
: If you are located in Germany, the following consent terms apply to Personal Information shared by you with Airship via the Sites:
You hereby consent to Airship Group, Inc. (“Airship”) processing your voluntarily provided Personal Information in order to occasionally receive the latest resources, reports and events information from Airship about its mobile marketing and engagement services. Except as otherwise described in this Privacy Statement, your Personal Information will not be forwarded to third parties.
You can withdraw your consent to receive information from Airship about its mobile marketing and engagement services at any time (without any cost) by clicking at the unsubscribe link at the bottom of each of our emails (if applicable, also with regard to the use of your telephone number) or by sending an email to
privacy@airship.com
. The withdrawal of consent shall not affect the lawfulness of the processing carried out on the basis of the consent until revocation.
By submitting your Personal Information via the form on the Sites, you confirm that you agree to the processing of your Personal Information by Airship as described above in this Privacy Statement, which also informs you about your other data subject rights.
California residents.
Please refer to the
California Privacy Rights Notice here
.
Colorado residents.
If you are a resident of Colorado, you have the right to: opt out of the processing of Personal Information; seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request deletion of Personal Information; request correction of inaccuracies in your Personal Information; opt out of processing of your Personal Information for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer; or obtain and transfer your Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Colorado Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account.
Nevada residents.
If you are a resident of Nevada, you have the right to: opt out of the processing of Personal Information; opt-out of the sale of certain Personal Information to third parties who intend to license or sell that Personal Information; or request correction of inaccuracies in your Personal Information. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Nevada Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information as sales are defined in Nevada Revised Statutes Chapter 603A.
Singapore residents.
If you are a job applicant or employee located in Singapore, you have the rights as described in the
Singapore Job Applicant and Employee Data Protection Policy
.  You may exercise these rights by contacting us at privacy@airship.com.
Virginia residents.
If you are a resident of Virginia, you have the right to: seek confirmation regarding whether we are processing Personal Information about you; request access to Personal Information; request corrections of inaccuracies in your Personal Information; request deletion of Personal Information; or to opt out of processing of your Personal Information for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer. Please note that we do not currently sell your Personal Information or engage in profiling as those terms are defined in the Virginia Data Consumer Protection Act. You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@airship.com
with the subject line “Virginia Data Rights Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account.
Customer Data.
If you are an individual seeking to exercise your data protection rights (including to seek access to, or to correct, amend, delete, port or restrict processing) in respect of Personal Information stored or processed by us on behalf of one of our customers within the Airship Platform, then you should direct your request to our customer (the data controller). Upon receipt of a request from one of our customers for us to remove the personal data, we will respond to their request within provided in our agreements with the customer. We will retain Personal Information that we process and store on behalf of our customers for as long as needed to provide the services to our customers.
Redress, compliance and accountability.
If, after reviewing this Privacy Statement, you would like to submit a request or you have any questions or privacy concerns, please contact:
privacy@airship.com
or use the contact information in Section 14 (Contact Us) below.
Airship will address your concerns and attempt to resolve any privacy issues in a timely manner.
If you are an EU, Swiss or UK citizen and feel that Airship is not abiding by the terms of this Privacy Statement, please contact us at the contact information provided below. If any request remains unresolved, you may contact the national data protection authority for your EU Member State, Switzerland or United Kingdom.
EU Representative:
Airship France S.A.S has been appointed as Airship’s representative in the EU for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the EU GDPR. To make an inquiry on matters related to the processing of Personal Information under the EU GDPR, please contact Airship France S.A.S at:
Airship France S.A.S
33 rue La Fayette
75009
Paris, France
AirshipLegalEU@airship.com
UK Representative:
Urban Airship UK Ltd. has been appointed as Airship’s representative in the UK for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the UK GDPR. To make an inquiry on matters related to the processing of Personal Information under the EU GDPR, please contact Urban Airship UK, Ltd. at:
Urban Airship UK Ltd.
WeWork
c/o Urban Airship UK
1 St Katharine’s Way
LondonE1W 1UN, United Kingdom
AirshipLegalUK@airship.com
12. Third party sites
Please note that our Services may contain links to other websites or digital properties for your convenience and information. We do not control third-party websites, digital properties or their privacy practices, which may differ from those set out in this Privacy Statement. We do not endorse or make any representations about partner or third-party websites or digital properties. Any Personal Information you choose to give to an unrelated third party is not covered by this Privacy Statement. We encourage you to review the privacy policy of any company, website or digital property before submitting your Personal Information. Some third parties may choose to share their users’ Personal Information with us; that sharing is governed by that company’s privacy policy, not this Privacy Statement.
13. Changes to this Privacy Statement
We may update this Privacy Statement from time to time as deemed necessary in our sole discretion. We will provide notification of any material changes to this Privacy Statement through our Sites or as otherwise required by applicable law. We encourage you to review this Privacy Statement periodically to be informed regarding how we are using and protecting your Personal Information and to be aware of any policy changes. Your continued relationship with us after the posting or notice of any amended Privacy Statement shall constitute your agreement to be bound by any such changes. Any changes to this Privacy Statement take effect immediately after being posted or otherwise provided by us.
14. Contact Us
If you have any questions about our privacy practices or this Privacy Statement, or if you wish to submit a request to exercise your rights, please contact us at:
Airship Group, Inc.
548 Market St
PMB 698370
San Francisco, California 94104-5401
privacy@airship.com
1-855-391-5311
Cookie Providers for Airship.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
CloudFlare
https://www.cloudflare.com/en-ca/privacypolicy/
Django
https://www.djangoproject.com/
F5
https://www.f5.com/company/policies/f5-big-ip-services-privacy-statement
OneTrust
https://www.onetrust.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bizible / Marketo
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/privacy/
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Hotjar
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
New Relic
https://newrelic.com/termsandconditions/privacy
Segment
https://segment.com/legal/privacy/
Unbounce
https://unbounce.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Atlassian Jira Servicedesk
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy
Bing Ads
https://about.ads.microsoft.com/en-gb/resources/policies/microsoft-advertising-privacy-policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Twitter
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Cookie Providers for Apptimize.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
CloudFlare
https://www.cloudflare.com/en-ca/privacypolicy/
F5
https://www.f5.com/company/policies/f5-big-ip-services-privacy-statement
OneTrust
https://www.onetrust.com/privacy/
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bizible / Marketo
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/privacy/
CloudFoundry
https://www.linuxfoundation.org/privacy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Hotjar
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
New Relic
https://newrelic.com/termsandconditions/privacy
Segment
https://segment.com/legal/privacy/
Stripe
https://stripe.com/privacy
Zendesk
https://www.zendesk.de/company/agreements-and-terms/privacy-policy/?_ga=2.123017803.179450336.1628117080-1095846790.1625160489
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Bing Ads
https://about.ads.microsoft.com/en-gb/resources/policies/microsoft-advertising-privacy-policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Heap Analytics (heap.io)
https://heap.io/privacy
Facebook
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Pardot (Salesforce)
https://www.salesforce.com/eu/gdpr/pardot/
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/
Twitter
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Cookie Providers for Gummicube.com
Necessary Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Functional and Analytics Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
LinkedIn
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Targeting Cookies
Service provider
Privacy policy
Google
https://policies.google.com/privacy
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, personalize content and to help us better understand how you use our sites. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners. To set your own preferences and to learn more about the cookies we use click "Cookie Settings" in the footer. If we have detected the GPC opt-out preference signal, then it will be honored.
Privacy Policy
Cookies Settings
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Your Privacy
Essential Cookies
Functional Cookies
Marketing Cookies
Your Privacy
When you visit our website, we may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Privacy Statement
Always Active
These cookies are essential for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not gather information about you that are used for marketing purposes.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
Switch Label
label
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Marketing Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 7
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Hauptmenü
Google-Apps
Sub-policy 8
https://privacy-portal.smartclip.net/en/:
English
ENGLISH
DEUTSCH
ESPAÑOL
ITALIANO
NEDERLANDS
FRANÇAIS
Privacy Policy
Legal Notice
Home
Register
Login
|
Publisher
Home
Register
Login
Privacy Policy
Legal Notice
English
ENGLISH
DEUTSCH
ESPAÑOL
ITALIANO
NEDERLANDS
FRANÇAIS
smartclip Privacy Goals
Overview smartclip Technology Platforms & Applications
Purpose of Data Collection - why do we collect personal data?
Legal Base for Processing User Data
Which data is stored, where and how long?
Data Processing outside the European Union
Recipient categories of personal data from smartclip and purposes of processing
Your rights as a Data Subject
How to get in contact with us for privacy matters?
Important Legal Contact Information
Privacy Seals from external Auditors
List of Subprocessor or Data Transfer Partnerships
Opt Out
smartclip Privacy Goals
Online advertising is currently in the focus of the public discussion. Recent press about the manipulation of elections and political decisions of internet users on social media sites like Facebook have shown, that the threat of user data being abused for particular interests of unnamed actors is real. Unfortunately we also observe, that while born as a medium of free and unlimited information exchange, the internet is now turning into a means of user superveillance and governmental control in a growing number of countries. Therefore it is our strong belief at smartclip, that any usage of user data for commercial purposes (like online advertising) has to follow strict ethical standards to avoid any abuse by third parties.
We still think, that online advertising is an important pillar to maintain a free and open internet for everybody. We do not think, that an internet, where all relevant and high quality content is hidden behind paywalls is something we should aim for. Therefore keeping online marketing attractive for advertisers, while at the same time ensuring a pleasant and safe advertising experience for the end user remains our main goal.
To be able to keep online advertising attractive, the usage of personal data from end users who are visiting the websites of our publisher partners is required. Basic functionality, e.g. avoiding that you see the same advertisement all the time, but also more sophisticated functionality, e.g. showing only relevant and interesting advertisements to you, requires the usage of cookies - which are currently demonized to some degree. Unfortunately, the public discussion here lacks differentiation. It is a myth, that using user information for online advertising inevitably means to stalk users on every step they take or every click they do. Technically, it is absolutely feasible to strictly limit the usage of information about users to a degree, which makes it completely impossible for any third party to abuse this data or to relate it to any real world individual.
And this is exactly what we are aiming for at smartclip:
We want to enable an attractive online advertising experience for both end users and our advertising clients for the benefit of a free and open internet. To do so smartclip will make usage of personal data, but only with regards to anonymous identifiers (e.g. stored in cookies) and only to an extent, that makes it impossible to relate this information to any real world person. smartclip does not and will not process or use data like email addresses, names, phone numbers, etc, which directly refers to named individuals.
Overview smartclip Technology Platforms & Applications
smartclip is operating a proprietary technology platform (usually referred to as SmartX or ATVx) which helps publishers and broadcasters to monetize their offerings by displaying interactive advertising.
Advertising on Web & Mobile Devices
Here is the the general functionality for serving advertisements on web and mobile devices:
The key workflow is triggered by a user, who is visiting the publisher’s website by requesting the website URL through the browser.
When the website is displayed in the browser an ad tag from smartclip is executed, which triggers a request (“adrequest”) to the smartclip adserving SSP / adserving system (“platform”) to receive an advertisement from smartclip.
smartclip is cooperating with different 3rd parties to ensure a sufficient amount of campaigns and thus monetization for the publisher:
If there is no eligible campaign in the smartclip platform, smartclip is forwarding the adrequest to Demand Side Platforms (“DSP”) which are aggregating advertiser campaigns for delivery on 3rd party websites.
If a creative from a 3rd party DSP has been selected and delivered to the user by the platform the DSPs again might trigger other 3rd party services (e.g. for audience or brand safety measurement).
For any creative shown, smartclip is also triggering requests to 3rd party brand safety measurement vendors, which are measuring the compliance of the website and the creative displayed with the expectation of the advertisers.
Furthermore, smartclip is synchronizing anonymous user IDs with 3rd party Data Management Platforms (DMPs) and also with the DSPs to be able to match users to user information on that 3rd party systems.
After the ad delivery process smartclip is aggregating the amount of delivered creatives incl. certain standard KPIs (e.g. click through rates, view through rates etc.). This information is used to invoice the advertisers and DSPs and to distribute the collected revenue share to the publishers.
Advertising & Analytics on Smart TVs
Business Model
smartclip is cooperating with TV broadcasters to offer two main services:
Reach & activity measurement of TV consumption of the broadcaster operated channels (only on SmartTV sets, connected to the internet with activated HbbTV services).
Delivery of graphical or video advertising on top of the linear TV signal.
smartclip is cooperating with advertisers to offer two main services:
Delivery of graphical or video advertisements on the aggregated channels of smartclip’s broadcaster partners.
Targeting & selling digital advertising on web & mobile devices, which can be associated with a TV set with digital advertisements related on TV viewing information of the TV set (household targeting).
General Workflow
When a TV set (HbbTV activated & connected to the internet) is switching the broadcaster channel which is cooperating with smartclip, the broadcasting signal contains a URL, which is triggering the TV set to load an application from a smartclip server.
The application allows smartclip to steer the delivery of advertising (by triggering the adrequest with the process described above). The application also triggers a signal, when the user switches in or away from the channel and every two minutes a heartbeat signal, as long as the channel is switched on.
Broadcasters can send the eligible time frames, in which smartclip is allowed to deliver advertisements, via an API to smartclip.
After an anonymization process smartclip is storing the times a TV set has been switched in to a channel and merges this information with the EPG information of the broadcasters. This enables smartclip to select & target anonymized TV devices based on viewing behavior.
Purpose of Data Collection - why do we collect personal data?
The usage of audience data is to one part technically mandatory to achieve a good advertising experience for you as a website visitor, but it also supports the efficient usage of marketing budgets by advertisers. Hence, not only publishers but also advertisers have a commercial interest in online marketing supported by audience targeting algorithms.
Storing anonymous identifiers
Anonymous identifiers are stored by your browser in cookies which are small files created in a specific directory on your device. Cookies are usually created automatically, but you can adjust the behaviour and even delete your cookies manually if needed.
Usage of anonymous identifiers
Data collection for steering the displaying of advertisements to website visitors, app users or TV viewers
The most important purpose of using anonymous identifiers is to be able to control and count the amount of advertising which is shown to the users on their web, mobile and TV devices. We use identifiers for:
Controlling the frequency of how often the user is seeing the same advertisement (frequency capping)
Counting impressions, clicks and viewing completion rates of advertisements
Counting the unique number of users / devices who have seen a certain advertisement within a certain frequency
Being able to prefer users in advertising delivery who are likely to interact or fully view an advertisement
Being able to prefer users for ad display who seem to belong to a certain age range or gender based on websites these user prefer. Goal is to show more relevant advertisements.
What you can see from all those purposes of data collection, is that you as a user benefit from it, especially by not being bothered by the same advertisement dozens of times or seeing irrelevant ads, e.g seeing an ad for diapers while being a silver haired single. This is directly contributing to a positive internet usage experience for you.
Being able to count impressions, clicks and to measure ad consumptions are important functionalities for advertisers as well. They are paying publishers for every ad they show and need to have reliable numbers for this. Also advertisers need to understand how users are interacting with their creatives, because also advertisers want to present entertaining advertisements which are able to gain the user’s attention.
How does that work?
Do you think this sounds scary? Well, the technology behind it is really simple and harmless. The only thing we do, to enable all these purposes mentioned above, is to set a cookie on your browser or by using the advertiser ID which is created by your mobile device.
The reason why we need this ID is very simple: since we do not know who you are, we still need to be able to recognize you, when you are having contacts to smartclip ads to understand, if you have seen an advertisement already.
Storing an anonymous number in your browser or using the replaceable Advertisement ID of your device is a very simple way to do that. Since the number does not tell us anything about your name, email address etc. it is also a user and privacy friendly way to enable this. These IDs are just randomly generated numbers, which are completely unrelated to any data, which would allow us (or anyone else) to identify you as person. No one can use the ID to figure out who you really are.
Building interest profiles on user contacts with certain websites, apps or TV shows (only used at smartclip Germany)
Now it is time to talk about the scary stuff - building user profiles based on their surfing behavior. Exactly that stuff casts dark shadows on online advertising. The nightmare scenario related to that, is usually a dark vision of soulless intelligent machines, which are tracking every step the users takes and every action they do on their devices and use this information to build the fully transparent human being - influenced by secret algorithms to make them to will-less consumers …
You think, that this is a nightmare? Well, we completely agree! Therefore, we have a chosen a very careful approach to building behavioral profiles. We strictly limit this to the absolute minimum we need to be able to accomplish that advertising opportunities are used efficiently and not wasted for showing irrelevant ads. We have spend a lot of thinking in finding a way to build these individual profiles, but to make sure that they remain irreversibly anonymous. We will describe in the following paragraphs what we do and how the data is used.
The idea and algorithm behind this profiling activity is very simple. We try to guess your general interests by remembering, on which websites you have seen an advertising from us. A simple example: let us assume our system has observed, that you have seen three times an advertisement from us on the website “cars.com” within the last 30 days.  In this case it is likely, that you are interested in cars and to some degree it is more likely that you are male than a female. In this case it might be interesting for a car advertiser to preferably display ads to users, who share this behavior. These users are assigned to a so-called segment by the campaign manager at smartclip. Later on this segment can be used to show advertisements by this car advertiser.
The same mechanism is applied for TV shows viewed by the users on Smart TVs which are enabled for HbbTV. smartclip is also creating anonymous user IDs for TV devices, which are stored in cookies as well. Whenever a device is switched to a broadcaster station, which is cooperating with smartclip, we know which program is shown and can build segments of users, who e.g. like cooking shows or news.
It is very important to note, that these segments are created advertiser-specific by manually defined rules. We do NOT permanently try to put you into behavioral “baskets”. Instead we only do this, if it is relevant for a certain advertiser. Furthermore, we do not know for sure, if you e.g. are a male for a female. If you are surfing sites about beer frequently, there is a higher chance, that you are male. But still this prediction is only a guess. Also, these segmentations are only temporary and “forgotten” after 30 days of inactivity. We only keep segment information for longer periods, if needed for long running or repeating campaigns.
How does segmentation work technically?
Actually the technical approach again is based on anonymous user IDs. I.e. we just use the randomly generated number to recognize a device and put it into a specific segment basket for typical one time use. For us the only information we know about “you” is in fact a cryptic user ID as shown above, with cryptic segment IDs, which your user ID has been qualified for. None of these IDs could be used to resolve your name, email address or anything else.
Are anonymous identifiers really ensuring anonymity of your data?
Yes, there is practically no way, we could find out who you are by looking at the anonymous user ID. It would require us to have physical and software access to all devices which have been in contact to smartclip ads and to identify who is owning and using them. Then we would need to read the device IDs stored on all of them to finally find out, which one of those is yours. We hope you agree, that this is practically impossible. That is also the reason, why you should be skeptical, when cookies are demonized in the public discussion about online marketing. If cookies are used in a responsible manner, there is absolutely no privacy risk attached to it for the end user.
However, there is an Achilles heel in the game, which is the IP address, from which your device is calling the ads from our servers. The IP address is required in any internet communication and therefore transferred in adrequests to our systems. Since IP addresses of users normally are provided by ISPs or telecommunication companies to you, it would be possible to use the IP address to find out who you are. To do so, we would still need to force the ISP company by legal means to disclose your name to us. However this scenario is much more likely than smartclip employees breaking into millions of houses. Therefore the IP address needs to be treated with special care to make sure, you anonymity is safely protected. How we make use of IP addresses and what we do to protect your anonymity is described in the next section.
Usage of the IP address
As described above the IP address is transferred to the smartclip systems in the moment where an advertisement is requested from a user device. smartclip is using the IP addresses for four different purposes.
Resolving the geographic location from the user’s device
Some advertisers are selling their products only in certain countries regions or cities. For this reason advertisers want to avoid, that advertisements are shown in regions, where their products are not sold, because this would be a waste of money. The IP address can be used to roughly determine the geographic location of a user. By this users can be targeted on country, state and (with limited accuracy) also on a city level/postal code level. For this purpose smartclip resolves the IP address to a geographic location by using an external geographical database.  The IP address is also forwarded to sub-processor and buying partners for this purpose.
Fraud detection
Unfortunately, advertising fraud has become a serious problem in online marketing. Ad fraud usually means, that advertisements are displayed on artificial websites, where impressions are artificially generated and not by real human beings. The damage from fraudulent advertising is serious and estimated to be in the range of hundreds of million USD per year. To detect such fraudulent sites, the IP address plays a vital role. Botnets, which are inducing ad fraud are usually working with a limited range of IP addresses. For this reason IP addresses are so important for fraud prevention. Also buying partners and smartclip sub-processors are relying on the IP address for fraud detection.
Building group of devices associated with a TV set
One of the unsolved problems in digital marketing is the ability to optimize advertising frequencies for individuals across different device groups (like TV, web and mobile devices). I.e. it is currently not reliably possible to optimize ad delivery to the same individual on the TV set and other devices at the same time.
To give a simple example - let us assume an advertiser knows, that his ads for a certain product should be seen by a user 5 times to make him aware of the advertised product. With the current state of technology this cannot be achieved across TV and web devices at the same time. Since ad delivery systems for TV and web devices usually are different technologies, an overall optimization so far has not been possible. I.e. up to now the system for the delivery on the TV system could not “know”, that a user with a particular user ID has already seen the specific ad 3 time on his web device and therefore only needs 2 additional ad contacts on TV. This led to substantial inefficiencies for advertisers, since they could not reliably plan their campaigns and often reached not enough users or had too many ad contacts per user because of this technical shortfall.
smartclip has developed a technology which supports the delivery of advertisements on TV and web devices through the same platform. With this it became possible to optimize campaign delivery across TV, web and also mobile devices. However to be able to identify which web or mobile device belongs to a TV set, smartclip needs to match the different devices. For this purpose smartclip is using the IP address as well. When a TV and a mobile or web device are reaching the smartclip system from the same IP address smartclip assumes, that these signals are coming from the same household and establishes a connection between the TV set and the web or mobile device.
How do we make sure that data remains anonymous when using IP addresses?
The potential vulnerability of user privacy by processing the IP address has been addressed early on by smartclip. We have built several layers of protection to make sure, that anonymity is granted for users, who are getting in contact with smartclip advertisements.
Protection Layer 1: IP address anonymization service
smartclip has separated the processing of the IP address for geographic location and device matching from the ad delivery system. I.e. before the IP address reaches smartclip’s core system, where data is stored, it is shortened and hashed by an anonymization service. This service only determines the geographic information. Afterwards the service truncates and encrypts the IP address, before it is passed on to the smartclip core system. The original address is not stored and dropped after the encryption. By this the only information stored on smartclip servers cannot be restored anymore to the original IP address. Hence, the only piece of information, which could be used to identify you as a real world person is irreversibly destroyed.
Protection Layer 2: Grouping of IP addresses before matching devices
Since building connections between devices is nothing a user would naturally expect to happen, when surfing the internet or watching smart TV, smartclip has put specific attention on the full anonymization of any device matching. Again the IP address is is the critical data point. Since the IP address is used to do the matching, it would be relatively easy to assign a household to real world persons and to conclude on their interests and behaviors. Therefore smartclip has built in a safety mechanism, which completely prevents that.
Again the mechanism is quite simple - we are not matching devices based on single IP addresses, but only based on groups of five IP addresses at the same time.
Let’s explain that in more detail - assume we would live in a world of only 5 TV sets and 5 mobile devices (with each mobile device belonging to exactly one TV set) and with only 5 IP addresses (e.g. like 120 / 121 /122 / 123 / 124). If we now would use a single IP address for matching the TV set with a mobile devices, we would get scaringly precise information. We could exactly determine, which real world TV set is belonging to which mobile device and to which IP address. I.e. we would build exact profiles per person.  However, we are in a totally different game, if we are not using single IP addresses, but instead do the match on 5 IP addresses at the same time (i.e. here we would count all IP addresses which start with 12x as a match). Now the matching is totally vague. We are not anymore able to determine which device group is coming from which IP address.  And this exactly is, what an anonymization mechanism has ensure: that no conclusion to a determinable individual is possible.
Protection Layer 3: Minimizing the usage of the remaining data
For building these cross device profile we are again minimizing the usage of your data. We are also only matching devices around TV sets and do NOT try to find out if e.g. a mobile and a PC are connected without the reference to a TV set. I.e. if we are building TV usage profiles like described above, we are only building them for a group of devices, as a whole, but not for you individually.  By this we are making the collected information even more fuzzy, which again prevents, that anybody could conclude on you as an individual from our data. You again remain completely anonymous.
No usage of smartclip data for user scoring or automated contract decisioning
Just for the sake of clarity: None of the anonymous user profiles, which smartclip is generating is used for any decision making or scoring related to automated decision making processes (e.g. online loans, ecommerce transactions etc.). The data we are collecting is fully anonymized and cannot be related to you as a real world individual.
Legal Base for Processing User Data
Cookie Opt in / Opt Out in accordance with the national implementation of the ePrivacy Regulation of 2008 (Directive 95/46/EC)
Cookies set by websites or apps from publishers or broadcasters who are working with smartclip
The ePrivacy Regulation from 2008 determined the currently valid regulations for the usage of cookies for online marketing. This regulation has been implemented differently within the countries belonging to the European Union. Some countries are still considering an opt out possibility to be sufficient, while in many countries so-called “Cookie banners” or “Cookie walls” have become the market standard for the usage of cookies. Although with the new GDPR many privacy regulations have been changed, the current ePrivacy guidelines remain valid legislation. Therefore, you should still see cookie walls or being offered opt out opportunities when surfing the web.
For most of the data smartclip is handling, smartclip is acting as a processor, i.e. the data is sent to smartclip from websites, apps or smart TVs which are operated by other companies (referred to as “publishers” in the following). smartclip is only processing data from these companies if a valid data processing agreement is in place, which also foresees the obligation of the publisher to only send data to smartclip, for which the publisher has requested a cookie opt in or opt out possibility, in accordance with the regulations and practices in your country.
If you feel, that information about you is stored without your consent or sufficient information, we recommend you to check your browsing history, if websites or apps you have visited are providing sufficient information or cookie guidance (in line with the regulations for cookie consent in your country). In cases, where publishers do not provide sufficient cookie information, please address that with the publisher directly. You can also notify us in these cases, if such a publisher is displaying advertisements from smartclip by sending an email to the following email address:
privacy@smartclip.tv
.
It is pretty easy for you to check, if you have been in contact with advertisement from smartclip. You just need to open the browser you are using for surfing the internet and look for the browser settings. There should be a “privacy” or “browser data” section, where you can find which internet domains are storing cookies on your device. If you find a cookie originating from “smartclip.net” this points to a contact to a smartclip advertisement. You can easily delete this (and all other cookies) in your browser. Once you delete your cookies, the formerly provided user ID is gone and cannot be related to information stored at smartclip anymore. If you should see cookies from smartclip.com, then those are just session cookies you have obtained, when visiting our website or our privacy portal, which is hosted in Germany.
Cookies which are set on TV devices are based on the permission to set them obtained by the broadcaster directly from you. This is usually the case when you are using so-called “red button applications” on your smart TV. Usually you are invited to use them, when you are switching to a broadcast station, which is offering these services. They should point you to the terms and conditions and their privacy statement, when using them. Usually here you will find all informations where and why cookies are set.
In some cases smartclip is integrated directly into the broadcaster channel to display advertising and to do TV consumption analytics as described above without any red button application involved. In these cases smartclip has informed you when switching in to the channel, the first time our application is launched or is pointing to the privacy terms when presenting an advertisement to you (in Germany). You can still open up our privacy terms on your TV set any time when switched in to these channels by pressing the blue bottom of your remote control. From there you can also opt out from our measurement service any time you want. Furthermore, we are pointing at our privacy terms every time, we are presenting an advertisement to you.
Behavioral segmentation and IP address usage based on legitimate interest according to Article 6.1 lit. f  GDPR
smartclip is cooperating with website owners or website aggregators (“publishers”) to sell digital video advertising on the publisher’s website. For doing this smartclip is usually receiving a certain share of the advertising revenue, which has been generated for a publisher. These activities are important pillars for publishers to refinance the production of video and website content you mostly can consume free of charge.
Online advertising has become an established marketing channel, meanwhile accounting roughly for 20% of all advertising spendings. Therefore, it is not only an important means of advertisers to reach audiences with marketing messages, it also became a very important income stream for publishers to monetize their content and provide internet services free of charge for their users. That means smartclip and all involved business partners have a comprehensible and legitimate interest to make use of the personal data.
smartclip is processing anonymous identifiers and IP addresses solely for the purposes, which have been described above. For every data point smartclip is using, the relevant use cases have been defined and an assessment has been conducted if the interest of smartclip in using that data point is in balance with the user interest in privacy. This assessment has been discussed and audited by external privacy experts and auditors. smartclip is not processing name, email addresses or sensitive data categories according to Article 6.1 lit. f GDPR. smartclip is not consciously or specifically collecting data from children.
It is smartclip’s explicit goal to limit the usage of personal data to such a minimum, that the anonymity of the end user remains protected at all times. Therefore, smartclip’s usage of personal data does not create any potential threat to our data subjects. Even in the case of data leaks or data losses in smartclip’s system, the affected data could not be reassigned to identifiable individuals. We strongly believe, that with this “privacy by design” approach, we are fully respecting and protecting the interest of our users in their privacy.
Which data is stored, where and how long?
smartclip is storing personal data only when necessary and only as long as reasonably needed to conduct its regular business. smartclip is not storing IP addresses, but only their truncated and encrypted hashes.
IP address hashes and anonymous identifiers related to advertising contacts (i.e. adrequest, bidrequest, impression and click data) are stored in log files. Log files are required for smartclip’s advertising and publisher partners in cases of disputes. Log files contain the user ID, browser, date, time, website url, hashed IP address, operating system and device type on which the advertisement has been shown. If advertisers or publishers are counting deviating numbers of ad impressions, this can lead to disputes about the payments to make to or from smartclip. In such cases log files are the only means of proof to validate the accuracy of smartclip invoices or credit notes. Log files are also required to generate aggregated reports about advertising campaign delivery on websites, which are provided to smartclip’s clients. In cases, where the data aggregation fails, server log files are needed to restore this information. We are storing log files for a term of
120 days
. Usually reporting issues or invoice disputes are not occurring later than that period.
Anonymous identifiers and their assignment to segments are stored in a key value database and for TV analytics within specialized analytical databases. User IDs stored in cookies and the related information are deleted
30 days
after the last contact. Cookies on TV devices are set for a lifetime of
1 year
. We are using longer expiration periods, because we need the cookies on TV sets to manage opt in or opt out information. Cookies which are storing opt out information are set for a lifetime of
10 years
. Raw data in our TV analytics database is stored for
120 Days.
As written above segmentation cookies are set for campaign specific periods usually in the range of
30 to 90 days
.
Data Processing outside the European Union
smartclip itself is not processing personal data outside the European Union. smartclip is hosting its infrastructure on Amazon Webservice only in data centers in Germany and Dublin. However smartclip is working with sub-processors and companies, who are processing data on servers within the United States. This processing is happening based on appropriate safeguards and binding corporate rules according to Articles 46/47 GDPR. For more information please visit the sub-processor and partner web pages as listed in our privacy portal below.
Recipient categories of personal data from smartclip and purposes of processing
smartclip is cooperating with different 3rd parties to ensure a sufficient amount of campaigns on our publishers and broadcaster inventories.
Agencies and direct advertisers
Agencies and direct advertisers are booking campaigns to run on inventory sold by smartclip. Partly, agencies and advertisers are using 3rd party technology to deliver the advertisements on the pages of smartclip publishers (so-called agency adservers). In these cases the adrequest is forwarded from the user’s device to the agency adserver, which is then serving the ad to this user.
When the adrequest is forwarded to the agency adserver, the IP address of the users device is also transferred to this system. Furthermore the agency adserver can also set cookies on the user device. The creative which is served to the user can also contain links to other third party systems. Therefore adserving through agency adservers can be a door opener for the undesired leakage of personal data to third parties.
smartclip is applying three different approaches to prevent this kind of data leakage:
Whitelisting of 3rd party adservers and measurement systems by closing own data processing agreements with these companies
Here smartclip is entering into direct relationships with relevant third parties and agrees with them if and to which extent personal data coming from smartclip systems is used. This provides a contractual framework and control rights for smartclip to avoid undesired data usage. smartclip will then generally allow adserving from and using these 3rd parties within creative code.
Direct agreement with agencies or direct advertisers with an agreed framework for personal data usage
Here smartclip is entering into direct relationships with the agency or the advertisers and agrees with them if and to which extent personal data coming from smartclip systems is used. In this case the agencies or advertisers are agreeing on a list of 3rd party partners the agency will use. In this case all advertisements from the agency will be served by smartclip. Also here smartclip establishes a contractual framework with control rights for smartclip to avoid undesired data leakage.
Blocking of 3rd party trackers and links from unknown companies
If smartclip is having no contractual agreement with the 3rdy party or the agency, smartclip will mask links to and trackers coming from unknown third parties. The smartclip masking service prevents that IP addresses are transferred or cookies can be set by unknown or not whitelisted 3rd parties.
Demand Side Platforms (DSP)
Demand Side Platforms are important partners of smartclip. DSPs are used by agencies or advertisers (in the following referred to as buyers) to buy inventory for running their online campaigns. smartclip is selling advertising opportunities with an auction mechanism through these DSPs, i.e. if smartclip receives an ad opportunity from a web page or an app of a publisher, smartclip is forwarding this information to multiple DSPs in form of a bidrequest. The bidrequest carries all relevant information about the ad opportunity and is analyzed by the DSPs. If the DSPs are interested in the ad opportunity, they submit a bid for that ad opportunity to smartclip including a price offering. smartclip is then running an auction and will forward the ad opportunity to that DSPs, which has offered the highest bid price.
Within the bidrequest smartclip is transferring the anonymous user ID and the IP address to the DSPs. DSPs are using the information for the same purposes as described above and to optimize their bid price decisions.
To secure the data transfer to DSPs smartclip is closing data transfer or data processing agreements with the DSPs. These agreements foresee control and audit rights for smartclip and also are defining a framework to which extent the DPSs are using the personal data used by smartclip. Many of these DSPs are voluntarily undergoing external audits to confirm their compliance with the privacy legislation. It is worthwhile to note, that many of these DSPs are headquartered in the USA and therefore personal data can also be transferred outside the European Union. Please see our sub-processor and data partner list for more information.
Agency adservers
As already described above agency adservers are used by buyers to deliver online advertisements through their own technology. The agency adserver comes into play, when smartclip has selected a campaign from the buyer, who is using it. In this case smartclip is forwarding the adrequest to the agency adserver and the adserver is displaying the creative on the device of the user.
The reason why buyers are using their own adserving technologies is mostly, that they want to be able to measure the campaign and creative performance by themselves to not solely rely on the reportings provided by smartclip or their DSPs.
As described above the agency adservers can set cookies on the user device and the creative code or configuration can contain links to unknown third parties. To avoid this kind of data leakage smartclip is entering into direct agreements with the agency adserving vendors to secure the data processing to their systems, but also to oblige these partner to only allow links in their creatives to third parties which have been whitelisted by smartclip.
Data Management Platforms
Data Management Platforms (DMPs) are serving two different purposes.
Enabling the segmentation of users based on behavioral information
This purpose has already been described above. Here DMPs only create segment definitions (e.g. “mark users which have visited a car website at least three times in the last three months”) and then allow the smartclip adserver to show ads to these users. Hence, here the DMP is acting as a pure technical enabler of user segmentation.
Aggregating users and user information from different sources and allow data sharing between different buyers
Here DMPs are doing more than pure technical enablement, but also serve as marketplaces for user segments. In this scenario DMPs are gathering user data from different sources (e.g. online shops, credit card companies, apps providers etc.) where users have agreed to the usage of their data. Either the DMPs then just enable the data sources to sell the user information to other buyers or the DMPs build overarching profiles for those users by merging the information from the different sources.
While the first purpose seems to be uncritical with regards to privacy, the bundling and reselling of data appears to be more sensitive. It is worthwhile to note here, that the trading of data is also completely anonymous, i.e. DMPs are not selling information about named individuals but only related to anonymous identifiers like smartclip is doing. Furthermore, if smartclip is using data from data partners this is limited to high level demographic criteria like age and gender and estimated income ranges. Therefore any data buying from smartclip is also following the principles of low profiling depth and strict anonymity. smartclip is also only working with a handful of selected partners - covered by data processing or data transfer agreements - where we can assume reliability and seriousity in the handling of any user data. If you should be worried about DMP partnerships, you should always have in mind that DMPs only know a fraction about you compared to Google or Facebook if you should be using them frequently.
Brand Safety and Viewability Measurement Providers
Unfortunately, advertising fraud has become a serious problem in online marketing. Ad fraud usually means, that advertisements are displayed on artificial websites, where impressions are artificially generated and not by real human beings. The damage from fraudulent advertising is serious and estimated to be in the range of hundreds of million USD per year. A softer form of ad fraud is to charge for online advertisements which have never been viewable for a user (e.g. at the bottom of a web pages where the user never scrolled to).
Meanwhile there are specialized vendors with whom smartclip is cooperating for the detection and prevention of ad fraud and for viewability measurement. Usually these vendors are executing javascript code, when the creative is displayed to analyze viewability and the context of the web page or app where the advertisement is running.
To detect fraudulent sites, the IP address plays a vital role. Botnets, which are inducing ad fraud are usually working with a limited range of IP addresses. For this reason IP addresses are so important for fraud prevention and used by these vendors. Other than that, these vendors do not build their own user profiles or are making any other use of the personal data transferred by smartclip.
Your rights as a Data Subject
The new GDPR has equipped you with substantial rights to prevent us (and anybody else) from making undesired use of your data. These are your rights as foreseen in the Art. 12-19 of the new GDPR:
You have the right to obtain information about if and which personal data from you is processed by smartclip.
You have the right to demand deletion of any personal data from you stored by us.
You have the right to request limiting the extent to which personal data from you is used by us.
You have the right to revoke any consent, which you have given in the past to process your data .
You have the right to receive any personal data from you, which is stored by us in a structured, commonly used and machine readable format and/or to have it transmitted directly from one controller to another one where technically feasible.
In case of questions, comments or complaints or queries related to our privacy policy or the processing of your data you can submit those in writing to our data protection officer (please see the contact information
here
).
You have the right to submit complaints directly at the privacy supervisory authority which is responsible for smartclip in case you are having the opinion, that our data processing practices are violating relevant privacy legislation.
Please note, that for online marketing purposes we are not storing any information related to named individuals. All information we store are anonymous identifiers as well as hashed and truncated IP address information. Therefore, the correction or modification of data is not possible for us. In case of a limitation, rectification or change request we will simply delete your data.
How to get in contact with us for privacy matters?
General Inquiries
If you have any personal questions you want to address via phone you can contact your local smartclip office during business hours. Please find the contact information
here
.
You can also reach our central privacy support team via email at
privacy@smartclip.tv
.
Submitting requests with regards to personal data from you stored by smartclip
Please note, that there are no formal requirements for submitting an information request to us. This can be done verbally or in writing. We still recommend to use our
online contact form
to do this. Here you can register with your email address and send us your questions, comments or complaints. Logging in will require an email validation, which gives us a minimum of certainty about the person who is requesting the information. In cases, where we do not have any data stored about you, we will respond to your submitted email address directly.
If we should find personal data about you in our systems, we will reach out to you, to receive a further verification of your identity before we are disclosing the information to you. This process is also protecting you from any of your data being disclosed to unauthorized and unknown persons.
We will store information requiries and our responses for 10 years in case of those being required for legal disputes.
Become forgotten / Opt Out
If you do not want your data to be used by smartclip anymore, please follow
this link
or click on the Out Opt menu item.
If you are using different web browsers and devices for surfing the internet, for a fully working opt-out, you need to visit
this link
from every browser and every device you are using.
To trigger an opt out from your TV device, press on the blue button of your TV remote control. If your are using a red button application on your smart TV or an advertisement is displayed, you should see a hint on how to open up the privacy section. There you will find instructions how to opt out on your TV device.
smartclip is also part of the EDAA
youronlinechoices.eu
initiative. Here you can manage your opt in/opt out preferences globally for all major European online marketing companies.
Important Legal Contact Information
Controller for data processing at smartclip
(also acting as a Processor on behalf of local smartclip entities)
smartclip Europe GmbH
Überseeallee 10
20457 Hamburg
Germany
Phone: +49 040 286686 100
For data protection matters, please contact the following telephone number: +49 251 9811 56 24 56
Email:
info@smartclip.com
Management:
Thomas Servatius, Dr. Oliver Vesper
Processors / Sub-Processor
Address & Representation Local smartclip Entities
Contact Information Data Protection Officer
ePrivacy GmbH
Represented by Prof. Dr. Christoph Bauer
Burchardstraße 14
20095 Hamburg
Email:
privacy@smartclip.tv
This is the contact information of ePrivacy GmbH who is acting as external Data Protection Officer for the smartclip Europe GmbH. ePrivacy GmbH has also been appointed as the Data Protection Officer for all smartclip subsidiaries across Europe. Please note, that ePrivacy GmbH is located in Germany. You can still submit privacy related questions in local language at your local smartclip office. Please find the contact information
here
or centrally at the email address:
privacy@smartclip.tv
.
If you have a particularly sensitive concern, please contact our data protection officer by post, as the communication by e-mail can always have security gaps.
Representative of controllers or processors not established in UK (Article 27 UK GDPR)
UK Representative Service for GDPR Ltd.
7 Savoy Court
London WC2R 0EX
United Kingdom
E-Mail:
www.eprivacy.eu/en/legal
Contact Information Privacy Supervisory Authority
Der Hamburgische Beauftragte für Datenschutz und Informationsfreiheit
Klosterwall 6 (Block C), 20095 Hamburg
Tel.: (040) 4 28 54 - 40 40
E-Fax: (040) 4 279 - 11811
E-Mail:
mailbox@datenschutz.hamburg.de
Privacy Seals from external Auditors
smartclip has voluntarily undergone external audits by external, certified data protection auditors.
smartclip has received several external certifications so far.
After thorough technical and legal review, smartclip's "smartclip AddressableTV Platform" product was
certified
by ePrivacy and awarded the ePrivacyseal privacy seal (valid from 28.09.2023-27.09.2025).
smartclip thus fulfills the requirements of the criteria catalog of ePrivacyseal, which is based on the applicable European data protection law. It is not an accredited certification procedure within the meaning of Art. 42 DSGVO.
More at
eprivacy.eu
.
smartclip is a member of the
European Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
and has committed to its Self-Regulatory Principles (voluntary commitment to behavior-based online advertising).
The EDAA (www.edaa.eu) was founded by a European industry association comprising advertisers, advertising agencies, the direct marketing sector, the advertising sector and the media sector.
Since mid-2018, smartclip has been part of the EDAA preference management at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
(YOC)
and since 30.04.2019, smartclip has been a certified partner in the OBA program:
www.edaa.eu/participating-companies
The company complies with all principles of the OBA framework and maintains the EDAA trustmark operated by ePrivacy.
smartclip is a member of the
"GDPR Transparency & Consent Framework"
of the Interactive Advertising Bureau (IAB).
Smartclip has subscribed to the
IAB Consent & Transparency Framework
- a new standard for a market wide homogenous handling of User rights under the new GDPR. The new framework allows user to manage opt in and opt out preference for all vendors connected through this framework. Consent management at one of these partners will apply for all other partners as well. All vendors which are part of the framework can be found here:
IAB Consent & Transparency Framework Vendor list
List of Subprocessor or Data Transfer Partnerships
Here is a list of all Data Partner which are either directly connected to the smartclip platforms. The vendor type and processing purposes have been described
here
. Please note, that not all of these partnerships may only be active for limited timeframes and can be paused in-between.
Name of Data Partner
TCF ID
Services
More Information
Internal Partners
smartclip Europe GmbH
115
smartclip Europe GmbH is the operator of the Adserving/SSP technology on behalf of the local smartclip entity
https://privacy-portal.smartclip.net
Hosting Partners
AWS
AWS is the hosting service for the Adserving/SSP technology. Datacenters are only located within the EU (Ireland /Germany)
https://aws.amazon.com/de/privacy
Google Cloud Platform
Google Cloud Platformis the hosting service for the Adserving/SSP technology. Datacenters are only located within the EU
https://cloud.google.com/terms/cloud-privacy-notice
DSP Partners
Google DV360
755
Connected DSP
https://policies.google.com
The Tradedesk
21
Connected DSP
https://www.thetradedesk.com/general/privacy-policy
Amobee (Turn)
23
Connected DSP
https://www.amobee.com/trust/gdpr/
AppNexus/Xandr
32
Connected DSP
https://www.xandr.com/privacy/platform-privacy-policy/
Adform
50
Connected DSP
https://site.adform.com/privacy-policy-opt-out
Delta Projects
209
Connected DSP
https://deltaprojects.com/privacy-policy/
Bid Theatre
30
Connected DSP
https://www.bidtheatre.com/privacy-policy
MobPro
302
Connected DSP
https://mobpro.pt/en/privacy-policy.php
Adition (Active Agent)
39
Connected DSP
https://www.active-agent.com/de/unternehmen/opt-out
Verizon Media (aka Yahoo/Oath)
25
Connected DSP
https://www.verizonmedia.com/policies/us/en/verizonmedia/privacy/index.html
Adobe (TubeMogul)
565
Connected DSP
https://www.adobe.com/privacy/policy-linkfree.html
Amazon (DSP)
68
Connected DSP
https://services.amazon.com/privacy-policy.html
Platform 161
140
Connected DSP
https://platform161.com/cookies-privacy/
DMP & Data Partners
eXelate (Nielsen Marketing Cloud)
812
Connected DMP for EU traffic (Direct Integration)
https://www.nielsen.com/us/en/legal/privacy-statement/nielsen-marketing-cloud-privacy-notice/
TheADEX GmbH
44
Connected DMP for EU traffic (Integration via eXelate)
https://www.theadex.com/privacy-opt-out/
IP Deutschland
789
Connected DMP for EU traffic (Direct Integration)
https://www.ip.de/lp/impressum/datenschutz.cfm
Zeotap GmbH
301
Data Provider
https://zeotap.com/website-privacy-policy/
AudienceProject APS
394
Data & Audience Reach Provider
https://privacy.audienceproject.com/en-GB
1plusX
92
Connected DMP for EU traffic (Integration via eXelate)
https://www.1plusx.com/privacy-policy/
Agency Technology Partner
Flashtalking
78
Agency Adserver
https://www.flashtalking.com/privacypolicy
Sizmek
68
Agency Adserver
https://www.sizmek.com/privacy-policy
Integral Ad Science
278
Brand Safety & Viewability
https://integralads.com/privacy-policy/
DoubleVerify, Inc.
126
Ad verification
https://www.doubleverify.com/privacy/
Oracle MOAT
772
Ad verification
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/services-privacy-policy.html
HypertTV Inc.
699
Agency Adserver
https://www.hypertvx.com/privacy/
Innovid
985
Agency Adserver
https://www.innovid.com/privacy-policy/
Adssets
205
Agency Adserver
https://adssets.com/policy/
Comscore
77
Agency Adserver
https://www.comscore.com/About/Privacy
Sublime (Adledge)
484
Agency Adserver
https://sublime.security/privacy/
Adloox
93
Agency Adserver
https://www.adloox.com/en/privacy-policy
Blendee (Neodata)
450
Agency Adserver
https://cdn.blendee.com/blendee/IT-Blendee-Privacy-Policy.pdf
Dynata (Survey Sampling International)
110
Agency Adserver
https://www.dynata.com/privacy-policy/
NeuralOne
37
Agency Adserver
https://web.neural.one/privacy-policy/
ShowHeroes
276
Agency Adserver
https://showheroes.com/privacy/
Exactag
312
Agency Adserver
https://www.exactag.com/datenschutz/
Space Adserver
Agency Adserver
https://adx.space/policy.html
Cynapsis
875
Agency Adserver
https://cynapsis.de/impressum/index.html
Seenthis
415
Agency Adserver
https://seenthis.co/privacypolicy
Norstat
624
Cookie Tracking
https://norstatgroup.com/privacy-policy
Nielsen DAR
812
Audience Measurement
https://www.nielsen.com/us/en/legal/privacy-statement/digital-measurement/
MetrixLab
939
Market Research Agency
https://www.metrixlab.com/privacy-statement/
Magnite (SpotX Inc)
52
Smartclip is buying on SpotX inventories. SpotX is a processor on behalf of it’s publisher partners. Therefore smartclip is acting a sub-processor on behalf of SpotX
https://www.spotx.tv/privacy-policy
GfK
758
Market Research Agency
https://www.gfk.com/en-us/privacy-notice
Netquest
Market Research Agency
https://www.netquest.com/es/politica-de-privacidad/privacidad
Realytics
1025
TV Analytics Agency
https://www.realytics.io/platform-privacy-policy/
RAM
659
Campaign Tracking
https://www2.rampanel.com/privacy-policy/
Powered by
Froala Editor
Powered by
Froala Editor
Powered by
Froala Editor
Sub-policy 9
https://www.smartstream.tv/en/productprivacy:
404
Die Seite konnte nicht gefunden werden.
Sub-policy 10
https://yoc.com/privacy/:
Get in touch
Sub-policy 11
https://www.spotx.tv/privacy-policy/:
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Last Updated: September 30, 2024
Table of Contents
:
About Us
How We Collect User Information
Information Our Clients and Vendors Collect Independently
Use of User Information
Cooperation with Clients in the European Union
Information We Collect, Use, Disclose, and the Purposes for such Disclosure
Your Privacy Rights & Choices
Additional Information for Residents of Certain States
Information Retention
Security
Self-regulatory mechanisms
Data Transfers and EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Principles
Changes to this Policy
Contact Us
This policy explains how Magnite, Inc. (“
Magnite
,”
we
” or “
us
”) collects, uses and discloses information about you when you interact with Digital Media Properties (defined below) that use our advertising technology platforms and related services to deliver you ads (collectively, the “
Services”)
.
This privacy policy does not govern (i) the collection and use of information about visitors to our
website
, or (ii) information collected in the course of our sales and marketing activities. Our privacy practices as to that information can be found
here
.
This policy also does not govern the collection, use and disclosure of information by our clients through their Digital Media Properties, the activities of other third parties we may work with, or any activities where we act as a service provider or processor to our clients rather than a data controller. Those practices are governed by our clients’ own privacy policies.
About Us
Magnite offers Services that connect buyers of advertising inventory (which we refer to as advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (which we refer to as publishers), providing such buyers with the opportunity to display an advertisement on a seller’s Digital Media Property. In this policy, we refer to our buyers and sellers collectively as “
Clients
”. Our platform is used to deliver digital advertising inventory on websites and applications across Internet-connected devices and platforms, including mobile devices, computers and internet-connected TVs (which we collectively refer to as “
Digital Media Properties
”).
How We Collect User Information
We (and our service providers) use different technologies (collectively “
Tracking Technologies
”), including cookies and other similar technologies to collect information automatically from your device when you visit a Digital Media Property that uses our technology.
When doing so, we collect certain information about you and your device (collectively, “
User Information
”). User Information does not include information that directly identifies an individual, such as name, address, phone number, or email address. However, the User Information we collect is considered “personal data” or “personal information” under applicable privacy and data protection laws.
In particular, we collect information such as your IP address, cookie data, and other device identifiers, and may also assign new identifiers to your device or browser based on this data and other device-related information we collect as described in more detail
here
. These identifiers help us to recognize a particular device without knowing the identity of the user of that device. This helps us, our Clients, and our partners (such as third party advertising platforms) select appropriate advertisements to display to you.
Information Our Clients and Vendors Collect Independently
We collaborate with various third-parties for analytics and advertising services, which independently gather and use User Information. These third-party services provide our Clients with additional ways to deliver targeted ads using our technology.
For example, third-party companies may use data about your visits to Digital Media Properties across multiple devices or browsers to create advertising profiles that allow advertisers to deliver more personalized content and ads. Our advertiser clients can combine this data with the information we collect to deliver targeted ads or create audience segments for advertising on Digital Media Properties. Our Clients and their vendors may use their own tags, pixels, cookies, or similar technologies within ads and on certain third-party platforms and Digital Media Properties. We are not responsible for the tracking technologies or privacy practices of our Clients or their vendors.
Please review our
Platform Cookie Statement
for more information.
Use of User Information
We and our Clients use User Information to guide decisions on buying and selling advertising space on Digital Media Properties. This data, which may also be combined with information from third-party services, helps deliver targeted ads that our Clients believe will interest specific users. When an ad is shown on a publisher’s site, it may also be targeted based on the content that you are viewing or have viewed, for example a travel ad appearing on a travel site. Tracking Technologies help to match client’s advertising opportunities with the right advertisements. To do so, we may perform cookie syncing between Clients, Magnite, third party data provider and/or advertiser client cookies. This cookie synching process allows the parties to map their respective cookie information. For example, if publisher A sets a cookie on a user’s device with an ID 12345 and advertiser B sets a cookie on the same user’s device with an ID 67890, cookie synching would enable publisher A and advertiser B to recognize that ID 12345 and ID 67890 relate to the same user’s device. In the case of advertisers, cookie syncing may influence the decision whether to bid on a specific advertising opportunity, because if an advertiser recognizes a given cookie ID it may place a higher value on that opportunity.
We also use these technologies to prevent users from seeing the same ad repeatedly, enhance ad delivery, report to clients, and assess ad effectiveness.
This processing may constitute “targeted advertising” under some laws and the “sale” or “sharing” of personal information under other laws.
Cooperation with Clients in the European Union
In the European Union, we and our Clients may act in limited circumstances as joint controllers under the GDPR for the collection of User Information on Digital Media Properties. In this case, this joint controllership is limited to setting and collecting identifiers and User Information on the Digital Media Properties and transmitting this information to us (“
Joint Processing
“). Further processing of your information is our sole responsibility and we act as an independent controller.
We have put contractual arrangements in place with our Clients that set out the distribution of responsibilities between us and our Client. Accordingly, our Clients establish the necessary legal basis for this Joint Processing by obtaining consent on the Digital Media Properties and providing the required transparency information. We and our Clients cooperate to fulfill our obligations under the GDPR, especially regarding collaboration with data protection authorities.
If you wish to exercise your rights under the GDPR concerning Joint Processing, please contact us via the
User Choice Portal
.
Information We Collect, Use, Disclose, and the Purposes for such Disclosure:
Types of data we collect:
Device Characteristics
: device identifiers, IP address, authentication-derived identifiers such as hashed email, probabilistic identifiers and other advertising identifiers.
Browsing and Interaction Data
: information about the domain, topic or name of the property, the date/time of visits, the search terms you enter, visitor activities and actions, viewability data, the video title, video player size, description or category being displayed, click data, types of advertisements viewed, type of browser you use, app version, and the page you visited before navigating to the Digital Media Properties.
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
: user demographics, information with respect to a user’s preferences, patterns, click and video interactions, behaviors or interests, and information provided to us by advertisers and advertising platforms to match an advertisement opportunity offered by our Clients with the right advertisement.
When you visit Digital Media Properties that use our technology, we collect, use and disclose the following information to the listed recipients for the indicated purposes:
Category & Types of User Information we collect
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal information to…
Purposes
We use personal information to…
Device characteristics
• Our Clients;
• Magnite Affiliates;
• Our vendors and service providers;
• Our Partners;
• In connection with a business transfer;
• Law enforcement or others in legal proceeding;
• To protect the rights of Magnite or others.
• Select advertising using limited data;
• Create profiles for personalised advertising;
• Use profiles to select personalised advertising;
• Create profiles to personalise content;
• Measure advertising performance;
• Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
• Develop and improve services;
• Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors;
• Deliver and present advertising and content;
• Save and communicate privacy choices.
Browsing and Interaction Data
Non-precise Location data
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
Precise Location Data (which is “sensitive personal information” under certain State Privacy Laws)
Category & Types of User Information we collect
Device characteristics
Browsing and Interaction Data
Non-precise Location data
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
Precise Location Data (which is “sensitive personal information” under certain State Privacy Laws)
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal information to…
• Our Clients;
• Magnite Affiliates;
• Our vendors and service providers;
• Our Partners;
• In connection with a business transfer;
• Law enforcement or others in legal proceeding;
• To protect the rights of Magnite or others.
Purposes
We use personal information to…
• Select advertising using limited data;
• Create profiles for personalised advertising;
• Use profiles to select personalised advertising;
• Create profiles to personalise content;
• Measure advertising performance;
• Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
• Develop and improve services;
• Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors;
• Deliver and present advertising and content;
• Save and communicate privacy choices.
Our Legal Basis For Processing
In the European Economic Area we rely on different legal bases to process your information for the various purposes described in this Privacy Policy. For each purpose below, we describe the legal basis for our processing.
The categories and types of User Information we collect and process are found in the
above chart along with the third parties that we share this data with
. All of the User Information listed is processed for all purposes listed above.
Purposes
Legal basis
If we rely on Legitimate Interest(s) these are
Use limited data to select advertising
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients (see the information in the CMP of our Client).
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers) without personal data.
Create profiles for personalised advertising
Consent
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
Consent
Create profiles to personalise content
Consent
Use profiles to select personalised content
Consent
Measure advertising performance
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Measure content performance
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
Consent
Develop and improve services
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To evaluate the use of the services and adoption of new features to inform the development of future features and improve product direction and development.
Use limited data to select content
Consent
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Legitimate Interest
To secure our systems and detect and investigate threats, infringement, harmful or unlawful activities and promote safety, integrity and security on our platforms.
Deliver and present advertising and content
Legitimate Interest
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers).
Save and communicate privacy choices
Legitimate Interest
To be able to save and communicate privacy choices reflecting Users choices, including their privacy settings.
Purposes
Use limited data to select advertising
Create profiles for personalised advertising
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
Create profiles to personalise content
Use profiles to select personalised content
Measure advertising performance
Measure content performance
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
Develop and improve services
Use limited data to select content
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Deliver and present advertising and content
Save and communicate privacy choices
Legal basis
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients (see the information in the CMP of our Client).
Consent
Consent
Consent
Consent
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent
Legitimate Interest
Legitimate Interest
Legitimate Interest
If we rely on Legitimate Interest(s) these are
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers) without personal data.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
To evaluate the use of the services and adoption of new features to inform the development of future features and improve product direction and development.
To secure our systems and detect and investigate threats, infringement, harmful or unlawful activities and promote safety, integrity and security on our platforms.
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers).
To be able to save and communicate privacy choices reflecting Users choices, including their privacy settings.
Some jurisdictions may require consent in order to collect and process personal data. In all situations where you have been specifically asked by our partners or by us for your consent prior to processing, we may rely on that consent until you withdraw it. If we rely on consent to collect and/or process your User Information, we will obtain such consent in accordance with applicable law.
In some cases, we may need to process your User Information because we are required to do so by law.
In other cases, we may rely on our legitimate interests to collect User Information from you, except where such interests are overridden by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Opt-Out
Depending upon where you live, certain activities described
here
may constitute “sharing” “selling” or processing of User Information for purposes of “targeted advertising” as such terms are defined under certain privacy laws. You may opt out of these activities, as well as certain processing of sensitive personal information we may undertake by following the instructions in our
User Choice Portal
.
Note that because these opt outs are specific to the device or browser on which they are exercised, you will need to opt out on each browser and device.
Access, Deletion, Correction, Portability, Withdrawal of consent
In addition, depending on where you reside and other legal limitations, you may have the right to (i) request to know more about and access the categories and specific pieces of User Information we collect, use, and disclose, (ii) request deletion or restriction of your personal information, (iii) request correction of inaccurate personal information, (iv) obtain your User Information in a portable format and/or (v) if the processing of User Information is based on your consent, withdraw your consent at any time
If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please see our
User Choice Portal
for instructions on how to do so.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising these rights. Note that when you exercise your rights, we may ask for additional information to verify your request.
Right to Lodge a Complaint if you are a User in the EEA, UK, and Switzerland
:
You have the right to lodge a complaint about our processing of personal data with a European Data Protection Authority. For contact details of EU data protection authorities, please see
here
. The UK data protection authority can be contacted
here
. The Swiss data protection authority can be contacted
here
.
Y
our Rights under certain State Laws
If you are a resident of a state governed by a
State Privacy Law
, please see our
User Choice Portal
section above to exercise your rights. If we deny your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision by contacting us
here
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Authorized Agents
Depending upon where you live, you may also submit a rights request through an authorized agent. If you do so, the agent must present signed written permission to act on your behalf and you may also be required to independently verify your identity. If you are agent seeking to make a request, please contact us
here
.
Additional Information for Residents of Certain States
Certain states, including California, Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia, have enacted consumer privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require additional disclosures (“
State Privacy Laws
”). If you are a resident of a state governed by a State Privacy Law this section applies to you. This section also serves as our California Notice at Collection. As a reminder, disclosures do not apply to the extent we act as a service provider or processor to our clients. In such cases, you must visit the privacy policies of our clients to understand how data is processed about you and to exercise your rights.
This policy explains how
we collect
(including the
sources
of collection),
use
,
disclose
, and
retain
information about you in connection with our platforms. As required by certain State Privacy Laws,
refer to this table
to explain this same information, including the categories of personal information we collect, the types of entities to which we disclose it, and the ways we use each category of information. The table explains our practices today and over the preceding 12 months.
In some cases, we may de-identify personal information so that it no longer identifies you and use this information for purposes like analyzing the effectiveness of the Services. We will use this information in de-identified form and we will not attempt to reidentify it, unless required by law
We do not knowingly sell or share personal information about consumers under the age of 16, or the permitted legal age, where older.
Annual Request Statistics
During the period from January 1, 2023 to December 31, 2023, we received the following number of requests from individuals:
Requests to know from individuals in the United States: 15 requests. We processed the requests within an average timeframe of 5 days; however, these requests were denied because we were unable to verify the identity of the individual making the request.
Requests to delete from individuals globally, inclusive of the US and other countries: 26 requests, and we processed these requests within an average timeframe of 5 days; however, these requests were denied as we did not have any information relating to the individual’s information making the request.
Requests to opt out from individuals, globally: we honor users’ requests to opt out of interest-based advertising and any potential sales of personal information, as explained in this Policy. We received 2,258,275 requests to opt out, and these requests were completed in approximately real time.
Information Retention
We store the User Information we collect for as long as is necessary for the purpose(s) for which we originally collected it, or for other legitimate business purposes, including to meet our legal, regulatory, or other compliance obligations.
We typically store the User Information we collect from your device, such as IP address and other information described above, in our systems for up to 90 days before we anonymize and aggregate that data into summary reports.
Security
We use industry-standard technical and organizational security measures to help protect information transmitted over or stored on our systems. Please note, however, that no transmission or storage of information can ever be guaranteed to be completely secure.
Self-regulatory mechanisms
To note, Magnite participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its specifications and policies. Magnite’s identification number(s) within the framework are 52 (DV+), 202 (Magnite CTV), 293 (SpringServe), and 493 (Magnite Carbon AI).
Magnite is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative’s (“NAI”) For more information about how targeted advertising works, you can visit the
NAI educational page
.
Finally, Magnite adheres to the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles, and the European Digital Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles.
Data Transfers and EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Principles:
Magnite is a global company headquartered in the United States, with offices and data centers around the world). If you access Digital Media Properties, your data may be transferred to, stored and processed by us in countries outside the United States, and by those third parties with whom we may share your User Information (as described in this policy) in the countries in which they operate.
Some countries may not provide a level of data protection for User Information that is equivalent to the data protection laws in your country. We will however implement appropriate safeguards where Magnite group of companies, or any third parties with whom we share data, receive User Information originating from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK in accordance with applicable data protection legislation.
Magnite, Inc. and its US subsidiary, Magnite Hopper, Inc., commit to comply with the EU-US, the UK extension and Swiss-US Data Privacy Frameworks as set forth by the US Department of Commerce with respect to personal information concerning individuals from the EEA, UK and Switzerland. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
If you would like to learn more about the safeguards we put in place for international transfers, please see our
Data Privacy Framework Notice
to learn more or contact us using the contact details further below.
Changes to this Policy
We may update this policy from time to time in order to reflect, for example, changes to our practices or for other operational, legal or regulatory reasons. If we make material changes to this policy, we will notify you of any material changes by posting the revised policy on this website, and where necessary, by any other means required by applicable law.
Contact Us
For more information about our privacy practices, if you have questions, or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact Magnite’s Privacy Team by e-mail at
privacy@magnite.com
or by post using the details provided below:
1250 Broadway, 15th Floor, New York, New York 10001
You can also contact Magnite’s Data Protection Officer at
dpo@magnite.com
.
If you are based in the EU you can contact our EU Representative:
Magnite@lionheartsquared.eu
Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd (FAO – Magnite),
2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32,
Dublin, DO2 EK84, Republic of Ireland.
Legal
Website Privacy Policy
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Legal & Privacy Policies
Cookie Policy
This site uses cookies to store information on your computer. Some are essential to make our site work; others help us improve the site. Read our website
privacy policy
and
cookie statement
to learn more.
Deny
Allow Cookies
Close modal
Sub-policy 12
https://www.indexexchange.com/privacy/:
Welcome to the Index Exchange Privacy Center
We are committed to protecting your privacy and treating your personal information, personal data, or the equivalent term in your region (collectively,
Personal Data
) with transparency, care, and respect. Unless otherwise specified, any reference to
Index Exchange
,
we
, or our in the policies, notices, and other web links referenced in the Privacy Center means Index Exchange Inc., and its direct and indirect global subsidiaries.
Exchange Platform
The ‘Exchange Platform Privacy Policy and Cookie Notice’ applies to our advertising exchange platform; it explains
what Personal Data we collect
and
why
, and how we use or
share
your Personal Data. For example, if you receive an ad on your web browser that was delivered with the help of our technology, the ‘Exchange Platform Privacy Policy and Cookie Notice’ applies to you.
PRIVACY POLICY
COOKIE NOTICE
Website and Corporate
The ‘Website and Corporate Privacy Policy and Cookie Notice’ applies to our corporate activities; it explains
what Personal Data we collect
and
why
, and how we use or
share
your Personal Data. For example, if you visit our corporate website or apply to one of our job postings, the ‘Website and Corporate Privacy Policy and Cookie Notice’ applies to you.
PRIVACY POLICY
COOKIE NOTICE
Your Privacy Rights
It is important to Index Exchange to ensure that you understand your privacy rights and how to make choices about your Personal Data. To learn more about how you can request access to and make decisions about the Personal Data we may collect, use, or share about you, please visit:
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
About Us
Index Exchange is a global digital advertising marketplace. Our technology (the
Index Exchange Platform
) helps our clients deliver advertising to you. The Index Exchange Platform hosts digital auctions that help our clients buy and sell online ads (collectively, our
Platform Services
). These ads can be found on websites, mobile applications (
Apps
), or video programming services, such as streaming apps on Smart TVs (collectively,
Digital Properties
).
As with any exchange platform, we act as an intermediary between buyers and sellers. Throughout this Policy, we refer to our clients that sell ad space as
Publishers
. Publishers own or operate the Digital Properties you may use or visit. We refer to clients that buy ad space (for example, advertisers) as
Buyers
. Buyers may include Demand-Side Platforms (
DSP
), Data Management Platforms (
DMPs
) and other partners (collectively,
Demand-Side Partners
). Demand-Side Partners act as additional intermediaries in the digital advertising supply chain that connect advertisers to Index Exchange to serve relevant ads to you on the Publisher Digital Properties you visit. Demand-Side Partners liaise with other Buyers, which also include advertisers (for example, brands), advertising agencies, and ad networks (collectively,
Ad Partners
). In summary, Index Exchange and Demand-Side Partners act as intermediaries that connect Ad Partners with Publishers to deliver relevant digital ads to you.
Learn more about us
Contact
Privacy Team at Index Exchange
If you have any questions, concerns, or complaints about the above or our privacy practices, please contact us at
privacy@indexexchange.com
or at:
Attn: Index Exchange c/o Privacy
8 Spadina Avenue, Suite 2600, Toronto, Ontario
M5V0S8 Canada
Data Protection Officer
You can also contact our DPO at
gdpr@legalarmy.net
or at:
Attn: Index Exchange Data Protection Officer
Legal Army, S.L., B88103700
Calle Princesa 31, Piso 5, Puerta A1, Madrid, Spain, 28008
Sub-policy 13
https://rubiconproject.com/rubicon-project-advertising-technology-privacy-policy/:
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Last Updated: September 30, 2024
Table of Contents
:
About Us
How We Collect User Information
Information Our Clients and Vendors Collect Independently
Use of User Information
Cooperation with Clients in the European Union
Information We Collect, Use, Disclose, and the Purposes for such Disclosure
Your Privacy Rights & Choices
Additional Information for Residents of Certain States
Information Retention
Security
Self-regulatory mechanisms
Data Transfers and EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Principles
Changes to this Policy
Contact Us
This policy explains how Magnite, Inc. (“
Magnite
,”
we
” or “
us
”) collects, uses and discloses information about you when you interact with Digital Media Properties (defined below) that use our advertising technology platforms and related services to deliver you ads (collectively, the “
Services”)
.
This privacy policy does not govern (i) the collection and use of information about visitors to our
website
, or (ii) information collected in the course of our sales and marketing activities. Our privacy practices as to that information can be found
here
.
This policy also does not govern the collection, use and disclosure of information by our clients through their Digital Media Properties, the activities of other third parties we may work with, or any activities where we act as a service provider or processor to our clients rather than a data controller. Those practices are governed by our clients’ own privacy policies.
About Us
Magnite offers Services that connect buyers of advertising inventory (which we refer to as advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (which we refer to as publishers), providing such buyers with the opportunity to display an advertisement on a seller’s Digital Media Property. In this policy, we refer to our buyers and sellers collectively as “
Clients
”. Our platform is used to deliver digital advertising inventory on websites and applications across Internet-connected devices and platforms, including mobile devices, computers and internet-connected TVs (which we collectively refer to as “
Digital Media Properties
”).
How We Collect User Information
We (and our service providers) use different technologies (collectively “
Tracking Technologies
”), including cookies and other similar technologies to collect information automatically from your device when you visit a Digital Media Property that uses our technology.
When doing so, we collect certain information about you and your device (collectively, “
User Information
”). User Information does not include information that directly identifies an individual, such as name, address, phone number, or email address. However, the User Information we collect is considered “personal data” or “personal information” under applicable privacy and data protection laws.
In particular, we collect information such as your IP address, cookie data, and other device identifiers, and may also assign new identifiers to your device or browser based on this data and other device-related information we collect as described in more detail
here
. These identifiers help us to recognize a particular device without knowing the identity of the user of that device. This helps us, our Clients, and our partners (such as third party advertising platforms) select appropriate advertisements to display to you.
Information Our Clients and Vendors Collect Independently
We collaborate with various third-parties for analytics and advertising services, which independently gather and use User Information. These third-party services provide our Clients with additional ways to deliver targeted ads using our technology.
For example, third-party companies may use data about your visits to Digital Media Properties across multiple devices or browsers to create advertising profiles that allow advertisers to deliver more personalized content and ads. Our advertiser clients can combine this data with the information we collect to deliver targeted ads or create audience segments for advertising on Digital Media Properties. Our Clients and their vendors may use their own tags, pixels, cookies, or similar technologies within ads and on certain third-party platforms and Digital Media Properties. We are not responsible for the tracking technologies or privacy practices of our Clients or their vendors.
Please review our
Platform Cookie Statement
for more information.
Use of User Information
We and our Clients use User Information to guide decisions on buying and selling advertising space on Digital Media Properties. This data, which may also be combined with information from third-party services, helps deliver targeted ads that our Clients believe will interest specific users. When an ad is shown on a publisher’s site, it may also be targeted based on the content that you are viewing or have viewed, for example a travel ad appearing on a travel site. Tracking Technologies help to match client’s advertising opportunities with the right advertisements. To do so, we may perform cookie syncing between Clients, Magnite, third party data provider and/or advertiser client cookies. This cookie synching process allows the parties to map their respective cookie information. For example, if publisher A sets a cookie on a user’s device with an ID 12345 and advertiser B sets a cookie on the same user’s device with an ID 67890, cookie synching would enable publisher A and advertiser B to recognize that ID 12345 and ID 67890 relate to the same user’s device. In the case of advertisers, cookie syncing may influence the decision whether to bid on a specific advertising opportunity, because if an advertiser recognizes a given cookie ID it may place a higher value on that opportunity.
We also use these technologies to prevent users from seeing the same ad repeatedly, enhance ad delivery, report to clients, and assess ad effectiveness.
This processing may constitute “targeted advertising” under some laws and the “sale” or “sharing” of personal information under other laws.
Cooperation with Clients in the European Union
In the European Union, we and our Clients may act in limited circumstances as joint controllers under the GDPR for the collection of User Information on Digital Media Properties. In this case, this joint controllership is limited to setting and collecting identifiers and User Information on the Digital Media Properties and transmitting this information to us (“
Joint Processing
“). Further processing of your information is our sole responsibility and we act as an independent controller.
We have put contractual arrangements in place with our Clients that set out the distribution of responsibilities between us and our Client. Accordingly, our Clients establish the necessary legal basis for this Joint Processing by obtaining consent on the Digital Media Properties and providing the required transparency information. We and our Clients cooperate to fulfill our obligations under the GDPR, especially regarding collaboration with data protection authorities.
If you wish to exercise your rights under the GDPR concerning Joint Processing, please contact us via the
User Choice Portal
.
Information We Collect, Use, Disclose, and the Purposes for such Disclosure:
Types of data we collect:
Device Characteristics
: device identifiers, IP address, authentication-derived identifiers such as hashed email, probabilistic identifiers and other advertising identifiers.
Browsing and Interaction Data
: information about the domain, topic or name of the property, the date/time of visits, the search terms you enter, visitor activities and actions, viewability data, the video title, video player size, description or category being displayed, click data, types of advertisements viewed, type of browser you use, app version, and the page you visited before navigating to the Digital Media Properties.
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
: user demographics, information with respect to a user’s preferences, patterns, click and video interactions, behaviors or interests, and information provided to us by advertisers and advertising platforms to match an advertisement opportunity offered by our Clients with the right advertisement.
When you visit Digital Media Properties that use our technology, we collect, use and disclose the following information to the listed recipients for the indicated purposes:
Category & Types of User Information we collect
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal information to…
Purposes
We use personal information to…
Device characteristics
• Our Clients;
• Magnite Affiliates;
• Our vendors and service providers;
• Our Partners;
• In connection with a business transfer;
• Law enforcement or others in legal proceeding;
• To protect the rights of Magnite or others.
• Select advertising using limited data;
• Create profiles for personalised advertising;
• Use profiles to select personalised advertising;
• Create profiles to personalise content;
• Measure advertising performance;
• Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
• Develop and improve services;
• Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors;
• Deliver and present advertising and content;
• Save and communicate privacy choices.
Browsing and Interaction Data
Non-precise Location data
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
Precise Location Data (which is “sensitive personal information” under certain State Privacy Laws)
Category & Types of User Information we collect
Device characteristics
Browsing and Interaction Data
Non-precise Location data
User’s Profiles, User behavior data, derived information
Precise Location Data (which is “sensitive personal information” under certain State Privacy Laws)
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal information to…
• Our Clients;
• Magnite Affiliates;
• Our vendors and service providers;
• Our Partners;
• In connection with a business transfer;
• Law enforcement or others in legal proceeding;
• To protect the rights of Magnite or others.
Purposes
We use personal information to…
• Select advertising using limited data;
• Create profiles for personalised advertising;
• Use profiles to select personalised advertising;
• Create profiles to personalise content;
• Measure advertising performance;
• Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
• Develop and improve services;
• Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors;
• Deliver and present advertising and content;
• Save and communicate privacy choices.
Our Legal Basis For Processing
In the European Economic Area we rely on different legal bases to process your information for the various purposes described in this Privacy Policy. For each purpose below, we describe the legal basis for our processing.
The categories and types of User Information we collect and process are found in the
above chart along with the third parties that we share this data with
. All of the User Information listed is processed for all purposes listed above.
Purposes
Legal basis
If we rely on Legitimate Interest(s) these are
Use limited data to select advertising
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients (see the information in the CMP of our Client).
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers) without personal data.
Create profiles for personalised advertising
Consent
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
Consent
Create profiles to personalise content
Consent
Use profiles to select personalised content
Consent
Measure advertising performance
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Measure content performance
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
Consent
Develop and improve services
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
To evaluate the use of the services and adoption of new features to inform the development of future features and improve product direction and development.
Use limited data to select content
Consent
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Legitimate Interest
To secure our systems and detect and investigate threats, infringement, harmful or unlawful activities and promote safety, integrity and security on our platforms.
Deliver and present advertising and content
Legitimate Interest
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers).
Save and communicate privacy choices
Legitimate Interest
To be able to save and communicate privacy choices reflecting Users choices, including their privacy settings.
Purposes
Use limited data to select advertising
Create profiles for personalised advertising
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
Create profiles to personalise content
Use profiles to select personalised content
Measure advertising performance
Measure content performance
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
Develop and improve services
Use limited data to select content
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Deliver and present advertising and content
Save and communicate privacy choices
Legal basis
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients (see the information in the CMP of our Client).
Consent
Consent
Consent
Consent
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent
Consent or Legitimate Interest according to the choice of our Clients.
Consent
Legitimate Interest
Legitimate Interest
Legitimate Interest
If we rely on Legitimate Interest(s) these are
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers) without personal data.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
To measure the use of our platforms to inform business decisions and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
To evaluate the use of the services and adoption of new features to inform the development of future features and improve product direction and development.
To secure our systems and detect and investigate threats, infringement, harmful or unlawful activities and promote safety, integrity and security on our platforms.
To connect connect buyers of advertising inventory (advertisers) with sellers of advertising inventory (publishers).
To be able to save and communicate privacy choices reflecting Users choices, including their privacy settings.
Some jurisdictions may require consent in order to collect and process personal data. In all situations where you have been specifically asked by our partners or by us for your consent prior to processing, we may rely on that consent until you withdraw it. If we rely on consent to collect and/or process your User Information, we will obtain such consent in accordance with applicable law.
In some cases, we may need to process your User Information because we are required to do so by law.
In other cases, we may rely on our legitimate interests to collect User Information from you, except where such interests are overridden by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Opt-Out
Depending upon where you live, certain activities described
here
may constitute “sharing” “selling” or processing of User Information for purposes of “targeted advertising” as such terms are defined under certain privacy laws. You may opt out of these activities, as well as certain processing of sensitive personal information we may undertake by following the instructions in our
User Choice Portal
.
Note that because these opt outs are specific to the device or browser on which they are exercised, you will need to opt out on each browser and device.
Access, Deletion, Correction, Portability, Withdrawal of consent
In addition, depending on where you reside and other legal limitations, you may have the right to (i) request to know more about and access the categories and specific pieces of User Information we collect, use, and disclose, (ii) request deletion or restriction of your personal information, (iii) request correction of inaccurate personal information, (iv) obtain your User Information in a portable format and/or (v) if the processing of User Information is based on your consent, withdraw your consent at any time
If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please see our
User Choice Portal
for instructions on how to do so.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising these rights. Note that when you exercise your rights, we may ask for additional information to verify your request.
Right to Lodge a Complaint if you are a User in the EEA, UK, and Switzerland
:
You have the right to lodge a complaint about our processing of personal data with a European Data Protection Authority. For contact details of EU data protection authorities, please see
here
. The UK data protection authority can be contacted
here
. The Swiss data protection authority can be contacted
here
.
Y
our Rights under certain State Laws
If you are a resident of a state governed by a
State Privacy Law
, please see our
User Choice Portal
section above to exercise your rights. If we deny your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision by contacting us
here
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Authorized Agents
Depending upon where you live, you may also submit a rights request through an authorized agent. If you do so, the agent must present signed written permission to act on your behalf and you may also be required to independently verify your identity. If you are agent seeking to make a request, please contact us
here
.
Additional Information for Residents of Certain States
Certain states, including California, Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia, have enacted consumer privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require additional disclosures (“
State Privacy Laws
”). If you are a resident of a state governed by a State Privacy Law this section applies to you. This section also serves as our California Notice at Collection. As a reminder, disclosures do not apply to the extent we act as a service provider or processor to our clients. In such cases, you must visit the privacy policies of our clients to understand how data is processed about you and to exercise your rights.
This policy explains how
we collect
(including the
sources
of collection),
use
,
disclose
, and
retain
information about you in connection with our platforms. As required by certain State Privacy Laws,
refer to this table
to explain this same information, including the categories of personal information we collect, the types of entities to which we disclose it, and the ways we use each category of information. The table explains our practices today and over the preceding 12 months.
In some cases, we may de-identify personal information so that it no longer identifies you and use this information for purposes like analyzing the effectiveness of the Services. We will use this information in de-identified form and we will not attempt to reidentify it, unless required by law
We do not knowingly sell or share personal information about consumers under the age of 16, or the permitted legal age, where older.
Annual Request Statistics
During the period from January 1, 2023 to December 31, 2023, we received the following number of requests from individuals:
Requests to know from individuals in the United States: 15 requests. We processed the requests within an average timeframe of 5 days; however, these requests were denied because we were unable to verify the identity of the individual making the request.
Requests to delete from individuals globally, inclusive of the US and other countries: 26 requests, and we processed these requests within an average timeframe of 5 days; however, these requests were denied as we did not have any information relating to the individual’s information making the request.
Requests to opt out from individuals, globally: we honor users’ requests to opt out of interest-based advertising and any potential sales of personal information, as explained in this Policy. We received 2,258,275 requests to opt out, and these requests were completed in approximately real time.
Information Retention
We store the User Information we collect for as long as is necessary for the purpose(s) for which we originally collected it, or for other legitimate business purposes, including to meet our legal, regulatory, or other compliance obligations.
We typically store the User Information we collect from your device, such as IP address and other information described above, in our systems for up to 90 days before we anonymize and aggregate that data into summary reports.
Security
We use industry-standard technical and organizational security measures to help protect information transmitted over or stored on our systems. Please note, however, that no transmission or storage of information can ever be guaranteed to be completely secure.
Self-regulatory mechanisms
To note, Magnite participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its specifications and policies. Magnite’s identification number(s) within the framework are 52 (DV+), 202 (Magnite CTV), 293 (SpringServe), and 493 (Magnite Carbon AI).
Magnite is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative’s (“NAI”) For more information about how targeted advertising works, you can visit the
NAI educational page
.
Finally, Magnite adheres to the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles, and the European Digital Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles.
Data Transfers and EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and Swiss-U.S Data Privacy Principles:
Magnite is a global company headquartered in the United States, with offices and data centers around the world). If you access Digital Media Properties, your data may be transferred to, stored and processed by us in countries outside the United States, and by those third parties with whom we may share your User Information (as described in this policy) in the countries in which they operate.
Some countries may not provide a level of data protection for User Information that is equivalent to the data protection laws in your country. We will however implement appropriate safeguards where Magnite group of companies, or any third parties with whom we share data, receive User Information originating from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK in accordance with applicable data protection legislation.
Magnite, Inc. and its US subsidiary, Magnite Hopper, Inc., commit to comply with the EU-US, the UK extension and Swiss-US Data Privacy Frameworks as set forth by the US Department of Commerce with respect to personal information concerning individuals from the EEA, UK and Switzerland. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
If you would like to learn more about the safeguards we put in place for international transfers, please see our
Data Privacy Framework Notice
to learn more or contact us using the contact details further below.
Changes to this Policy
We may update this policy from time to time in order to reflect, for example, changes to our practices or for other operational, legal or regulatory reasons. If we make material changes to this policy, we will notify you of any material changes by posting the revised policy on this website, and where necessary, by any other means required by applicable law.
Contact Us
For more information about our privacy practices, if you have questions, or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact Magnite’s Privacy Team by e-mail at
privacy@magnite.com
or by post using the details provided below:
1250 Broadway, 15th Floor, New York, New York 10001
You can also contact Magnite’s Data Protection Officer at
dpo@magnite.com
.
If you are based in the EU you can contact our EU Representative:
Magnite@lionheartsquared.eu
Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd (FAO – Magnite),
2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32,
Dublin, DO2 EK84, Republic of Ireland.
Legal
Website Privacy Policy
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Legal & Privacy Policies
Cookie Policy
This site uses cookies to store information on your computer. Some are essential to make our site work; others help us improve the site. Read our website
privacy policy
and
cookie statement
to learn more.
Deny
Allow Cookies
Close modal
Sub-policy 14
https://www.xandr.com/privacy/platform-privacy-policy/:
This is the Trace Id: a48efcd6b72f89c6975e0b5d8bbdc7c1
Microsoft Privacy Statement
Last Updated: March 2025
What's new?
Print
Expand All
Collapse All
Microsoft Privacy Statement
Personal data we collect
How we use personal data
Reasons we share personal data
How to access and control your personal data
Cookies and similar technologies
Products provided by your organization—notice to end users
Microsoft account
Collection of data from children
Other important privacy information
Security of personal data
Where we store and process personal data
Our retention of personal data
U.S. State Data Privacy
Advertising
Speech recognition technologies
Preview or free-of-charge releases
Changes to this privacy statement
How to contact us
Product-specific details:
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
Enterprise and developer products
Enterprise online services
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances
Productivity and communications products
Microsoft 365, Office, and other productivity apps
Microsoft Family
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Teams
OneDrive
Outlook
Skype
Surface
Surface Duo
LinkedIn
Search and browse
Bing
Microsoft Edge
Microsoft Translator
SwiftKey
Windows
Activation
Activity history
Advertising ID
Diagnostics
Personalized offers
Feedback Hub
Get Help
Live captions
Location services and recording
Narrator
Phone Link - Link to Windows
Cross-device experiences
Security and safety features
Speech, Voice Activation, Inking, and Typing
Sync and backup settings
Update Services
Web browsers—Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer
Windows AI Features
Windows apps
Windows Hello
Windows Search
Entertainment and related services
Xbox
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Start
Silverlight
Windows Mixed Reality
Cookies
Most Microsoft sites use cookies, small text files placed on your device which web servers utilize in the domain that placed the cookie can retrieve later. We use cookies to store your preferences and settings, help with sign-in, provide personalized ads, and analyze site operations. For more information, see the
Cookies and similar technologies
section of this privacy statement.
EU-U.S., UK Extension, and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
Microsoft complies with the EU-U.S., UK Extension to the EU-U.S., and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks. To learn more, see the
Where we store and process personal data
section, and
visit the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website
.
Contact us
If you have a privacy concern, complaint, or question for the Microsoft Chief Privacy Officer or EU Data Protection Officer, please contact us by using our
web form
. For more information about contacting Microsoft, including Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, see the
How to contact us
section of this privacy statement.
Your privacy is important to us. This privacy statement explains the personal data Microsoft processes, how Microsoft processes it, and for what purposes.
Microsoft offers a wide range of products, including server products used to help operate enterprises worldwide, devices you use in your home, software that students use at school, and services developers use to create and host what’s next. References to Microsoft products in this statement include Microsoft services, websites, apps, software, servers, and devices.
Please read the product-specific details in this privacy statement, which provide additional relevant information. This statement applies to the interactions Microsoft has with you and the Microsoft products listed below, as well as other Microsoft products that display this statement.
Young people may prefer starting with the
Privacy for young people
page. That page highlights information that may be helpful for young people.
For individuals in the United States, please refer to our
U.S. State Data Privacy Notice
and the
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for additional information about the processing of your personal data, and your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws.
Personal data we collect
Microsoft collects data from you, through our interactions with you and through our products. You provide some of this data directly, and we get some of it by collecting data about your interactions, use, and experiences with our products. The data we collect depends on the context of your interactions with Microsoft and the choices you make, including your privacy settings and the products and features you use. We also obtain data about you from Microsoft affiliates, subsidiaries, and third parties.
If you represent an organization, such as a business or school, that utilizes Enterprise and Developer Products from Microsoft, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement to learn how we process your data. If you are an end user of a Microsoft product or a Microsoft account provided by your organization, please see the
Products provided by your organization
and the
Microsoft account
sections for more information.
You have choices when it comes to the technology you use and the data you share. When we ask you to provide personal data, you can decline. Many of our products require some personal data to provide you with a service. If you choose not to provide data -required to provide you with a product or feature, you cannot use that product or feature. Likewise, where we need to collect personal data by law or to enter into or carry out a contract with you, and you do not provide the data, we will not be able to enter into the contract; or if this relates to an existing product you are using, we may have to suspend or cancel it. We will notify you if this is the case at the time. Where providing the data is optional, and you choose not to share personal data, features like personalization that use such data will not work for you.
Microsoft collects data from you, through our interactions with you and through our products for a variety of purposes described below, including to operate effectively and provide you with the best experiences with our products. You provide some of this data directly, such as when you create a Microsoft account, administer your organization’s licensing account, submit a search query to Bing, register for a Microsoft event, upload a document to OneDrive, sign up for Microsoft 365, or contact us for support. We get some of it by collecting data about your interactions, use, and experience with our products and communications. In addition, we receive data from Microsoft affiliates, subsidiaries, and third parties.
We rely on a variety of legal reasons and permissions (sometimes called “legal bases”) to process data, including with your consent, a balancing of legitimate interests, necessity to enter into and perform contracts, and compliance with legal obligations, for a variety of purposes described below.
We also obtain data from third parties. We protect data obtained from third parties according to the practices described in this statement, plus any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the data. These third-party sources vary over time and include:
Data brokers from which we purchase demographic data to supplement the data we collect.
Services that make user-generated content from their service available to others, such as local business reviews or public social media posts.
Communication services, including email providers and social networks, when you give us permission to access your data on such third-party services or networks.
Service providers that help us determine your device’s location.
Partners with which we offer co-branded services or engage in joint marketing activities.
Developers who create experiences through or for Microsoft products.
Third parties that deliver experiences through Microsoft products.
Publicly-available sources, such as open public sector, academic, and commercial data sets and other data sources.
If you represent an organization, such as a business or school, that utilizes Enterprise and Developer Products from Microsoft, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement to learn how we process your data. If you are an end user of a Microsoft product or a Microsoft account provided by your organization, please see the
Products provided by your organization
and the
Microsoft account
sections for more information.
You have choices when it comes to the technology you use and the data you share. When you are asked to provide personal data, you can decline. Many of our products require some personal data to operate and provide you with a service. If you choose not to provide data required to operate and provide you with a product or feature, you cannot use that product or feature. Likewise, where we need to collect personal data by law or to enter into or carry out a contract with you, and you do not provide the data, we will not be able to enter into the contract; or if this relates to an existing product you’re using, we may have to suspend or cancel it. We will notify you if this is the case at the time. Where providing the data is optional, and you choose not to share personal data, features like personalization that use the data will not work for you.
The data we collect depends on the context of your interactions with Microsoft and the choices you make (including your privacy settings), the products and features you use, your location, and applicable law
.
The data we collect can include the following:
Name and contact data
. Your first and last name, email address, postal address, phone number, and other similar contact data.
Credentials
. Passwords, password hints, and similar security information used for authentication and account access.
Demographic data
. Data about you such as your age, gender, country, and preferred language.
Payment data
. Data to process payments, such as your payment instrument number (such as a credit card number) and the security code associated with your payment instrument.
Subscription and licensing data
. Information about your subscriptions, licenses, and other entitlements.
Interactions
. Data about your use of Microsoft products. In some cases, such as search queries, this is data you provide in order to make use of the products. In other cases, such as error reports, this is data we generate. Other examples of interactions data include:
Device and usage data
. Data about your device and the product and features you use, including information about your hardware and software, how our products perform, as well as your settings. For example:
Payment and account history
. Data about the items you purchase and activities associated with your account.
Browse history
. Data about the webpages you visit.
Device, connectivity, and configuration data
. Data about your device, your device configuration, and nearby networks. For example, data about the operating systems and other software installed on your device, including product keys. In addition, IP address, device identifiers (such as the IMEI number for phones), regional and language settings, and information about WLAN access points near your device.
Error reports and performance data
. Data about the performance of the products and any problems you experience, including error reports. Error reports (sometimes called “crash dumps”) can include details of the software or hardware related to an error, contents of files opened when an error occurred, and data about other software on your device.
Troubleshooting and help data
. Data you provide when you contact Microsoft for help, such as the products you use, and other details that help us provide support. For example, contact or authentication data, the content of your chats and other communications with Microsoft, data about the condition of your device, and the products you use related to your help inquiry. When you contact us, such as for customer support, phone conversations or chat sessions with our representatives may be monitored and recorded.
Bot usage data
. Interactions with bots and skills available through Microsoft products, including bots and skills provided by third parties.
Interests and favorites
. Data about your interests and favorites, such as the sports teams you follow, the programming languages you prefer, the stocks you track, or cities you add to track things like weather or traffic. In addition to those you explicitly provide, your interests and favorites can also be inferred or derived from other data we collect, such as your interactions on websites where our technology is used to show or measure ads.
Content consumption data
. Information about media content (e.g., TV, video, music, audio, text books, apps, and games) you access through our products.
Searches and commands
. Search queries and commands when you use Microsoft products with search or related productivity functionality, such as interactions with a chat bot.
Voice data
. Your voice data, sometimes referred to as “voice clips”, such as search queries, commands, or dictation you speak, which may include background sounds.
Text, inking, and typing data
. Text, inking, and typing data and related information. For example, when we collect inking data, we collect information about the placement of your inking instrument on your device.
Images
. Images and related information, such as picture metadata. For example, we collect the image you provide when you use a Bing image-enabled service.
Contacts and relationships
. Data about your contacts and relationships if you use a product to share information with others, manage contacts, communicate with others, or improve your productivity.
Social data
. Information about your relationships and interactions between you, other people, and organizations, such as types of engagement (e.g., likes, dislikes, events, etc.) related to people and organizations.
Location data
. Data about your device’s location, which can be either precise or imprecise. For example, we collect location data using Global Navigation Satellite System (GNSS) (e.g., GPS) and data about nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi hotspots. Location can also be inferred from a device’s IP address or data in your account profile that indicates where it is located with less precision, such as at a city or postal code level.
Other input
. Other inputs provided when you use our products. For example, data such as the buttons you press on an Xbox wireless controller using the Xbox network, skeletal tracking data when you use Kinect, and other sensor data, like the number of steps you take, when you use devices that have applicable sensors. If you attend an in-store event, we collect the data you provide to us when registering for or during the event and if you enter into a prize promotion, we collect the data you input into the entry form.
Content
. Content of your files and communications you input, upload, receive, create, and control. For example, if you transmit a file using Skype to another Skype user, we need to collect the content of that file to display it to you and the other user. If you receive an email using Outlook.com, we need to collect the content of that email to deliver it to your inbox, display it to you, enable you to reply to it, and store it for you until you choose to delete it. Other content we collect when providing products to you include:
Communications, including audio, video, text (typed, inked, dictated, or otherwise), in a message, email, call, meeting request, or chat.
Photos, images, songs, movies, software, and other media or documents you store, retrieve, or otherwise process with our cloud.
Video or recordings
. Recordings of events and activities at Microsoft buildings, retail spaces, and other locations. If you enter Microsoft Store locations or other facilities, or attend a Microsoft event that is recorded, we may process your image and voice data.
Feedback and ratings
. Information you provide to us and the content of messages you send to us, such as feedback, survey data, and product reviews you write.
Traffic data
. Data generated through your use of Microsoft’s communications services. Traffic data indicates with whom you have communicated and when your communications occurred. We will process your traffic data only as required to provide, maintain, and improve our communications services and we do so with your consent.
Product-specific sections below describe data collection practices applicable to use of those products.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
How we use personal data
Microsoft uses the data we collect to provide you with rich, interactive experiences. In particular, we use data to:
Provide our products, which includes updating, securing, and troubleshooting, as well as providing support. It also includes sharing data, when it is required to provide the service or carry out the transactions you request.
Improve and develop our products.
Personalize our products and make recommendations.
Advertise and market to you, which includes sending promotional communications, targeting advertising, and presenting you with relevant offers.
We also use the data to operate our business, which includes analyzing our performance, meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce, and doing research.
In carrying out these purposes, we combine data we collect from different contexts (for example, from your use of two Microsoft products) or obtain from third parties to give you a more seamless, consistent, and personalized experience, to make informed business decisions, and for other legitimate purposes.
Our processing of personal data for these purposes includes both automated and manual (human) methods of processing. Our automated methods often are related to and supported by our manual methods. For example, to build, train, and improve the accuracy of our automated methods of processing (including artificial intelligence or AI), we manually review some of the output produced by the automated methods against the underlying data.
As part of our efforts to improve and develop our products, we may use your data to develop and train our AI models. Learn more
here
.
Microsoft uses the data we collect to provide you rich, interactive experiences. In particular, we use data to:
Provide our products, which includes updating, securing, and troubleshooting, as well as providing support. It also includes sharing data, when it is required to provide the service or carry out the transactions you request.
Improve and develop our products.
Personalize our products and make recommendations.
Advertise and market to you, which includes sending promotional communications, targeting advertising, and presenting you relevant offers.
We also use the data to operate our business, which includes analyzing our performance, meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce, and doing research.
For these purposes, we combine data we collect from different contexts (for example, from your use of two Microsoft products). For example, Microsoft Store uses information about the apps and services you use to make personalized app recommendations. However, we have built in technological and procedural safeguards designed to prevent certain data combinations where required by law. For example, where required by law, we store data we collect from you when you are unauthenticated (not signed in) separately from any account information that directly identifies you, such as your name, email address, or phone number.
Our processing of personal data for these purposes includes both automated and manual (human) methods of processing. Our automated methods often are related to and supported by our manual methods. For example, to build, train, and improve the accuracy of our automated methods of processing (including artificial intelligence or AI), we manually review some of the output produced by the automated methods against the underlying data.
As part of our efforts to improve and develop our products, we may use your data to develop and train our AI models. Learn more
here
.
Purposes and legal bases for processing
When we process personal data about you, we do so with your consent and/or as required to provide the products you use, operate our business, meet our contractual and legal obligations, protect the security and safety of our systems and our customers, or fulfill other legitimate interests of Microsoft or third parties as described in this section and in the
Reasons we share personal data
section of this privacy statement. Our bases for processing your personal data may vary depending on how and across what products and services we process your data.
When we process personal data based on our or a third party’s legitimate interests, we consider and balance those interests against your rights and freedoms, and we will only process your personal data where the legitimate interests we have in processing are not outweighed by your interests.
When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area, we do so based on a variety of legal mechanisms, as described in the
Where we store and process personal data
section of this privacy statement.
More on the purposes of processing:
Provide our products
. We use data to operate our products and provide you with rich, interactive experiences. For example, if you use OneDrive, we process the documents you upload to OneDrive to enable you to retrieve, delete, edit, forward, or otherwise process it, at your direction as part of the service. Or, for example, if you enter a search query in the Bing search engine, we use that query to display search results to you. Additionally, as communications are a feature of various products, programs, and activities, we use data to contact you. For example, we may contact you by phone or email or other means to inform you when a subscription is ending or discuss your licensing account. We also communicate with you to secure our products, for example by letting you know when product updates are available.
Product improvement
. We use data to continually improve our products, including adding new features or capabilities. For example, we use error reports to improve security features, search queries and clicks in Bing to improve the relevancy of the search results, usage data to determine what new features to prioritize, and voice data to develop and improve speech recognition accuracy.
Personalization
. Many products include personalized features, such as recommendations that enhance your productivity and enjoyment. These features use automated processes to tailor your product experiences based on the data we have about you, such as inferences we make about you and your use of the product, activities, interests, and location. For example, depending on your settings, if you stream movies in a browser on your Windows device, you may see a recommendation for an app from the Microsoft Store that streams more efficiently. If you have a Microsoft account, with your permission, we can sync your settings on several devices. Many of our products provide controls to disable personalized features.
Product activation
. We use data—such as device and application type, location, and unique device, application, network, and subscription identifiers—to activate products that require activation.
Product development
. We use data to develop new products. For example, we use data, often de-identified, to better understand our customers’ computing and productivity needs, and to train and fine-tune AI models, which can shape the development of new products.
Customer support
. We use data to troubleshoot and diagnose product problems, repair customers’ devices, and provide other customer care and support services, including to help us provide, improve, and secure the quality of our products, services, and training, and to investigate security incidents. Call recording data may also be used to authenticate or identify you based on your voice to enable Microsoft to provide support services and investigate security incidents.
Help secure and troubleshoot
. We use data to help secure and troubleshoot our products. This includes using data to protect the security and safety of our products and customers, detecting malware and malicious activities, troubleshooting performance and compatibility issues to help customers get the most out of their experiences, and notifying customers of updates to our products. This may include using automated systems to detect security and safety issues.
Safety
. We use data to protect the safety of our products and our customers. Our security features and products can disrupt the operation of malicious software and notify users if malicious software is found on their devices. For example, some of our products, such as Outlook.com or OneDrive, systematically scan content in an automated manner to identify suspected spam, viruses, abusive actions, or URLs that have been flagged as fraud, phishing, or malware links; and we reserve the right to block delivery of a communication or remove content if it violates our terms.
In accordance with European Union Regulation (EU) 2021/1232, we have invoked the derogation permitted by that Regulation from Articles 5(1) and 6(1) of EU Directive 2002/58/EC. We use scanning technologies to create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) of certain images and video content on our systems. These technologies then compare the hashes they generate with hashes of reported child sexual exploitation and abuse imagery (known as a “hash set”), in a process called “hash matching”. Microsoft obtains hash sets from organizations that act in the public interest against child sex abuse. This can result in sharing information with the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC) and law enforcement authorities.
Updates
. We use data we collect to develop product updates and security patches. For example, we may use information about your device’s capabilities, such as available memory, to provide you a software update or security patch. Updates and patches are intended to maximize your experience with our products, help you protect the privacy and security of your data, provide new features, and evaluate whether your device is ready to process such updates.
Promotional communications
. We use data we collect to deliver promotional communications. You can sign up for email subscriptions and choose whether you wish to receive promotional communications from Microsoft by email, SMS, physical mail, and telephone. For information about managing your contact data, email subscriptions, and promotional communications, see the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Relevant offers
. Microsoft uses data to provide you with relevant and valuable information regarding our products. We analyze data from a variety of sources to predict the information that will be most interesting and relevant to you and deliver such information to you in a variety of ways. For example, we may predict your interest in gaming and communicate with you about new games you may like.
Advertising
. Microsoft does not use what you say in email, human-to-human chat, video calls, or voice mail, or your documents, photos, or other personal files to target ads to you. We use data we collect through our interactions with you, through some of our first-party products, services, apps, and web properties (Microsoft properties), and on third-party web properties, for advertising on our Microsoft properties and on third-party properties. We may use automated processes to help make advertising more relevant to you. For more information about how your data is used for advertising, see the
Advertising
section of this privacy statement.
Prize promotions and events
. We use your data to administer prize promotions and events available in our physical Microsoft Stores. For example, if you enter into a prize promotion, we may use your data to select a winner and provide the prize to you if you win. Or, if you register for a coding workshop or gaming event, we will add your name to the list of expected attendees.
Transacting commerce
. We use data to carry out your transactions with us. For example, we process payment information to provide customers with product subscriptions and use contact information to deliver goods purchased from the Microsoft Store.
Reporting and business operations
. We use data to analyze our operations and perform business intelligence. This enables us to make informed decisions and report on the performance of our business.
Protecting rights and property
. We use data to detect and prevent fraud, resolve disputes, enforce agreements, and protect our property. For example, we use data to confirm the validity of software licenses to reduce piracy. We may use automated processes to detect and prevent activities that violate our rights and the rights of others, such as fraud.
Legal compliance
. We process data to comply with applicable laws. For example, we use the age of our customers to assist us in meeting our obligations to protect children’s privacy. We also process contact information and credentials to help customers exercise their data protection rights.
Research.
With appropriate technical and organizational measures to safeguard individuals’ rights and freedoms, we use data to conduct research, including advanced machine learning and artificial intelligence capabilities for the benefit of the public interest and scientific purposes.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Reasons we share personal data
We share your personal data with your consent or to complete any transaction or provide any product you have requested or authorized. We also share data with Microsoft-controlled affiliates and subsidiaries; with vendors working on our behalf; when required by law or to respond to legal process; to protect our customers; to protect lives; to maintain the security of our products; and to protect the rights and property of Microsoft and its customers.
Please note that, as defined under certain U.S. state data privacy laws, “sharing” also relates to providing personal data to third parties for personalized advertising purposes. Please see the
U.S. State Data Privacy
section below and our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for more information.
We share your personal data with your consent or as necessary to complete any transaction or provide any product you have requested or authorized. For example, we share your content with third parties when you tell us to do so, such as when you send an email to a friend, share photos and documents on OneDrive, or link accounts with another service. If you use a Microsoft product provided by an organization you are affiliated with, such as an employer or school, or use an email address provided by such organization to access Microsoft products, we share certain data, such as interaction data and diagnostic data to enable your organization to manage the products. When you provide payment data to make a purchase, we will share payment data with banks and other entities that process payment transactions or provide other financial services, and for fraud prevention and credit risk reduction. Additionally, when you save a payment method (such as a card) to your account that you and other Microsoft account holders use to make purchases from Microsoft or its affiliates, your purchase receipts may be shared with anyone else who uses and has access to the same payment method to make a purchase from Microsoft, including the payment method’s named accountholder. When you permit push notifications for Microsoft products or applications on a non-Windows device, the operating system of that device will process some personal data to provide push notifications. Accordingly, Microsoft may send data to an external, third-party notification provider to deliver push notifications. Your device’s push notification services are governed by their own service-specific terms and privacy statements.
We also share personal data for digital advertising purposes. When you visit a website or use an app that wants to show you ads, the digital property may allow Microsoft to access or receive device data or certain other data identified in the Personal data we collect section above. We may then share this information with third party advertising platforms and advertisers to facilitate the delivery and measurement of ads on such digital properties.  Please see the Advertising and U.S. State Data Privacy sections below for more information about how your data is used for advertising.
In addition, we share personal data among Microsoft-controlled affiliates and subsidiaries. We also share personal data with vendors or agents working on our behalf for the purposes described in this statement. For example, companies we've hired to provide customer service support or assist in protecting and securing our systems and services may need access to personal data to provide those functions. In such cases, these companies must abide by our data privacy and security requirements and are not allowed to use personal data they receive from us for any other purpose. We may also disclose personal data as part of a corporate transaction such as a merger or sale of assets.
Finally, we will retain, access, transfer, disclose, and preserve personal data, including your content (such as the content of your emails in Outlook.com, or files in private folders on OneDrive), when we have a good faith belief that doing so is necessary to do any of the following:
Comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, including from law enforcement or other government agencies.
Protect the safety of our customers, organizations, and the public — for example, to prevent spam or attempts to defraud or otherwise cause harm, or to detect, prevent, and combat harmful or illegal behavior including the creation and sharing of harmful or illegal content.
Operate and maintain the security of our products, including to prevent or stop an attack on our computer systems or networks.
Protect the rights or property of Microsoft, including enforcing the terms governing the use of the services—however, if we receive information indicating that someone is using our services to traffic in stolen intellectual or physical property of Microsoft, we will not inspect a customer's private content ourselves, but we may refer the matter to law enforcement.
For more information about data we disclose in response to requests from law enforcement and other government agencies, please see our
Law Enforcement Requests Report
.
Please note that some of our products include links to or otherwise enable you to access products of third parties whose privacy practices differ from those of Microsoft. If you provide personal data to any of those products, your data is governed by their privacy policies.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
How to access and control your personal data
You can also make choices about the collection and use of your data by Microsoft. You can control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, by contacting Microsoft or using various tools we provide. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law. How you can access or control your personal data will also depend on which products you use. For example, you can:
Control the use of your data for personalized advertising from Microsoft, including Xandr, by visiting our
opt-out page
.
Choose whether you wish to receive promotional emails, SMS messages, telephone calls, and postal mail from Microsoft.
Access and clear some of your data through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
.
We provide aggregate metrics about user requests to exercise their data protection rights via the
Microsoft Privacy Report
.
You can also make choices about the collection and use of your data by Microsoft. You can control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, by contacting Microsoft or using various tools we provide. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law. How you can access or control your personal data will also depend on which products you use. For example, you can:
Control the use of your data for personalized advertising from Microsoft by visiting our
opt-out page
.
Choose whether you wish to receive promotional emails, SMS messages, telephone calls, and postal mail from Microsoft.
Access and clear some of your data through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
.
We provide aggregate metrics about user requests to exercise their data protection rights via the
Microsoft Privacy Report
.
You can access and control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained with tools Microsoft provides to you, which are described below, or by contacting Microsoft. For instance:
If Microsoft obtained your consent to use your personal data, you can withdraw that consent at any time.
You can request access to, erasure of, and updates to your personal data.
If you’d like to port your data elsewhere, you can use tools Microsoft provides to do so, or if none are available, you can contact Microsoft for assistance.
You can also object to or restrict the use of your personal data by Microsoft. For example, you can object at any time to our use of your personal data:
For direct marketing purposes.
Where we are performing a task in the public interest or pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party.
You may have these rights under applicable laws, including the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), but we offer them regardless of your location. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law.
If your organization, such as your employer, school, or service provider, provides you with access to and is administering your use of Microsoft products, contact your organization to learn more about how to access and control your personal data.
You can access and control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, using various tools we provide. The tools most useful to you will depend on our interactions with you and your use of our products. Here is a general list of tools we provide to help you control your personal data; specific products may provide additional controls.
Bing.
If you are signed into Bing, you can view and clear your stored search and chat history on your
privacy dashboard
. If you are not signed into Bing, you can view and clear stored search history associated to your device in your
Bing settings
.
Microsoft account.
If you wish to access, edit, or remove the profile information and payment information in your Microsoft account, change your password, add security information or close your account, you can do so by visiting the
Microsoft account website
.
If you have a
Microsoft Developer Network
(MSDN) public profile, you can access and edit your data by signing in at
MSDN forum
.
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. You can control some of the data Microsoft processes through your use of a Microsoft account on the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. From here, for example, you can view and clear the browsing, search, and location data associated with your Microsoft account.
Microsoft Store.
You can access your Microsoft Store profile and account information by visiting
Microsoft Store
and selecting
View account
or
Order history.
Microsoft Teams for personal use.
You can find out how to export or delete Teams data relating to your personal Microsoft account by visiting this
page
.
OneDrive.
You can view, download, and delete your files and photos in OneDrive by signing into your
OneDrive
.
Outlook.com.
You can download your emails in
Outlook.com
by signing into your account and navigating to your
Privacy and data
settings.
Skype
. If you wish to access, edit, or remove some profile and payment information for Skype or change your password,
sign in to your account
. If you wish to export your Skype chat history and files shared on Skype, you can
request a copy
.
Volume Licensing Service Center (VLSC).
If you are a Volume Licensing customer, you can control your contact information and subscription and licensing data in one location by visiting the
Volume Licensing Service Center website
.
Xbox
. If you use the Xbox network or Xbox.com, you can view or edit your personal data, including billing and account information, privacy settings, and online safety and data sharing preferences by accessing
My Xbox
on the Xbox console or on the Xbox.com website.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
. We will respond to requests to control your personal data as required by applicable law.
Your communications preferences
You can choose whether you wish to receive promotional communications from Microsoft by email, SMS, physical mail, and telephone. If you receive promotional email or SMS messages from us and would like to opt out, you can do so by following the directions in that message. You can also make choices about the receipt of promotional email, telephone calls, and postal mail by signing in with your personal Microsoft account, and viewing your
communication permissions
where you can update contact information, manage Microsoft-wide contact preferences, opt out of email subscriptions, and choose whether to share your contact information with Microsoft partners. If you do not have a personal Microsoft account, you can manage your Microsoft email contact preferences by using this
web form
. These choices do not apply to mandatory service communications that are part of certain Microsoft products, programs, activities, or to surveys or other informational communications that have their own unsubscribe method.
Your advertising choices
To opt out of receiving personalized advertising from Microsoft, including Xandr, visit our
opt-out page
. When you opt out, your preference is stored in a cookie that is specific to the web browser you are using. The opt-out cookie has an expiration date of five years. If you delete the cookies on your device, you need to opt out again.
You can also link your opt-out choice with your personal Microsoft account. It will then apply on any device where you use that account and will continue to apply until someone signs in with a different personal Microsoft account on that device. If you delete the cookies on your device, you will need to sign in again for the settings to apply. You can view
our third party ad partners
on the
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
, and opt-out of data sharing with third parties at our opt-out
page
.
For Microsoft-controlled advertising that appears in apps on Windows, you may use the opt-out linked to your personal Microsoft account, or opt out of interest-based advertising by turning off the advertising ID in Windows settings.
Because the data used for interest-based advertising is also used for other required purposes (including providing our products, analytics, and fraud detection), opting out of interest-based advertising does not stop that data collection. You will continue to get ads, although they may be less relevant to you.
You can opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from third parties we partner with by visiting their sites (see above).
Browser-based controls
When you use a browser, you can control your personal data using certain features. For example:
Cookie controls
. You can control the data stored by cookies and withdraw consent to cookies by using the browser-based cookie controls described in the
Cookies
section of this privacy statement.
Tracking protections
. You can control the data third-party sites can collect about you using Tracking Protection in Internet Explorer (versions 9 and up) and Microsoft Edge. This feature will block third-party content, including cookies, from any site that is listed in a Tracking Protection List you add.
Browser controls for "Do Not Track."
Some browsers have incorporated "Do Not Track" (DNT) features that can send a signal to the websites you visit indicating you do not wish to be tracked. Because there is not yet a common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal, Microsoft services do not currently respond to browser DNT signals. We continue to work with the online industry to define a common understanding of how to treat DNT signals. In the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from Microsoft as described above.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Cookies and similar technologies
Cookies are small text files placed on your device to store data that can be recalled by a web server in the domain that placed the cookie. We use cookies and similar technologies for storing and honoring your preferences and settings, enabling you to sign in, providing interest-based advertising, combating fraud, analyzing how our products perform, and fulfilling other legitimate purposes. Microsoft apps use additional identifiers, such as the advertising ID in Windows described in the
Advertising ID
section of this privacy statement, for similar purposes.
We also use “web beacons” to help deliver cookies and gather usage and performance data. Our websites may include web beacons, cookies, or similar technologies from Microsoft affiliates and partners as well as third parties, such as service providers acting on our behalf.
Third party cookies may include: Social Media cookies designed to show you ads and content based on your social media profiles and activities on our websites; Analytics cookies to better understand how you and others use our websites so that we can make them better, and so the third parties can improve their own products and services; Advertising cookies to show you ads that are relevant to you; and Required cookies used to perform essential website functions. Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication.
Please see the Learn more section below for information about our use of third party cookies, web beacons and analytics services, and other similar technologies on our websites and services. For a list of the third parties that set cookies on our websites, including service providers acting on our behalf, please visit our
third party cookie
inventory. On some of our websites, a list of third parties is available directly on the site. The third parties on these sites may not be included in the list on our
third party cookie inventory
.
You have a variety of tools to control the data collected by cookies, web beacons, and similar technologies. For example, you can use controls in your internet browser to limit how the websites you visit are able to use cookies and to withdraw your consent by clearing or blocking cookies.
Cookies are small text files placed on your device to store data that can be recalled by a web server in the domain that placed the cookie. This data often consists of a string of numbers and letters that uniquely identifies your computer, but it can contain other information as well. Some cookies are placed by third parties acting on our behalf. We use cookies and similar technologies to store and honor your preferences and settings, enable you to sign-in, provide interest-based advertising, combat fraud, analyze how our products perform, and fulfill other legitimate purposes described below. Microsoft apps use additional identifiers, such as the advertising ID in Windows, for similar purposes, and many of our websites and applications also contain web beacons or other similar technologies, as described below.
Our use of cookies and similar technologies
Microsoft uses cookies and similar technologies for several purposes, depending on the context or product, including:
Storing your preferences and settings
. We use cookies to store your preferences and settings on your device, and to enhance your experiences. For example, depending on your settings, if you enter your city or postal code to get local news or weather information on a Microsoft website, we store that data in a cookie so that you will see the relevant local information when you return to the site. Saving your preferences with cookies, such as your preferred language, prevents you from having to set your preferences repeatedly. If you opt out of interest-based advertising, we store your opt-out preference in a cookie on your device. Similarly, in scenarios where we obtain your consent to place cookies on your device, we store your choice in a cookie.
Sign-in and authentication
. We use cookies to authenticate you. When you sign in to a website using your personal Microsoft account, we store a unique ID number, and the time you signed in, in an encrypted cookie on your device. This cookie allows you to move from page to page within the site without having to sign in again on each page. You can also save your sign-in information so you do not have to sign in each time you return to the site.
Security
. We use cookies to process information that helps us secure our products, as well as detect fraud and abuse.
Storing information you provide to a website
. We use cookies to remember information you shared. When you provide information to Microsoft, such as when you add products to a shopping cart on Microsoft websites, we store the data in a cookie for the purpose of remembering the information.
Social media
. Some of our websites include social media cookies, including those that enable users who are signed in to the social media service to share content via that service.
Feedback
. Microsoft uses cookies to enable you to provide feedback on a website.
Interest-based advertising
. Microsoft uses cookies to collect data about your online activity and identify your interests so that we can provide advertising that is most relevant to you. You can opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from Microsoft as described in the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Showing advertising
. Microsoft uses cookies to record how many visitors have clicked on an advertisement and to record which advertisements you have seen, for example, so you do not see the same one repeatedly.
Analytics
. We use first- and third-party cookies and other identifiers to gather usage and performance data. For example, we use cookies to count the number of unique visitors to a web page or service and to develop other statistics about the operations of our products.
Performance
. Microsoft uses cookies to understand and improve how our products perform. For example, we use cookies to gather data that helps with load balancing; this helps us keep our websites remain up and running.
Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication. Please see the “How to Control Cookies” section below for more information.
Some of the cookies we commonly use are listed below. This list is not exhaustive, but it is intended to illustrate the primary purposes for which we typically set cookies. If you visit one of our websites, the site will set some or all of the following cookies:
MSCC
. Contains user choices for most Microsoft properties.
MUID, MC1, MSFPC, and MSPTC
. Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
ANON
. Contains the ANID, a unique identifier derived from your Microsoft account, which is used for advertising, personalization, and operational purposes. It is also used to preserve your choice to opt out of interest-based advertising from Microsoft if you have chosen to associate the opt-out with your Microsoft account.
CC
. Contains a country code as determined from your IP address.
PPAuth, MSPAuth, MSNRPSAuth, KievRPSAuth, WLSSC, MSPProf
. Helps to authenticate you when you sign in with your Microsoft account.
MC0
. Detects whether cookies are enabled in the browser.
MS0
. Identifies a specific session.
NAP
. Contains an encrypted version of your country, postal code, age, gender, language and occupation, if known, based on your Microsoft account profile.
MH
. Appears on co-branded sites where Microsoft is partnering with an advertiser. This cookie identifies the advertiser, so the right ad is selected.
childinfo, kcdob, kcrelid, kcru, pcfm
. Contains information that Microsoft account uses within its pages in relation to child accounts.
MR
. This cookie is used by Microsoft to reset or refresh the MUID cookie.
x-ms-gateway-slice
. Identifies a gateway for load balancing.
TOptOut
. Records your decision not to receive interest-based advertising delivered by Microsoft. Where required, we place this cookie by default and remove it when you consent to interest-based advertising.
ApplicationGatewayAffinity
and
ApplicationGatewayAffinityCORS
.  These session cookies are used for load balancing purposes and to ensure requests for a user session are handled by the same server.
We may also use the cookies of other Microsoft affiliates, companies, and partners, such as LinkedIn and Xandr.
Third Party Cookies
In addition to the cookies Microsoft sets when you visit our websites, we also use cookies from third parties to enhance the services on our sites. Some third parties can also set cookies when you visit Microsoft sites. For example:
Companies we hire to provide services on our behalf, such as site analytics, place cookies when you visit our sites.
Companies that deliver content on Microsoft sites, such as videos or news, or ads, place cookies on their own.
These companies use the data they process in accordance with their privacy policies, which may enable these companies to collect and combine information about your activities across websites, apps, or online services.
The following types of third-party cookies may be used, depending on the context, service or product, as well as your settings and permissions:
Social Media cookies.
We and third parties use social media cookies to show you ads and content based on your social media profiles and activity on our websites. They’re used to connect your activity on our websites to your social media profiles so the ads and content you see on our websites and on social media will better reflect your interests.
Analytics cookies.
We allow third parties to use analytics cookies to understand how you use our websites so we can make them better and the third parties can develop and improve their products, which they may use on websites that are not owned or operated by Microsoft. For example, analytics cookies are used to gather information about the pages you visit and how many clicks you need to accomplish a task. These cookies may also be used for advertising purposes.
Advertising cookies.
We and third parties use advertising cookies to show you new ads by recording which ads you've already seen. They're also used to track which ads you click on or purchases you make after clicking on an ad for payment purposes, and to show you ads that are more relevant to you. For example, they're used to detect when you click on an ad and show you ads based on your social media interests and website browsing history.
Required cookies.
We use required cookies to perform essential website functions. For example, to log you in, save your language preferences, provide a shopping cart experience, improve performance, route traffic between web servers, detect the size of your screen, determine page load times, and measure audiences. These cookies are necessary for our websites to work.
Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication.
For a list of the third parties that set cookies on our websites, including service providers acting on our behalf, please visit our
third party cookie inventory
. The third party cookie inventory also includes links to those third parties’ websites or privacy notices. Please consult the third party websites or privacy notices for more information on their privacy practices with respect to their cookies that may be set on our websites. On some of our websites, a list of third parties is available directly on the site. The third parties on these sites may not be included in the list on our
third party cookie inventory
.
How to control cookies
Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but provide controls that allow you to block or delete them. For example, in Microsoft Edge, you can block or delete cookies by selecting
Settings
>
Privacy and services
>
Clear Browsing data
>
Cookies and other site data
. For more information about how to delete your cookies in Microsoft browsers, see
Microsoft Edge
,
Microsoft Edge Legacy
, or
Internet Explorer
. If you use a different browser, refer to that browser’s instructions.
As mentioned above, where required, we obtain your consent before placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication. We separate these optional cookies by purpose, such as for advertising and social media purposes. You may consent to certain categories of optional cookies and not others. You also may adjust your choices by clicking “Manage cookies” in the footer of the website or through the settings made available on the website. Certain features of Microsoft products depend on cookies. If you choose to block cookies, you cannot sign in or use some of those features, and preferences that are dependent on cookies will be lost. If you choose to delete cookies, any settings and preferences controlled by those cookies, including advertising preferences, are deleted and will need to be recreated.
Additional privacy controls that can impact cookies, including the tracking protections feature of Microsoft browsers, are described in the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Our use of web beacons and analytics services
Some Microsoft webpages contain electronic tags known as web beacons that we use to help deliver cookies on our websites, count users who have visited those websites, and deliver co-branded products. We also include web beacons or similar technologies in our electronic communications to determine whether you open and act on them.
In addition to placing web beacons on our own websites, we sometimes work with other companies to place our web beacons on their websites or in their advertisements. This helps us to, for example, develop statistics on how often clicking on an advertisement on a Microsoft website results in a purchase or other action on the advertiser's website. It also allows us to understand your activity on the website of a Microsoft partner in connection with your use of a Microsoft product or service.
Finally, Microsoft products often contain web beacons or similar technologies from third-party analytics providers, which help us compile aggregated statistics about the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns or other operations. These technologies enable the analytics providers to set or read their own cookies or other identifiers on your device, through which they can collect information about your online activities across applications, websites, or other products. However, we prohibit these analytics providers from using web beacons on our sites to collect or access information that directly identifies you (such as your name or email address). You can opt out of data collection or use by some of these analytics providers by visiting any of the following sites:
Adjust
,
AppsFlyer
,
Clicktale
,
Flurry Analytics
,
Google Analytics
(requires you to install a browser add-on),
Kissmetrics
,
Mixpanel
,
Nielsen
,
Acuity Ads
,
WebTrends
, or
Optimizely
.
Other similar technologies
In addition to standard cookies and web beacons, our products can also use other similar technologies to store and read data files on your computer. This is typically done to maintain your preferences or to improve speed and performance by storing certain files locally. But, like standard cookies, these technologies can also store a unique identifier for your computer, which can then track behavior. These technologies include Local Shared Objects (or "Flash cookies") and Silverlight Application Storage.
Local Shared Objects or "Flash cookies."
Websites that use Adobe Flash technologies can use Local Shared Objects or "Flash cookies" to store data on your computer. To learn how to manage or block Flash cookies, go to the
Flash Player help page
.
Silverlight Application Storage
. Websites or applications that use Microsoft Silverlight technology also have the ability to store data by using Silverlight Application Storage. To learn how to manage or block such storage, see the
Silverlight
section of this privacy statement.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Products provided by your organization—notice to end users
If you use a Microsoft product with an account provided by an organization you are affiliated with, such as your work or school account, that organization can:
Control and administer your Microsoft product and product account, including controlling privacy-related settings of the product or product account.
Access and process your data, including the interaction data, diagnostic data, and the contents of your communications and files associated with your Microsoft product and product accounts.
If you lose access to your work or school account (in event of change of employment, for example), you may lose access to products and the content associated with those products, including those you acquired on your own behalf, if you used your work or school account to sign in to such products.
Many Microsoft products are intended for use by organizations, such as schools and businesses. Please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement. If your organization provides you with access to Microsoft products, your use of the Microsoft products is subject to your organization's policies, if any. You should direct your privacy inquiries, including any requests to exercise your data protection rights, to your organization’s administrator. When you use social features in Microsoft products, other users in your network may see some of your activity. To learn more about the social features and other functionality, please review documentation or help content specific to the Microsoft product. Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of our customers, which may differ from those set forth in this privacy statement.
When you use a Microsoft product provided by your organization, Microsoft’s processing of your personal data in connection with that product is governed by a contract between Microsoft and your organization. Microsoft processes your personal data to provide the product to your organization and you, and in some cases for Microsoft’s business operations related to providing the product as described in the
Enterprise and developer products
section. As mentioned above, if you have questions about Microsoft’s processing of your personal data in connection with providing products to your organization, please contact your organization. If you have questions about Microsoft’s business operations in connection with providing products to your organization as provided in the Product Terms, please contact Microsoft as described in the
How to contact us
section. For more information on our business operations, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section.
For Microsoft products provided by your K-12 school, including Microsoft 365 Education, Microsoft will:
not collect or use student personal data beyond that needed for authorized educational or school purposes;
not sell or rent student personal data;
not use or share student personal data for advertising or similar commercial purposes, such as behavioral targeting of advertisements to students;
not build a personal profile of a student, other than for supporting authorized educational or school purposes or as authorized by the parent, guardian, or student of appropriate age; and
require that our vendors with whom student personal data is shared to deliver the educational service, if any, are obligated to implement these same commitments for student personal data.
Back to top
Microsoft account
With a Microsoft account, you can sign in to Microsoft products, as well as those of select Microsoft partners. Personal data associated with your Microsoft account includes credentials, name and contact data, payment data, device and usage data, your contacts, information about your activities, and your interests and favorites. Signing in to your Microsoft account enables personalization and consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account, and enables other features.
There are three types of Microsoft account:
When you create your own Microsoft account tied to your personal email address, we refer to that account as a
personal Microsoft account
.
When you or your organization (such as an employer or your school) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address provided by that organization, we refer to that account as a
work or school account
.
When you or your service provider (such as a cable or internet service provider) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address with your service provider’s domain, we refer to that account as a
third-party account
.
If you sign into a service offered by a third party with your Microsoft account, you will share with that third party the account data required by that service.
With a Microsoft account, you can sign into Microsoft products, as well as those of select Microsoft partners. Personal data associated with your Microsoft account includes credentials, name and contact data, payment data, device and usage data, your contacts, information about your activities, and your interests and favorites. Signing into your Microsoft account enables personalization, consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account, and enables other features. There are three types of Microsoft account:
When you create your own Microsoft account tied to your personal email address, we refer to that account as a
personal Microsoft account
.
When you or your organization (such as an employer or your school) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address provided by that organization, we refer to that account as a
work or school account
.
When you or your service provider (such as a cable or internet service provider) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address with your service provider’s domain, we refer to that account as a
third-party account
.
Personal Microsoft accounts
. The data associated with your personal Microsoft account, and how that data is used, depends on how you use the account.
Creating your Microsoft account
. When you create a personal Microsoft account, you will be asked to provide certain personal data and we will assign a unique ID number to identify your account and associated information. While some products, such as those involving payment, require a real name, you can sign in to and use other Microsoft products without providing your real name. Some data you provide, such as your display name, email address, and phone number, can be used to help others find and connect with you within Microsoft products. For example, people who know your display name, email address, or phone number can use it to search for you on Skype or Microsoft Teams for personal use and send you an invite to connect with them. Note that if you use a work or school email address to create a personal Microsoft account, your employer or school may gain access to your data. In some cases, you will need to change the email address to a personal email address in order to continue accessing consumer-oriented products (such as the Xbox network).
Signing in to Microsoft account
. When you sign in to your Microsoft account, we create a record of your sign-in, which includes the date and time, information about the product you signed in to, your sign-in name, the unique number assigned to your account, a unique identifier assigned to your device, your IP address, and your operating system and browser version.
Signing in to Microsoft products
. Signing in to your account enables improved personalization, provides seamless and consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to access and use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account, and enables other enhanced features and settings. For example, when you sign in, Microsoft makes information saved to your account available across Microsoft products so important things are right where you need them. When you sign in to your account, you will stay signed in until you sign out. If you add your Microsoft account to a Windows device (version 8 or higher), Windows will automatically sign you in to products that use Microsoft account when you access those products on that device. When you are signed in, some products will display your name or username and your profile photo (if you have added one to your profile) as part of your use of Microsoft products, including in your communications, social interactions, and public posts.
Learn more about your Microsoft account, your data, and your choices
.
Signing in to third-party products
. If you sign in to a third-party product with your Microsoft account, you will share data with the third party in accordance with the third party’s privacy policy. The third party will also receive the version number assigned to your account (a new version number is assigned each time you change your sign-in data); and information that describes whether your account has been deactivated. If you share your profile data, the third party can display your name or user name and your profile photo (if you have added one to your profile) when you are signed in to that third-party product. If you chose to make payments to third-party merchants using your Microsoft account, Microsoft will pass information stored in your Microsoft account to the third party or its vendors (e.g., payment processors) as necessary to process your payment and fulfill your order (such as name, credit card number, billing and shipping addresses, and relevant contact information). The third party can use or share the data it receives when you sign in or make a purchase according to its own practices and policies.
You should carefully review the privacy statement for each product you sign in to and each merchant you purchase from to determine how it will use the data it collects
.
Work or school accounts
. The data associated with a work or school account, and how it will be used, is generally similar to the use and collection of data associated with a personal Microsoft account.
If your employer or school uses Microsoft Entra ID to manage the account it provides you, you can use your work or school account to sign in to Microsoft products, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, and third-party products provided to you by your organization. If required by your organization, you will also be asked to provide a phone number or an alternative email address for additional security verification. And, if allowed by your organization, you may also use your work or school account to sign in to Microsoft or third-party products that you acquire for yourself.
If you sign in to Microsoft products with a work or school account, note:
The owner of the domain associated with your email address may control and administer your account, and access and process your data, including the contents of your communications and files, including data stored in products provided to you by your organization, and products you acquire by yourself.
Your use of the products is subject to your organization’s policies, if any. You should consider both your organization’s policies and whether you are comfortable enabling your organization to access your data before you choose to use your work or school account to sign in to products you acquire for yourself.
If you lose access to your work or school account (if you change employers, for example), you may lose access to products, including content associated with those products, you acquired on your own behalf if you used your work or school account to sign in to such products.
Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of your organization, which may differ from those of Microsoft.
If your organization is administering your use of Microsoft products, please direct your privacy inquiries, including any requests to exercise your data subject rights, to your administrator. See also the
Notice to end users
section of this privacy statement.
If you are uncertain whether your account is a work or school account, please contact your organization.
Third-party accounts
. The data associated with a third-party Microsoft account, and how it will be used, is generally similar to the use and collection of data associated with a personal Microsoft account. Your service provider has control over your account, including the ability to access or delete your account.
You should carefully review the terms the third party provided you to understand what it can do with your account
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Collection of data from children
For users under the age of 13 or as specified by law in their jurisdiction, certain Microsoft products and services will either block users under that age or will ask them to obtain consent or authorization from a parent or guardian before they can use it, including when creating an account to access Microsoft services. We will not knowingly ask children under that age to provide more data than is required to provide for the product.
Once parental consent or authorization is granted, the child's account is treated much like any other account. Learn more about personal and school accounts in the
Microsoft account section
of the Privacy Statement and
Microsoft Family Safety
in the product-specific section. The child can access communication services, like Outlook and Skype, and can freely communicate and share data with other users of all ages. Parents or guardians can change or revoke the consent choices previously made.
Learn more about parental consent and Microsoft child accounts
. As the organizer of a Microsoft family group, the parent or guardian can manage their child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page and view and delete a child’s data on their
privacy dashboard
. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who provided the consent for account creation. For child accounts that do not require parental consent to be created, (e.g., for children who are over the age at which parental consent is legally required), the parent or guardian may still use a family group, but must add the child account to their family group after the account is created. Select Learn more below for more information about how to access and delete child data and information about children and Xbox profiles.
For users under the age of 13 or as specified by law in their jurisdiction, certain Microsoft products and services will either block users under that age or will ask them to obtain consent or authorization from a parent or guardian before they can use it, including when creating an account to access Microsoft services. We will not knowingly ask children under that age to provide more data than is required to provide for the product.
Once parental consent or authorization is granted, the child's account is treated much like any other account. The child can access communication services, like Outlook and Skype, and can freely communicate and share data with other users of all ages.
Learn more about parental consent and Microsoft child accounts
.
Parents or guardians can change or revoke the consent choices previously made. As the organizer of a Microsoft family group, the parent or guardian can manage their child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page and view and delete a child’s data on their
privacy dashboard
. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who provided the consent for account creation. For child accounts that do not require parental consent to be created (e.g., for children who are over the age at which parental consent is legally required), the parent or guardian may still use a family group, but must add the child account to their family group after the account is created. See below for more information about how to access and delete child data.
Below is additional information about the collection of data from children, including more details as related to Xbox.
Accessing and deleting child data.
For Microsoft products and services that require parental consent, a parent can view and delete certain data belonging to their child from the parent’s
privacy dashboard
: browsing history, search history, location activity, media activity, apps and service activity, and product and service performance data. To delete this data, a parent can sign in to their
privacy dashboard
and manage their child’s activities. Please note that a parent’s ability to access and/or delete a child’s personal information on their privacy dashboard will vary depending on the laws where you are located.
Additionally, a parent can contact our
privacy support team
through the
privacy support form
and, following authentication, request that the data types on the privacy dashboard together with the following data be deleted: software, setup, and inventory; device connectivity and configuration; feedback and ratings; fitness and activity; support content; support interactions; and environmental sensor. We process authenticated deletion requests within 30 days of receipt.
Please note that content like emails, contacts, and chats are accessible through in-product experiences. You can find more information about data you are able to control within Microsoft products by visiting our
Privacy Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs)
.
If your child’s account is not a part of your Microsoft family group and you do not have access to your child’s activity on your privacy dashboard, then you need to submit a request related to your child’s data through the
privacy support form
. The privacy team will ask for account verification before fulfilling the request.
To delete all of your child’s personal information, you must request deletion of the child’s account through the
close your account form
. This link will prompt you to sign in with your child’s account credentials. Check that the page shows the correct Microsoft account, and then follow the instructions to request that your child’s account be deleted.
Learn more about how to close a Microsoft account
.
After you submit the request to close your child’s account, we will wait 60 days before permanently deleting the account in case you change your mind or need to access something on the account before it is permanently closed and deleted. During the waiting period, the account is marked for closure and permanent deletion, but it still exists. If you want to reopen your child’s Microsoft account, just sign in again within that 60-day period. We will cancel the account closure, and the account will be reinstated.
What is Xbox?
Xbox is the gaming and entertainment division of Microsoft. Xbox hosts an online network that consists of software and enables online experiences crossing multiple platforms. This network lets your child find and play games, view content, and connect with friends on Xbox and other gaming and social networks.
When users sign in to Xbox, in apps, games or on an Xbox console, we assign a unique identifier to their device. For instance, when their Xbox console is connected to the internet and they sign in to the console, we identify which console and which version of the console’s operating system they are using.
Xbox continues to provide new experiences in client apps that are connected to and backed by services such as Xbox network and cloud gaming. When signed in to an Xbox experience, we collect required data to help keep these experiences safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Data we collect when you create an Xbox profile
. You as the parent or guardian are required to consent to the collection of personal data from a child under 13 years old or as otherwise specified by your jurisdiction. With your permission, your child can have an Xbox profile and use the online Xbox network. During the child Xbox profile creation, you will sign in with your own Microsoft account to verify that you are an adult organizer in your Microsoft family group. We collect an alternate email address or phone number to boost account security. If your child needs help accessing their account, they will be able to use one of these alternates to validate they own the Microsoft account.
We collect limited information about children, including name, birthdate, email address, and region. When you sign your child up for an Xbox profile, they get a gamertag (a public nickname) and a unique identifier. When you create your child’s Xbox profile you consent to Microsoft collecting, using, and sharing information based on their privacy and communication settings on the Xbox online network. Your child’s privacy and communication settings are defaulted to the most restrictive.
Data we collect
. We collect information about your child’s use of Xbox services, games, apps, and devices including:
When they sign in and sign out of Xbox, purchase history, and content they obtain.
Which games they play and apps they use, their game progress, achievements, play time per game, and other play statistics.
Performance data about Xbox consoles, Xbox Game Pass and other Xbox apps, the Xbox network, connected accessories, and network connection, including any software or hardware errors.
Content they add, upload, or share through the Xbox network, including text, pictures, and video they capture in games and apps.
Social activity, including chat data and interactions with other gamers, and connections they make (friends they add and people who follow them) on the Xbox network.
If your child uses an Xbox console or Xbox app on another device capable of accessing the Xbox network, and that device includes a storage device (hard drive or memory unit), usage data will be stored on the storage device and sent to Microsoft the next time they sign in to Xbox, even if they have been playing offline.
Xbox diagnostic data
. If your child uses Xbox console, Xbox will send required data to Microsoft. Required data is the minimum data necessary to help keep Xbox safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Game captures
. Any player in a multiplayer game session can record video (game clips) and capture screenshots of their view of the game play. Other players’ game clips and screenshots can capture your child’s in-game character and gamertag during that session. If a player captures game clips and screenshots on a PC, the resulting game clips might also capture audio chat if your child’s privacy and communication settings on the Xbox online network allow it.
Captioning
. During Xbox real-time (“party”) chat, players may activate a voice-to-text feature that lets them view that chat as text. If a player activates this feature, Microsoft uses the resulting text data to provide captioning of chat for players who need it. This data may also be used to provide a safe gaming environment and enforce the
Community Standards for Xbox
.
Data use
. Microsoft uses the data we collect when your child uses Xbox to improve gaming products and experiences— making it safer and more fun over time. Data we collect also enables us to provide your child with curated experiences. This includes connecting them to games, content, services, and recommendations.
Xbox data viewable by others
. When your child is using the Xbox network, their online presence (which can be set to “appear offline” or “blocked”), gamertag, game play statistics, and achievements are visible to other players on the network. Depending on how you set your child’s Xbox safety settings, they might share information when playing or communicating with others on the Xbox network.
Safety
. In order to help make the Xbox network a safe gaming environment and enforce the Community Standards for Xbox, we may collect and review voice, text, images, videos and in-game content (such as game clips your child uploads, conversations they have, and things they post in clubs and games).
Anti-cheat and fraud prevention
. Providing a fair gameplay environment is important to us. We prohibit cheating, hacking, account stealing, and any other unauthorized or fraudulent activity when your child uses an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on their Xbox console, PC, or mobile device. In order to detect and prevent fraud and cheating, we may use anti-cheat and fraud prevention tools, applications, and other technologies. Such technologies may create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) using certain information collected from their Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, and how they use that device. This can include information about the browser, device, activities, game identifiers, and operating system.
Xbox data shared with game and apps publishers
. When your child uses an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on their Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, the publisher of that game or app has access to data about their usage to help the publisher deliver, support, and improve its product. This data may include: your child’s Xbox user identifier, gamertag, limited account info such as country and age range, data about your child’s in-game communications, any Xbox enforcement activity, game-play sessions (for example, moves made in-game or types of vehicles used in-game), your child’s presence on the Xbox network, the time they spend playing the game or app, rankings, statistics, gamer profiles, avatars, or gamerpics, friends lists, activity feeds for official clubs they belong to, official club memberships, and any content they create or submit in the game or app.
Third-party publishers and developers of games and apps have their own distinct and independent relationship with users and their collection and usage of personal data is subject to their specific privacy policies. You should carefully review their policies to determine how they use your child’s data. For example, publishers may choose to disclose or display game data (such as on leaderboards) through their own services. You may find their policies linked from the game or app detail pages in our stores.
Learn more at
Data Sharing with Games and Apps
.
To stop sharing game or app data with a publisher, remove its games or app from all devices where they have been installed. Some publisher access to your child’s data may be revoked at
microsoft.com/consent
.
Managing child settings
. As the organizer of a Microsoft family group, you can manage a child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page, as well as their Xbox profile privacy settings from their
Xbox Privacy & online safety page
.
You can also use the
Xbox Family Settings
app to manage your child’s experience on the Xbox Network including: spending for Microsoft and Xbox stores, viewing your child’s Xbox activity, and setting age ratings and the amount of screen time. Xbox-specific Family Safety settings will apply on Xbox console or via Xbox on PC or mobile device but may not be applied on other platforms.
Learn more about managing Xbox profiles at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
Learn more about Microsoft family groups at
Simplify your family’s life
.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. This Xbox console collects limited required diagnostic data. This data helps keep your child’s console functioning as expected.
Kinect
. The Kinect sensor is a combination of camera, microphone, and infrared sensor that can enable motions and voice to be used to control game play. For example:
If you choose, the camera can be used to sign in to the Xbox network automatically using facial recognition. This data stays on the console, is not shared with anyone, and can be deleted at any time.
For game play, Kinect will map distances between the joints on your child’s body to create a stick figure representation to enable play.
The Kinect microphone can enable voice chat between players during play. The microphone also enables voice commands for control of the console, game, or app, or to enter search terms.
The Kinect sensor can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
Learn more about Kinect at
Xbox Kinect and Privacy
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Other important privacy information
Below you will find additional privacy information, such as how we secure your data, where we process your data, and how long we retain your data. You can find more information on Microsoft and our commitment to protecting your privacy at
Microsoft Privacy
.
Below you will find additional privacy information, such as how we secure your data, where we process your data, and how long we retain your data. You can find more information on Microsoft and our commitment to protecting your privacy at
Microsoft Privacy
.
Security of personal data
Microsoft is committed to protecting the security of your personal data. We use a variety of security technologies and procedures to help protect your personal data from unauthorized access, use, or disclosure. For example, we store the personal data you provide on computer systems that have limited access and are in controlled facilities. When we transmit highly confidential data (such as a credit card number or password) over the internet, we protect it through the use of encryption. Microsoft complies with applicable data protection laws, including applicable security breach notification laws.
Back to top
Where we store and process personal data
Personal data collected by Microsoft may be stored and processed in your region, in the United States, and in any other jurisdiction where Microsoft or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers operate facilities. Microsoft maintains major data centers in Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, Finland, France, Germany, Hong Kong, India, Ireland, Japan, Korea, Luxembourg, Malaysia, the Netherlands, Singapore, South Africa, the United Kingdom, and the United States. Typically, the primary storage location is in the customer’s region or in the United States, often with a backup to a data center in another region. The storage location(s) are chosen in order to operate and provide our services efficiently, improve performance, and create redundancies in order to protect the data in the event of an outage or other problem. We take steps to process the data that we collect under this privacy statement according to this statement’s provisions and the requirements of applicable law.
We transfer personal data from the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to other countries, some of which have not yet been determined by the European Commission to have an adequate level of data protection. For example, their laws may not guarantee you the same rights, or there may not be a privacy supervisory authority there that is capable of addressing your complaints. When we engage in such transfers, we use a variety of legal mechanisms, including contracts such as the standard contractual clauses published by the European Commission under Commission Implementing Decision 2021/914, to help protect your rights and enable these protections to travel with your data. To learn more about the European Commission’s decisions on the adequacy of the protection of personal data in the countries where Microsoft processes personal data, see this article on
the European Commission website
.
Microsoft Corporation complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Microsoft Corporation has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Microsoft Corporation has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In the context of an onward transfer, Microsoft Corporation has responsibility for the processing of personal data it receives under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf. Microsoft Corporation remains liable under the DPF if our agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF, unless Microsoft Corporation can prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy statement and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please
visit the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website
. The controlled U.S. subsidiaries of Microsoft Corporation, as identified in our self-certification submission, also adhere to the DPF Principles—for more info, see the list of
Microsoft U.S. Entities Covered by Data Privacy Framework Certification
.
If you have a question or complaint related to participation by Microsoft in the DPF Frameworks, we encourage you to contact us via our
web form
. For any complaints related to the DPF Frameworks that Microsoft cannot resolve directly, we have chosen to cooperate with the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, or a panel established by the European data protection authorities, for resolving disputes with EU individuals, the UK Information Commissioner (for UK individuals), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals. Please contact us if you’d like us to direct you to your data protection authority contacts. As further explained in the DPF Principles, binding arbitration is available to address residual complaints not resolved by other means. Microsoft is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Individuals whose personal data is protected by Japan's Act on the Protection of Personal Information should refer to the article on the
Japanese Personal Information Protection Commission’s website
(only published in Japanese) for more information on the commission’s review of certain countries’ personal data protection systems. For individuals in Japan, please click
here
for additional information on the processing of information under the Telecommunications Business Act (in Japanese only).
Back to top
Our retention of personal data
Microsoft retains personal data for as long as necessary to provide the products and fulfill the transactions you have requested, or for other legitimate purposes such as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. Because these needs can vary for different data types, the context of our interactions with you or your use of products, actual retention periods can vary significantly.
Other criteria used to determine the retention periods include:
Do customers provide, create, or maintain the data with the expectation we will retain it until they affirmatively remove it?
Examples include a document you store in OneDrive, or an email message you keep in your Outlook.com inbox. In such cases, we would aim to maintain the data until you actively delete it, such as by moving an email from your Outlook.com inbox to the Deleted Items folder, and then emptying that folder (when your Deleted Items folder is emptied, those emptied items remain in our system for up to 30 days before final deletion). (Note that there may be other reasons why the data has to be deleted sooner, for example if you exceed limits on how much data can be stored in your account.)
Is there an automated control, such as in the Microsoft privacy dashboard, that enables the customer to access and delete the personal data at any time?
If there is not, a shortened data retention time will generally be adopted.
Is the personal data of a sensitive type?
If so, a shortened retention time would generally be adopted.
Has Microsoft adopted and announced a specific retention period for a certain data type?
For example, for Bing search queries, we de-identify stored queries by removing the entirety of the IP address after 6 months, and cookie IDs and other cross-session identifiers that are used to identify a particular account or device after 18 months.
Has the user provided consent for a longer retention period?
If so, we will retain data in accordance with your consent.
Is Microsoft subject to a legal, contractual, or similar obligation to retain or delete the data?
Examples can include mandatory data retention laws in the applicable jurisdiction, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data retained for the purposes of litigation. Conversely, if we are required by law to remove unlawful content, we will do so.
Back to top
U.S. State Data Privacy
If you are a U.S. resident, we process your personal data in accordance with applicable U.S. state data privacy laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA). This section of our privacy statement contains information required by the CCPA and other U.S. state data privacy laws and supplements our privacy statement.
Please note that rules implementing some of these laws have not yet been finalized. We will update our processes, disclosures, and this notice as these implementing rules are finalized, and as otherwise necessary.
Please also see our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
and our
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for additional information about the data we collect, process, share and disclose, and your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws.
Sale
. We do not sell your personal data. So, we do not offer an opt-out to the sale of personal data.
Profiling
.  We do not engage in “profiling” that utilizes your personal data for automated decision-making that produces legal or similarly significant effects.  So, we do not offer an opt-out for this type of profiling.
Share
. We may “share” your personal data, as defined under California and other applicable U.S. state laws, for personalized advertising purposes. As noted in our
Advertising
section, we do not deliver personalized advertising to children whose birthdate in their Microsoft account identifies them as under 18 years of age.
In the bulleted list below, we outline the categories of data we share for personalized advertising purposes, the recipients of the personal data, and our purposes of processing. For a description of the data included in each category, please see the
Personal data we collect
section.
Categories of Personal Data
Name and contact data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalized advertising based on your interests
Demographic data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalized advertising based on your interests
Subscription and licensing data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalized advertising based on your interests
Interactions
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalized advertising based on your interests
Please see the
Advertising
section for more information about our advertising practices, and our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for more information on “sharing” for personalized advertising purposes under applicable U.S. state laws.
Rights.
You have the right to (i) know what personal data we collect, use, disclose, “share”, and sell, (ii) delete your personal data, (iii) correct your personal data, (iv) restrict the use and disclosure of your sensitive data, (v) receive a copy of your personal data, and (vi) opt-out of “sharing” your personal data with third parties for personalized advertising purposes on third party sites. You may make these requests yourself or through an authorized agent. If you use an authorized agent, we provide your agent with
detailed guidance
on how to exercise your privacy rights. Please see our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for additional information on how to exercise these rights.
Universal Opt-Outs.
Microsoft receives and responds to the Global Privacy Control (GPC) browser opt-out signal. Microsoft will turn off sharing your data with third parties for personalized ads if we receive a GPC signal from you when you visit our sites.
You may have additional rights related to your consumer health data as defined by applicable state consumer health privacy laws. Please see our
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for information on the rights available under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act (MHMDA) and other applicable U.S. consumer health privacy laws.
If you have a Microsoft account, you can exercise your rights through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
, which requires you to log in to your Microsoft account. If you have an additional request or questions after using the dashboard, you may contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section, use our
web form
, or call our US toll free number +1 (844) 931 2038. If you do not have an account, you may exercise your rights by contacting us as described above. To further protect your personal data, we may ask for additional information, such as your country of residence, email address, and phone number to validate your identity and request before honoring the request.
You may indicate your choice to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data with third parties for personalized advertising on third party sites by visiting our
sharing opt-out page
. You can also control the personalized advertising you see on Microsoft properties by visiting our
opt-out page
.
We do not use or disclose your sensitive data for purposes other than those listed below, without your consent, or as permitted or required under applicable laws. So, we do not offer an ability to limit the use of sensitive data.
If you have made a request to Microsoft to know, delete, correct, or receive your personal information and believe your request was denied by Microsoft, you can exercise your right to appeal the results of your request by contacting our privacy support team via our web form. If your appeal is unsuccessful and depending upon the state where you live, you may have the right to raise a concern or lodge a complaint with your state attorney general.
You have a right not to receive discriminatory treatment if you exercise your privacy rights. We will not discriminate against you if you exercise your privacy rights.
Personal information processing
. In the bulleted list below, we outline the categories of personal data we collect, the sources of the personal data, our purposes of processing, and the categories of third-party recipients with whom we provide the personal data. For a description of the data included in each category, please see the
Personal data we collect
section. Please see the
Our retention of personal data
section for information on personal data retention criteria.
Categories of Personal Data
Name and contact data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and partners with whom we offer co-branded services
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; respond to customer questions; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and marketing
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Credentials
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organizations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; authentication and account access; and help, secure and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Demographic data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and purchases from data brokers
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide and personalize our products; product development; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and marketing
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Payment data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and financial institutions
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Transact commerce; process transactions; fulfill orders; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and detect and prevent fraud
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Subscription and licensing data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organizations that represent users; third-party storefronts and platforms on which our products are purchased
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide, personalize, and activate our products; customer support; help, secure, and troubleshoot; marketing; and accounting
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Interactions
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users including data Microsoft generates through those interactions
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide and personalize our products; product improvement; product development; marketing; and help, secure and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Content
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organizations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; safety; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Video or recordings
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and publicly available sources
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; marketing; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and safety
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Feedback and ratings
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; customer support; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
While the bulleted list above contains the primary sources and purposes of processing for each category of personal data, we also collect personal data from the sources listed in the
Personal data we collect
section, such as developers who create experiences through or for Microsoft products. Similarly, we process all categories of personal data for the purposes described in the
How we use personal data
section, such as meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce, and doing research.
Subject to your
privacy settings
, your consent, and depending on the products you use and your choices, we may collect, process, or disclose certain personal data that qualifies as “sensitive data” under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws. Sensitive data is a subset of personal data. In the list below, we outline the categories of sensitive data we collect, the sources of the sensitive data, our purposes of processing, and the categories of third party recipients with whom we share the sensitive data. Please see the
Personal data we collect
section for more information about the sensitive data we may collect.
Categories of Sensitive Data
Account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number, and the means to access the account (security or access code, password, credentials, etc.)
Sources of sensitive data: Interactions with users and organizations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide the product and fulfill requested financial transactions
Recipients: Service providers and payment processing providers
Precise geo-location information
Sources of sensitive data: Users’ interactions with the products
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide the service requested; product improvement; some attributes may be disclosed to third parties to provide the service
Recipients: Users and service providers (please see the
Windows Location Services and Recording
section of our privacy statement for more information)
Racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership
Sources of sensitive data: Communications with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Conduct research studies to better understand how our products are used and perceived and for the purposes of improving the product experiences
Recipients: Service providers
Medical or mental health, sex life, or sexual orientation
Sources of sensitive data: Communications with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Conduct research studies to better understand how our products are used and perceived and for the purposes of improving the product experiences and accessibility
Recipients: Service providers
Contents of your mail, email, or text messages (where Microsoft is not the intended recipient of the communication)
Sources of sensitive data: Users’ interactions with the products
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; improve the product experience; safety; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers
Personal data collected from a known child under 13 years of age
Sources of sensitive data: Interactions with users and organizations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; recommendations; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and safety
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities (in accordance with your Microsoft Family Safety
settings
)
While the bulleted list above contains the primary sources and purposes of processing for personal data collected from children under 13, we also collect personal data from the sources listed in the
Collection of Data from Children
section.
We do not use or disclose your sensitive data for purposes other than the following:
Perform the services or provide the goods you reasonably expect
Help ensure the security and integrity of our services, systems, and data, to combat malicious deceptive, fraudulent or illegal acts, and to protect the physical safety of individuals, to the extent the processing is reasonably necessary and proportionate
For short-term transient use (including non-personalized advertising), so long as the personal data is not disclosed to a third party, is not used for profiling, and is not used to alter an individual’s experience outside the current interaction with Microsoft
Perform services on behalf of Microsoft, such as maintaining accounts, providing customer service, processing, or fulfilling orders/transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing, providing analytics, providing storage, and similar services
Undertake activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of, or improve, upgrade, or enhance a service or device owned or controlled by Microsoft
Collect or process sensitive data where the collection or processing is not for inferring characteristics about the individual
Any other activities in accordance with any future regulations that are issued pursuant to U.S. state data privacy laws
De-Identified Data
. In some situations, Microsoft may process de-identified data. Data is in this state when we are not able to link data to an individual to whom such data may relate without taking additional steps. In those instances, and unless allowed under applicable law, we will maintain such information in a de-identified state, and will not try to re-identify the individual to whom the de-identified data relates.
Disclosures of personal data for business or commercial purposes
. As indicated in the
Reasons we share personal data
section, we share personal data with third parties for various business and commercial purposes. The primary business and commercial purposes for which we share personal data are the purposes of processing listed in the table above. However, we share all categories of personal data for the business and commercial purposes in the
Reasons we share personal data
section.
Parties that control collection of personal data
. In certain situations, we may allow a third party to control the collection of your personal data. For example, third party applications or extensions that run on Windows or Edge browser may collect personal data based on their own practices.
Microsoft allows advertising companies to collect information about your interactions with our websites in order to deliver personalized ads on Microsoft’s behalf.  You can view
our third party ad partners
on the
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
, and opt-out of data sharing with third parties at our opt-out
page
.
Back to top
Advertising
Advertising allows us to provide, support, and improve some of our products. Microsoft does not use what you say in email, human-to-human chat, video calls or voice mail, or your documents, photos, or other personal files to target ads to you. We use other data, detailed below, for advertising on our Microsoft properties and on third-party properties. For example:
Microsoft may use data we collect to select and deliver some of the ads you see on Microsoft web properties, such as
Microsoft.com
, Microsoft Start, and Bing. We may also use such data to select and deliver ads on third party digital properties.
When the advertising ID is enabled in Windows as part of your privacy settings, third parties can access and use the advertising ID (much the same way that websites can access and use a unique identifier stored in a cookie) to select and deliver ads in such apps.
We may share data we collect with internal and external partners, such as Xandr, Yahoo, or Facebook (see below), so that the ads you see in our products and their products are more relevant and valuable to you.
Advertisers may choose to place our web beacons on their sites, or use similar technologies, in order to allow Microsoft to collect information on their sites such as activities, purchases, and visits; we use this data on behalf of our advertising customers to provide ads.
The ads that you see may be selected based on data we process about you, such as your interests and favorites, your location, your transactions, how you use our products, your search queries, or the content you view. For example, if you view content on Microsoft Start about automobiles, we may show advertisements about cars; if you search “pizza places in Seattle” on Bing, you may see advertisements in your search results for restaurants in Seattle.
The ads that you see may also be selected based on other information learned about you over time using demographic data, location data, search queries, interests and favorites, usage data from our products and sites, and the information we collect about you from the sites and apps of our advertisers and partners. We refer to these ads as "personalized advertising" in this statement. For example, if you view gaming content on
xbox.com
, you may see ads for games on Microsoft Start. To provide personalized advertising, we combine cookies placed on your device using information that we collect (such as IP address) when your browser interacts with our websites. If you opt out of receiving personalized advertising, data associated with these cookies will not be used.
We may use information about you to serve you with personalized advertising when you use Microsoft services. If you are logged in with your Microsoft account and have consented to allow Microsoft Edge to use your online activity for personalized advertising, you will see ads for products and services based on your online activity while using Microsoft Edge. To configure your privacy settings for Edge, go to Microsoft Edge > Settings > Privacy and Services. To configure your privacy and ad settings for your Microsoft account with respect to your online activity across browsers, including Microsoft Edge, or when visiting third-party websites or apps, go to your dashboard at
privacy.microsoft.com
.
Further details regarding our advertising-related uses of data include:
Advertising industry best practices and commitments
. Microsoft is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI) and adheres to the NAI Code of Conduct. We also adhere to the following self-regulatory programs:
In the US:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
In Europe:
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
In Canada:
Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
/
Choix de Pub: l'Alliance de la publicité numérique du Canada (DAAC)
Health-related ad targeting
. In the United States, we provide personalized advertising based on a limited number of standard, non-sensitive health-related interest categories, including allergies, arthritis, cholesterol, cold and flu, diabetes, gastrointestinal health, headache / migraine, healthy eating, healthy heart, men’s health, oral health, osteoporosis, skin health, sleep, and vision / eye care. We will also personalize ads based on custom, non-sensitive health-related interest categories as requested by advertisers.
Children and advertising
. We do not deliver personalized advertising to children whose birthdate in their Microsoft account identifies them as under 18 years of age.
Data retention
. For personalized advertising, we retain data for no more than 13 months, unless we obtain your consent to retain the data longer.
Sensitive Data
. Microsoft Advertising does not collect, process, or disclose personal data that qualifies as “sensitive data” under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws for the purposes of providing personalized advertising.
Data sharing
. In some cases, we share with advertisers reports about the data we have collected on their sites or ads.
Data collected by other advertising companies
. Advertisers sometimes include their own web beacons (or those of their other advertising partners) within their advertisements that we display, enabling them to set and read their own cookie. Additionally, Microsoft partners with
Xandr
, a Microsoft company, and third-party ad companies to help provide some of our advertising services, and we also allow other third-party ad companies to display advertisements on our sites. These third parties may place cookies on your computer and collect data about your online activities across websites or online services. These companies currently include, but are not limited to:
Facebook
,
Media.ne
t
,
Outb
rain
,
Taboola
and
Yah
oo
. Select any of the preceding links to find more information on each company's practices, including the choices it offers. Many of these companies are also members of the
NAI
or
DAA
, which each provide a simple way to opt out of ad targeting from participating companies.
To opt out of receiving personalized advertising from Microsoft, visit our
opt-out
page. When you opt out, your preference is stored in a cookie that is specific to the web browser you are using. The opt-out cookie has an expiration date of five years. If you delete the cookies on your device, you need to opt out again.
Back to top
Speech recognition technologies
Speech recognition technologies are integrated into many Microsoft products and services. Microsoft provides both device-based speech recognition features and cloud-based (online) speech recognition features. Microsoft’s speech recognition technology transcribes voice data into text. With your permission, Microsoft employees and vendors working on behalf of Microsoft, will be able to review snippets of your voice data or voice clips in order to build and improve our speech recognition technologies. These improvements allow us to build better voice-enabled capabilities that benefit users across all our consumer and enterprise products and services. Prior to employee or vendor review of voice data, we protect users’ privacy by taking steps to de-identify the data, requiring non-disclosure agreements with relevant vendors and their employees, and requiring that employees and vendors meet high privacy standards.
Learn more about Microsoft and your voice data
.
Back to top
Preview or free-of-charge releases
Microsoft offers preview, insider, beta or other free-of-charge products and features ("previews") to enable you to evaluate them while providing Microsoft with data about your use of the product, including feedback and device and usage data. As a result, previews can automatically collect additional data, provide fewer controls, and otherwise employ different privacy and security measures than those typically present in our products. If you participate in previews, we may contact you about your feedback or your interest in continuing to use the product after general release.
Back to top
Changes to this privacy statement
We update this privacy statement when necessary to provide greater transparency or in response to:
Feedback from customer, regulators, industry, or other stakeholders.
Changes in our products.
Changes in our data processing activities or policies.
When we post changes to this statement, we will revise the "last updated" date at the top of the statement and describe the changes on the
Change history
page. If there are material changes to the statement, such as a change to the purposes of processing of personal data that is not consistent with the purpose for which it was originally collected, we will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes before they take effect or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to periodically review this privacy statement to learn how Microsoft is protecting your information.
Back to top
How to contact us
If you have a privacy concern, complaint, or question for the Microsoft Chief Privacy Officer or the Data Protection Officer for your region, please contact us by using our
web form
. We will respond to questions or concerns as required by law and within a period no longer than 30 days. You can also raise a concern or lodge a complaint with a data protection authority or other official with jurisdiction.
When Microsoft is a controller, unless otherwise stated, Microsoft Corporation and, for those in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland, Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited are the data controllers for personal data we collect through the products subject to this statement. Our addresses are:
Microsoft Privacy, Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, Washington 98052, USA. Telephone: +1 (425) 882 8080.
Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, Attn: Data Protection Officer, One Microsoft Place, South County Business Park, Leopardstown, Dublin 18, Ireland. Telephone: +353 1 706 3117.
To find the Microsoft subsidiary in your country or region, see the list of
Microsoft office locations around the world
.
The representative of Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited within the meaning of Art. 14 of the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection is Microsoft Schweiz GmbH, The Circle 02, 8058 Zürich-Flughafen, Switzerland.
If you would like to exercise your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy law, you may contact Microsoft at the U.S. address listed above, use our
web form
, or call our U.S. toll free number +1 (844) 931 2038.
If you are a resident of Canada and its provinces you may contact the Microsoft Data Protection Officer for Canada at Microsoft Canada Head Office, 4400-81 Bay St, Toronto, ON, M5J 0E7, at +1 (416) 349 2506, or by using our
web form
.
Where French law applies, you can also send us specific instructions regarding the use of your personal data after your death, by using our
web form
.
If you have a technical or support question, please visit
Microsoft Support
to learn more about Microsoft Support offerings. If you have a personal Microsoft account password question, please visit
Microsoft account support
.
We offer various means for you to control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and to exercise your data protection rights. You can do so by contacting Microsoft at our
web form
or the information above, or by using the various tools we provide. Please see the
How to access and control your personal data
section for additional details.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
Microsoft leverages the power of artificial intelligence (AI) in many of our products and services, including by incorporating generative AI features such as Microsoft Copilot capabilities. Microsoft’s deployment and use of AI is subject to Microsoft’s
AI Principles
and Microsoft’s
Responsible AI Standard
, and Microsoft’s collection and use of personal data in developing and deploying AI features is consistent with commitments outlined in this privacy statement. Product-specific details provide additional relevant information. You can find out more about how Microsoft uses AI
here
.
Microsoft Copilot capabilities.
Microsoft Copilot
is Microsoft’s everyday AI companion, and is designed to help you achieve more through a single experience that runs across devices, understanding relevant context on the web, on your PC, and across apps to bring you the right skills at the right time. With the help of Copilot, users can start a draft of a new Word document; or generate a PowerPoint presentation when accessing Copilot in M365 apps, quickly find the answers to complex search queries online, find relevant documents or other personal content, or be inspired to create new songs, stories, images, or other content, among other tasks. Copilot is a family of services, and Microsoft’s collection and use of data may differ depending on the service and the intended functionality in a given scenario.
The Copilot
website
and app (available on iOS and Android) is the core of the consumer Copilot experience. Within this core experience, users can search the web, create text, images, songs, or other outputs, or engage with other features, such as plugins. On the website and in the app, users enter “prompts” that provide instructions to Copilot (e.g., “Give me recommendations for a restaurant that accommodates parties of 10 near me”). In order to provide a relevant response, Copilot will use this prompt, along with the user’s location, language, and similar settings, to formulate a helpful response. In some markets, authenticated users can choose to allow Copilot to have access to prior prompt history to better personalize the product. The consumer Copilot product uses the data collected to provide and improve the Copilot services, including to provide relevant advertising. Users who are signed-in to their account can manage their prompt history in product and on the Microsoft Privacy Dashboard, and can adjust their location, language, and other settings in the product.
Copilot also appears as an assistant within other Microsoft consumer products, such as Bing and Microsoft Edge. In those situations, data processing activities generally align with those products’ primary uses. For example, Copilot in Bing’s use and collection of personal data is consistent with Bing’s core web search offering as described in the Search and Browse section of this privacy statement. More information about Copilot in Bing is available at
Copilot in Bing: Our approach to Responsible AI
. In Microsoft Edge, Copilot appears in the sidebar experience and can help the user complete tasks related to the webpages they visit (e.g., “summarize this page”). This data is used consistent with the Microsoft Edge section of this privacy statement.
Copilot Pro
is another consumer Copilot offering, and offers subscribers priority access to the very latest models, improved image creation abilities, and access to Copilot in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, OneNote, Excel, and Outlook. The main Copilot Pro website and app has similar data collection, use, and controls as consumer Copilot, as described above. Similar Copilot functionality is also included in Microsoft 365 Family and Microsoft 365 Personal subscriptions. When Copilot is integrated with Microsoft 365 products, Copilot data collection is consistent with how data collection and use is described in the Productivity and Communications section of this privacy statement.
There are also Copilot offerings designed for enterprise users. When enabled by an eligible enterprise, users logged in with their Entra ID who want to access consumer Copilot services are offered Copilot with Commercial Data Protection, which minimizes data collection and use consistent with the expectations of enterprise users. More information on Copilot with Commercial Data Protection is available
here
.
Microsoft 365 Copilot, available for Microsoft 365 enterprise offerings, provides enterprise-grade data protection along with access to the corporate graph, Copilot within Microsoft 365 and Teams, and additional customization features. Data collection and use in Microsoft 365 Copilot is consistent with the practices described in the Enterprise and Developer Products section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Enterprise and developer products
Enterprise and Developer Products are Microsoft products and related software offered to and designed primarily for use by organizations and developers. They include:
Cloud services, referred to as Online Services in the Product Terms, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365, and Microsoft Intune for which an organization (our customer) contracts with Microsoft for the services (“Enterprise Online Services”).
Other enterprise and developer tools and cloud-based services, such as Azure PlayFab Services (to learn more see
Azure PlayFab Terms of Service
).
Server, developer, and hybrid cloud platform products, such as Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, System Center, Azure Stack and open source software like Bot Framework solutions (“Enterprise and Developer Software”).
Appliances and hardware used for storage infrastructure, such as StorSimple (“Enterprise Appliances”).
Professional services referred to in the Product Terms that are available with Enterprise Online Services, such as onboarding services, data migration services, data science services, or services to supplement existing features in the Enterprise Online Services.
In the event of a conflict between this Microsoft privacy statement and the terms of any agreement(s) between a customer and Microsoft for Enterprise and Developer Products, the terms of those agreement(s) will control.
You can also learn more about our Enterprise and Developer Products’ features and settings, including choices that impact your privacy or your end users’ privacy, in product documentation.
If any of the terms below are not defined in this Privacy Statement or the
Product Terms
, they have the definitions below.
General
. When a customer tries, purchases, uses, or subscribes to Enterprise and Developer Products, or obtains support for or professional services with such products, Microsoft receives data from you and collects and generates data to provide the service (including improving, securing, and updating the service), conduct our business operations, and communicate with the customer. For example:
When a customer engages with a Microsoft sales representative, we collect the customer’s name and contact data, along with information about the customer’s organization, to support that engagement.
When a customer interacts with a Microsoft support professional, we collect device and usage data or error reports to diagnose and resolve problems.
When a customer pays for products, we collect contact and payment data to process the payment.
When Microsoft sends communications to a customer, we use data to personalize the content of the communication.
When a customer engages with Microsoft for professional services, we collect the name and contact data of the customer’s designated point of contact and use information provided by the customer to perform the services that the customer has requested.
The Enterprise and Developer Products enable you to purchase, subscribe to, or use other products and online services from Microsoft or third parties with different privacy practices, and those other products and online services are governed by their respective privacy statements and policies.
Enterprise and Developer Products are Microsoft products and related software offered to and designed primarily for use by organizations and developers. They include:
Cloud services, referred to as Online Services in the Product Terms, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365, and Microsoft Intune for which an organization (our customer) contracts with Microsoft for the services (“Enterprise Online Services”).
Other enterprise and developer tools and cloud-based services, such as Azure PlayFab Services (to learn more see
Azure PlayFab Terms of Service
).
Server, developer, and hybrid cloud platform products, such as Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, System Center, Azure Stack and open source software like Bot Framework solutions (“Enterprise and Developer Software”).
Appliances and hardware used for storage infrastructure, such as StorSimple (“Enterprise Appliances”).
Professional services referred to in the Product Terms that are available with Enterprise Online Services, such as onboarding services, data migration services, data science services, or services to supplement existing features in the Enterprise Online Services.
In the event of a conflict between this Microsoft privacy statement and the terms of any agreement(s) between a customer and Microsoft for Enterprise and Developer Products, the terms of those agreement(s) will control.
You can also learn more about our Enterprise and Developer Products’ features and settings, including choices that impact your privacy or your end users’ privacy, in product documentation.
If any of the terms below are not defined in this Privacy Statement or the
Product Terms
, they have the definitions below.
General
. When a customer tries, purchases, uses, or subscribes to Enterprise and Developer Products, or obtains support for or professional services with such products, Microsoft receives data from you and collects and generates data to provide the service (including improving, securing, and updating the service), conduct our business operations, and communicate with the customer. For example:
When a customer engages with a Microsoft sales representative, we collect the customer’s name and contact data, along with information about the customer’s organization, to support that engagement.
When a customer interacts with a Microsoft support professional, we collect device and usage data or error reports to diagnose and resolve problems.
When a customer pays for products, we collect contact and payment data to process the payment.
When Microsoft sends communications to a customer, we use data to personalize the content of the communication.
When a customer engages with Microsoft for professional services, we collect the name and contact data of the customer’s designated point of contact and use information provided by the customer to perform the services that the customer has requested.
The Enterprise and Developer Products enable you to purchase, subscribe to, or use other products and online services from Microsoft or third parties with different privacy practices, and those other products and online services are governed by their respective privacy statements and policies.
Enterprise online services
To provide the Enterprise Online Services, Microsoft uses data you provide (including Customer Data, Personal Data, Administrator Data, Payment Data, and Support Data) and data Microsoft collects or generates associated with your use of the Enterprise Online Services. We process data as described in the
Product Terms
,
Microsoft Products and Services Data Protection Addendum (Products and Services DPA),
and the
Microsoft Trust Center
.
Personal Data
. Customer is the controller of Personal Data and Microsoft is the processor of such data, except when (a) Customer acts as a processor of Personal Data, in which case Microsoft is a subprocessor or (b) as stated otherwise in the standard
Products and Services DPA
. In addition, as provided in the standard
Products and Services DPA
, Microsoft has taken on the added responsibilities of a data controller under GDPR when processing Personal Data in connection with its business operations incident to providing its services to Microsoft’s commercial customers, such as billing and account management; compensation; internal reporting and business modeling; and financial reporting. We use Personal Data in the least identifiable form that will support processing necessary for these business operations. We rely on statistical data and aggregate pseudonymized Personal Data before using it for our business operations, removing the ability to identify specific individuals.
Administrator Data
. Administrator Data is the information provided to Microsoft during sign-up, purchase, or administration of Enterprise Online Services. We use Administrator Data to provide the Enterprise Online Services, complete transactions, service the account, detect and prevent fraud, and comply with our legal obligations. Administrator Data includes the name, address, phone number, and email address you provide, as well as aggregated usage data related to your account, such as the controls you select. Administrator Data also includes contact information of your colleagues and friends if you agree to provide it to Microsoft for the limited purpose of sending them an invitation to use the Enterprise Online Services; we contact those individuals with communications that include information about you, such as your name and profile photo.
As needed, we use Administrator Data to contact you to provide information about your account, subscriptions, billing, and updates to the Enterprise Online Services, including information about new features, security, or other technical issues. We also contact you regarding third-party inquiries we receive regarding use of the Enterprise Online Services, as described in your agreement. You cannot unsubscribe from these non-promotional communications. We may also contact you regarding information and offers about other products and services, or share your contact information with Microsoft's partners. When such a partner has specific services or solutions to meet your needs, or to optimize your use of the Enterprise Online Services, we may share limited, aggregated information about your organization’s account with the partner. Microsoft will not share your confidential information or contact information with the authorized partner unless we have sufficient rights to do so. You can manage your contact preferences or update your information in your account profile.
Payment Data
. We use payment data to complete transactions, as well as to detect and prevent fraud.
Support Data
. Customers provide or authorize Microsoft to collect data in connection with obtaining technical support for the Enterprise Online Services. We process Support Data to provide technical support and as described in the
Products and Services DPA
.
Local Software and Diagnostic Data
. Some Online Services may require, or may be enhanced by, the installation of local software (e.g., agents, device management applications). The local software may collect Diagnostic Data (as defined in the
Products and Services DPA
) about the use and performance of that software. That data may be transmitted to Microsoft and used for the purposes described in the
Products and Services DPA
.
Bing Search Services Data
. Bing Search Services, as defined in the Product Terms, use data such as search queries as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances collect data to operate effectively and provide you the best experiences. The data we collect depends on the features you use, as well as your configuration and settings, but it is generally limited to device and usage data. Customers have choices about the data they provide. Here are examples of the data we collect:
During installation or when you upgrade an enterprise and developer software, we may collect device and usage data to learn whether you experience any difficulties.
When you use enterprise software or enterprise appliances, we may collect device and usage data to learn about your operating environment to improve security features.
When you experience a crash using enterprise software or enterprise appliances, you may choose to send Microsoft an error report to help us diagnose the problem and deliver customer support.
Microsoft uses the data we collect from enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances to provide and improve our products, to deliver customer support, to activate the product, to communicate with you, and to operate our business.
Microsoft SQL Server is a relational database management platform and includes products that can be installed separately (such as SQL Server Management Studio). For detailed information about what data we collect, how we use it, and how to manage your privacy options, visit the
SQL Server privacy page
. If you work in an organization, your administrator can set certain telemetry settings in SQL Server via Group Policy.
HoloLens
. HoloLens headsets are self-contained Windows computers with Wi-Fi connectivity that enable a mixed reality experience for apps and solutions. Microsoft collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Windows running on HoloLens up to date, secure, and operating properly. Diagnostic data also helps us improve HoloLens and related Microsoft products and services depending on the diagnostic data settings you’ve chosen for your device.
Learn more about Windows diagnostic data
.
HoloLens also processes and collects data related to the HoloLens experience and device, which include cameras, microphones, and infrared sensors that enable motions and voice to navigate.
If you choose, cameras can be used to sign you in automatically using your iris. To do this, HoloLens takes an image of your iris and measures distances between key points to create and store a numeric value that represents only you. This data stays on the HoloLens and is not shared with anyone, and you can choose to delete this data from your HoloLens at any time.
HoloLens also detects hand gestures intended for system interactions (such as menu navigation, pan/zoom, and scroll). This data is processed on your HoloLens device and is not stored.
HoloLens derives tracking points based on your environment which allows it to understand surfaces in space and allows you to place digital assets on them. There are no images associated with this environmental data and it is stored locally on the HoloLens device. You can choose to delete this data from your HoloLens at any time.
The headset's microphones enable voice commands for navigation, controlling apps, or to enter search terms.
Learn more about voice data collection
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Productivity and communications products
Productivity and communications products are applications, software, and services you can use to create, store, and share documents, as well as communicate with others.
Productivity and communications products are applications, software, and services you can use to create, store, and share documents, as well as communicate with others.
Microsoft 365, Office, and other productivity apps
Microsoft 365, previous versions called Office 365, is a collection of subscription productivity services and applications including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and OneNote, among others. Office is the one-time purchase version of these applications available on PC or Mac and includes Access and Publisher. Both Microsoft 365 and Office are comprised of client software applications and connected online services (or web apps in the case of Microsoft 365 for the web) that span many platforms and have numerous interdependent experiences. For more details about Outlook, see the
Outlook
section of this privacy statement.
Various cloud-based Microsoft 365 services enable you to use your file content for designs and recommendations, collaborate with others within your documents, and provide you functionality from other Microsoft products, such as Bing, and third-party connected products. If you work in an organization, your administrator may turn off or disable these connected services. You can access the privacy controls within your Microsoft 365 and Office apps. For more information, see
Account Privacy Settings
.
Office Roaming Service
. The Office Roaming Service helps keep your settings, including your privacy settings, up to date across your devices running Microsoft 365 or Office apps. When you sign in to your apps with either your Microsoft account or an account issued by your organization, the service syncs some of your customized settings to Microsoft servers. For example, the service syncs a list of most recently used documents or the last location viewed within a document. When you sign in to another device with the same account, the Office Roaming Service downloads your settings from Microsoft servers and applies them to the additional device. When you sign out of your apps, the service removes your settings from your device. Any changes you make to your customized settings are sent to Microsoft servers.
Updates from Microsoft
. Microsoft uses services such as Click-to-Run, Microsoft AutoUpdate (for Mac), or Microsoft Update (for some versions of Office) to provide you with security and other important updates.
These services can automatically detect the availability of online updates for Microsoft 365 or Office apps on your device and download and install them automatically.
Diagnostic Data
. Diagnostic data is used to (i) keep your Microsoft 365 or Office apps secure and up to date; (ii) detect, diagnose, and remediate problems; and (iii) make product improvements. This data does not include a user’s name or email address, the content of the user’s files, or information about apps unrelated to Microsoft 365 or Office. Users have a choice between two different levels of diagnostic data collection, Required and Optional.
Required
. The minimum data necessary to help keep apps secure, up to date, and performing as expected on the device it’s installed on.
Optional
. Additional data that helps us make product improvements and provides enhanced information to help us detect, diagnose, and remediate issues.
See
Diagnostic Data
for more information.
Connected Experiences
. Microsoft 365 continues to provide more experiences in client applications that are connected to and backed by cloud-based services. A subset of these connected experiences is also available in Office. If you choose to use connected experiences, required service data will be collected to help keep these connected experiences reliable, up to date, secure, and performing as expected. See below for additional information about required service data.
Working with others on a document stored on OneDrive or translating the contents of a Word document into a different language are examples of connected experiences. There are two types of connected experiences.
Experiences that analyze your content
. Experiences that use your file content to provide you with design recommendations, editing suggestions, data insights, and similar features. For example, PowerPoint Designer or Editor in Word.
Experiences that download online content
. Experiences that allow you to search and download online content including templates, images, 3D models, videos, and reference materials to enhance your documents. For example, templates or PowerPoint QuickStarter.
You can access the privacy controls within your Microsoft 365 and Office client apps. These privacy settings allow you to configure your connected experiences. For example, you can choose to enable connected experiences that download online content, but not connected experiences that analyze content. Turning off connected experiences will also turn off additional experiences, such as document co-authoring and online file storage. But even if you use this privacy setting to turn off connected experiences, certain functionality will remain available, such as syncing your mailbox in Outlook, as well as essential services described below. These controls are not available when using Microsoft 365 for the web, since you will already be cloud-connected. For more information about accessing these controls, see
Account Privacy Settings.
If you choose to disable certain types of connected experiences, either the ribbon or menu command for those connected experiences will be grayed out or you will get an error message when you try to use those connected experiences.
Essential services
. There are a set of services that are essential to how Microsoft 365 and Office functions and cannot be disabled. For example, the licensing service that confirms that you are properly licensed to use Microsoft 365 is essential. Required service data about these services is collected and sent to Microsoft, regardless of any other settings that you have configured. See
Essential Services
for more information.
Required service data for connected experiences
. As you use a connected experience, data is sent to and processed by Microsoft to provide you that connected experience. This data is necessary because this information enables us to deliver these cloud-based connected experiences. We refer to this data as required service data.
Required service data can include information related to the operation of the connected experience that is needed to keep the underlying service secure, up to date, and performing as expected. If you choose to use a connected experience that analyzes your content, for example Translate in Word, the text you typed and selected to translate is also sent and processed to provide you the connected experience. Your text and the translation are not stored by our service. Required service data can also include information needed by a connected experience to perform its task, such as configuration information about the Microsoft 365 or Office app.
See
Required service data
for more information.
Copilot in Microsoft 365 and Copilot Pro
. Available as a separate subscription service in select countries, the Copilot features that appear in Microsoft 365 apps as part of a Microsoft 365 Personal, Microsoft 365 Family, or Copilot Pro subscription provide AI-powered productivity capabilities through real-time conversational experiences by applying large language model (LLM) processing on the content you choose to provide in Microsoft 365 apps including Word, Excel, OneNote, Outlook, and PowerPoint. Copilot in Microsoft 365 and Copilot Pro are not available for use in Office desktop licenses. When used with available Microsoft 365 apps, Copilot will use the content in your files only when you ask it to perform a specific action on that specific content - for example, when you ask Copilot to help you rewrite a paragraph in a Word document or ask Copilot to generate a to-do list from your notes in OneNote. Similar to connected experiences, required service data is collected during your use of Copilot that includes information related to its operation that is needed to keep the underlying service secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
See
Copilot Pro: Microsoft 365 apps and your privacy
and
Frequently asked questions about Copilot in Microsoft 365 Family and Personal subscriptions
for more information.
Other Productivity Apps
. Microsoft provides several productivity apps separate from Microsoft 365 and Office, including Whiteboard (a free form digital canvas using touch, type, and pen), To Do (a cloud-based task management app), and Sticky Notes (a desktop notes app).
The apps use various cloud-based services to provide you with functionality from other Microsoft products, such as providing images from Bing in Whiteboard, recommending suggested tasks to add to My Day in To Do, and taking advantage of Sticky Notes' integration with Outlook.
Using device capabilities
. Some Microsoft 365 applications make use of your device capabilities using certain features. In PowerPoint, the presentation recording feature can access your device microphone and camera to record presentations with audio and video. Your device microphone is also accessed via the Record audio feature and when using Speaker Coach. As you speak, Speaker Coach gives you on-screen guidance about pacing, inclusive language, use of profanity, filler words, and whether you’re reading the slide text. When creating a PowerPoint presentation, you can also use the Screenshot and Screen clipping features to capture screen contents. Some Microsoft 365 applications, PowerPoint, Word, and OneNote, provide Dictate, a connected experience which lets you use speech-to-text to author content using your microphone. In Word and OneNote, the Transcribe connected experience converts speech recorded directly in the app using your microphone or using a speech audio recording to a text transcript with each speaker individually separated. OneNote can insert photos or record video using your camera. All Microsoft 365 apps along with To Do and Whiteboard have sharing functionality that accesses your contacts to allow you to share your documents with others in your contacts list. Applications will not access your device capabilities until you begin using the feature.
You can manage your microphone and camera access settings in the Windows Privacy Settings menu. Go to
Start > Settings > Privacy or Privacy & Security
. To learn more about how to control your privacy settings in apps, see
Windows privacy settings that apps use
.
Back to top
Microsoft Family
This section applies to the Microsoft Family Safety M365 product, which allows a family group to connect through the Microsoft Family Safety app on their Windows, Xbox, or mobile devices. Please carefully review the information at
Microsoft Family Safety
if choosing to create or join a family group.
Microsoft Family Safety can help parents and guardians to create a safer environment for their family group with digital content filtering, screen time limits, spending for Microsoft and Xbox stores, setting age ratings for apps and games, and location sharing. To learn about how Microsoft collects and uses children’s data, see the
Collection of data from children section
of the Privacy Statement. If you are using Microsoft Family Safety in Windows, see the
Windows security and safety features section
of the Privacy Statement for additional information.
To enable Family Safety controls on a child account, the child account must be part of a family group. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who consented to the child account’s creation. For accounts that do not require parental consent to be created, the parent or guardian must add the account to their family group in order to use Family Safety controls.
When you have enabled family activity reporting for a child, Microsoft will collect details about how the child uses their devices, such as search, web, app, and game activity, and provide parents with reports of that child's online activities. Activity reports are routinely deleted from Microsoft servers.
Certain Family Safety features, such as Location Sharing, Drive Safety, Share Drives, Places, and Location Alerts will use your location information when enabled. When you have enabled Location Sharing, for instance, your device will upload location data to the cloud and share it with others in your family group. Microsoft retains only your last known location as part of the Location Sharing feature (each new location replaces the previous one). When you enable Drive Safety, your location will be used to record your drive habits such as whether you are driving within the speed limits, if you’re using your phone while driving, and if you accelerate or brake suddenly. These reports will be uploaded to the cloud, and you can choose to share your drive reports with your family group. You can turn off these location features at any time in the Family Safety settings. You can manage your device’s location data at the Microsoft Privacy Dashboard. Learn more about
Family Safety and your location data
.
Back to top
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Launcher is an Android app that offers a highly customizable app launcher experience on Android devices.
Microsoft Launcher lets you log in with your personal Microsoft account or work account, or use it without any account. However, some functions may be limited if you do not grant certain permissions.
To use Microsoft Launcher, the application must be installed on your Android device, and optional permissions are required to enable the following features:
Microsoft Copilot
. When signed in with your personal Microsoft account, you can seamlessly use Copilot features like chat, web search, voice search, and image search. Certain Copilot features require access to your device capabilities, such as your device camera, microphone, photos, and videos. Please see our Artificial Intelligence and Copilot capabilities section for more information. Learn more about Copilot terms of use
here
.
Glance Feed
. Glance helps you organize daily activities, such as Outlook calendar, To Do list, Sticky Notes, and recent documents in your M365 apps. After signing-in with your personal Microsoft account or your work account, the data will be synced across devices signed into the same account to give you personalized experiences. It also enables you to review recent activities, like recent photos and app usage, which require permissions to access device photos, files, and app usage data.
News Feed
. When you sign in with your Microsoft account, you can enjoy a personalized news feed and advertisements in Launcher’s News Feed, synchronized across all your devices. You can also receive local curated news when you grant Microsoft Launcher permission to access your location information. You can manage your ad preferences through the Microsoft privacy dashboard to tailor your experience.
Weather Notifications
. Microsoft Launcher allows you to receive the latest and most important weather changes on your home screen with MSN Weather. You can receive up-to-date local weather information when you allow Launcher to access your location or provide your zip code.
Backup and Restore
: Easily transfer between phones or try different home screen setups with Microsoft Launcher's backup and restore feature. Backups can be stored locally on your device or saved to your OneDrive account associated with your Microsoft Account for easy access.
Microsoft Launcher supports Android work profile features, enabling you to maintain a clear boundary between personal and work data on your device. This means you can securely access work resources without mixing them with your personal apps and data.
To learn more about Microsoft Launcher and its supported features, please visit
here
.
Back to top
Microsoft Teams
This section applies to the consumer offering of Teams; if you are using Teams with a school or work account, see the
Enterprise and developer products
of this privacy statement.
Teams is an all-in-one collaboration and communication hub. Teams lets you stay organised and connected across your entire life. Teams allows you to call people with voice or video calling. Teams allows you to easily find people, files, photos, conversations, tasks, and calendars in one convenient and secure place. Teams allows you to store confidential information like passwords, rewards numbers, or login information and share it with others within Teams. With your consent, you can share your location with friends and family.
As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects data about the usage of the features as well as information about your communications, including the time and date of the communication and users that are part of the communication. Microsoft may share this information with Enterprise customers when you interact through meetings and chats with end users who are using their school or work account. For instance, if you engage in a Teams chat with a user who is using Teams associated with their school account, Microsoft may share your information with that user's school as part of providing the Teams service.
Compatibility with Skype
. As a Teams user, you can also log into Skype using your Teams account. If you log into Skype via your Teams credentials, you can use Skype to chat with and call other Skype and Teams users, and you can access your Teams chat history through Skype. Skype users will be able to contact you on Teams and see your Teams presence status. For more information about Skype, see the
Skype section
of this privacy statement.
Finding Teams and Skype Contacts
. Your Teams profile includes information you provided when you set up a Microsoft account. To enable other people to find you on Teams (or products that interact with Teams for personal use, including Teams for enterprise and Skype), your Teams profile is included in the Teams and Skype public search directories, and may be displayed on Skype and Teams. Depending on your settings, Skype and Teams users can find you by your name, email, and/or phone number. Your profile includes your username, avatar, and any other data you choose to add to your profile or display to others. Your Teams profile may be visible to Enterprise customers and their end users when you engage with an end user of an organization in chats and meetings.
Teams contacts
. With your permission, Teams will sync your device, Outlook, and Skype contacts periodically and check for other Teams users that match contacts in your device, Outlook, or Skype address books. You are always in control of your contacts and can stop syncing at any time. If you choose to stop syncing your device, Outlook, or Skype contacts, or you are inactive on your device, any contacts that have not been matched during the synchronization process will be deleted from Teams. If you wish to invite any of your device, Outlook, or Skype contacts to join a conversation, you can invite users to a 1:1 directly, or Microsoft can send an invitation on your behalf via SMS or email for invitations to group conversations. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Notice to non-user contacts.
If your information appears in the device, Outlook, or Skype address books of a Teams user who chooses to sync their device, Outlook, or Skype contacts with their Teams contacts, Microsoft may process your data in order to determine whether you are a current Teams user and to allow Teams users to invite you to the service, including via SMS and email. As long as the Teams user continues to be active on Teams on their device and continues to enable contact syncing with the applicable device or service, your information will be stored on our servers, and we will periodically process your information as a part of the Teams user’s contact syncing experience to check whether you have subsequently joined Teams.
Learn more about how we process your information in connection with the contact syncing feature offered to Teams users
.
If you do choose to join Teams, you will appear as a suggested new Teams contact for any Teams or Skype users with your information in their device, Outlook, or Skype address books. As a Teams user, you will be able to block other Teams and Skype users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Third-party contacts.
You can also choose to sync contacts from third-party providers. If you choose to unsync your third-party contacts on Teams, all third-party contacts are deleted from Teams. If you gave your consent to use those third-party contacts on other Microsoft apps and services, these contacts will still be available to those other Microsoft apps and services.
You can remove third-party contacts from all Microsoft apps and services by removing third-party accounts from Teams. Please note that removing a third-party account from Teams may impact your experiences on other Microsoft apps and services that also use that third-party account.
Teams calendar.
You can also choose to sync your Teams calendar with calendars from third-party providers. You can stop syncing your Teams calendar anytime by removing a third-party account from Teams. If you have consented to use third-party data on other Microsoft apps and services, please note that removing this third-party account data in Teams may impact your experiences on other Microsoft apps and services.
Location sharing
. You can share your static or live location with individuals or groups within Teams. You are in control and can stop sharing at any time. Sharing location for children is permitted with parental consent and in groups where an adult from the Microsoft family group is present.
Push notifications
. To let you know of incoming calls, chats, and other messages, Teams uses the notification service on your device. For many devices, these services are provided by another company. To tell you who is calling, for example, or to give you the first few words of the new chat, Teams has to tell the notification service so that they can provide the notification to you. The company providing the notification service on your device will use this information in accordance with their own terms and privacy policy. Microsoft is not responsible for the data collected by the company providing the notification service.
If you do not want to use the notification services for incoming Teams calls and messages, turn it off in the settings found on your device.
Chats and meetings with Enterprise customer end users
. Many Microsoft products are intended for use by organizations, such as schools and businesses, as well as individual users. Please see the
Enterprise and developer products section
of this privacy statement if you are using Teams with a work or school account. If you engage in Teams meetings or chats with end users of organizations, the data you share with the end users is subject to their organization’s policies, if any. You should direct your privacy inquiries related to your data shared through chats and meetings with an organization’s end users, including any requests to exercise your data protection rights, to the organization’s administrator. Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of our customers, which may differ from those set forth in this privacy statement.
Back to top
OneDrive
OneDrive lets you store and access your files on virtually any device. You can also share and collaborate on your files with others. Some versions of the OneDrive application enable you to access both your personal OneDrive by signing in with your personal Microsoft account and your OneDrive for Business by signing in with your work or school Microsoft account as part of your organization's use of Microsoft 365 or Office 365.
When you use OneDrive, we collect data about your usage of the service, as well as the content you store, to provide, improve, and protect the services. Examples include indexing the contents of your OneDrive documents so that you can search for them later and using location information to enable you to search for photos based on where the photo was taken. We also collect device information so we can deliver personalized experiences, such as enabling you to sync content across devices and roam customized settings.
When you store content in OneDrive, that content will inherit the sharing permissions of the folder in which you store it. For example, if you decide to store content in the public folder, the content will be public and available to anyone on the internet who can find the folder. If you store content in a private folder, the content will be private.
When you share content to a social network like Facebook from a device that you have synced with your OneDrive account, your content is either uploaded to that social network, or a link to that content is posted to that social network. Doing this makes the content accessible to anyone on that social network. To delete the content, you need to delete it from the social network (if it was uploaded there, rather than a link to it) and from OneDrive.
When you share your OneDrive content with your friends via a link, an email with the link is sent to those friends. The link contains an authorization code that allows anyone with the link to access your content. If one of your friends sends the link to other people, they will also be able to access your content, even if you did not choose to share the content with them. To revoke permissions for your content on OneDrive, sign in to your account and then select the specific content to manage the permission levels. Revoking permissions for a link effectively deactivates the link. No one will be able to use the link to access the content unless you decide to share the link again.
Files managed with OneDrive for Business are stored separately from files stored with your personal OneDrive. OneDrive for Business collects and transmits personal data for authentication, such as your email address and password, which will be transmitted to Microsoft and/or to the provider of your Microsoft 365 or Office 365 service.
Back to top
Outlook
Outlook products are designed to improve your productivity through improved communications and include Outlook.com, Outlook applications, and related services.
Outlook.com
. Outlook.com is the primary consumer email service from Microsoft and includes email accounts with addresses that end in outlook.com, live.com, hotmail.com, and msn.com. Outlook.com provides features that let you connect with your friends on social networks. You will need to create a Microsoft account to use Outlook.com.
When you delete an email or item from a mailbox in Outlook.com, the item generally goes into your Deleted Items folder where it remains for approximately 7 days unless you move it back to your inbox, you empty the folder, or the service empties the folder automatically, whichever comes first. When the Deleted Items folder is emptied, those emptied items remain in our system for up to 30 days before final deletion, unless we are legally required to retain the data for longer.
Outlook applications
. Outlook client applications are software you install on your device that permits you to manage email, calendar items, files, contacts, and other data from email, file storage, and other services, like Exchange Online or Outlook.com, or servers, like Microsoft Exchange. You can use multiple accounts from different providers, including third-party providers, with Outlook applications,
including the new Outlook for Windows app
.
To add an account, you must provide permission for Outlook to access data from the email or file storage services.
When you add an account to Outlook, your mail, calendar items, files, contacts, settings and other data from that account will automatically sync to your device. If you are using the mobile Outlook application, that data will also sync to Microsoft servers to enable additional features such as faster search, personalized filtering of less important mail, and an ability to add email attachments from linked file storage providers without leaving the Outlook application. If you are using the desktop Outlook application, you can choose whether to allow the data to sync to our servers. At any time, you can remove an account or make changes to the data that is synced from your account.
If you add an account provided by an organization (such as your employer or school), the owner of the organizational domain can implement policies and controls (for example, requiring multi-factor authentication or the ability to remotely wipe data from your device) that can affect your use of Outlook.
Using device capabilities
. For Outlook clients that support it, the user can dictate the contents of an email and send using the Dictate feature. The Dictate feature may be configured to use the device’s microphone or any other microphone that a user may connect to their device, like a microphone-enabled pair of headphones. Outlook may also use your device location information to provide you with weather information for your current location as well as provide the ability to search for nearby locations.
To learn more about the data the Outlook applications collect and process, please see the
Microsoft 365
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Skype
Skype lets you send and receive voice, video, SMS, and instant message communications. This section applies to the consumer version of Skype; if you are using Skype for Business, see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement.
As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects usage data about your communications that includes the time and date of the communication and the numbers or user names that are part of the communication.
Compatibility with Teams.
As a Skype user, you can also log into Teams using your Skype account. If you log into Teams via your Skype credentials, you can use Teams to chat with and call other Skype and Teams users, and you can access your Skype missed calls and chat history through Teams. Teams users will be able to contact you on Skype and see your Skype presence status. For more information about Teams, see the
Microsoft Teams section
of this privacy statement.
Finding Teams and Skype Contacts.
Your Skype profile includes information you provided when you set up a Microsoft or Skype account. To enable other people to find you on Skype (or products that interact with Skype, such as Skype for Business or Microsoft Teams), your Skype profile is included in Skype and Teams public search directories and may be visible on both Skype and Teams. Depending on your profile settings, Skype and Teams users can find you by your name, email, and/or phone number. Your profile includes your user name, avatar, and any other data you choose to add to your profile or display to others.
Emergency calling in the United States.
If you enable location sharing for emergency calling, your location will be periodically collected to enable Microsoft to share your location with emergency calling service providers if you dial 911. Your location information is only shared if you enable location sharing for emergency calling and you initiate a 911 call.
Skype contacts.
If you use Outlook.com to manage contacts, Skype will automatically add the people you know to your Skype contact list until you tell the application to stop. With your permission, Skype will sync your device contacts periodically and check for other Skype users that match contacts in your device or Outlook address books. You are always in control of your contacts and can stop syncing at any time. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications. If you choose to stop syncing your device contacts, or you are inactive on your device, any contacts that have not been matched during the synchronization process will be deleted from Skype. If you wish to invite any of your device or Outlook contacts to join a conversation, you can invite users to a 1:1 directly, or Microsoft can send an invitation on your behalf via SMS or email for invitations to group conversations. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Notice to non-user contacts.
If your information appears in the device or Outlook address book of a Skype user who chooses to sync their device or Outlook contacts with their Skype contacts, Microsoft may process your data in order to determine whether you are a current Skype user and to allow Skype users to invite you to the service, including via SMS and email. As long as the Skype user continues to be active on Skype on their device and continues to enable contact syncing, your information will be stored on our servers and we will periodically process your information as a part of the Skype user’s contact synching experience to check whether you have subsequently joined Skype.
Learn more about how we process your information in connection with the contact syncing feature offered to Skype users
.
If you do choose to join Skype, you will appear as a suggested new Skype contact for any Skype and Teams users with your information in their device or Outlook address books. As a Skype user, you will be able to block other Skype and Teams users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Partner companies
. To make Skype available to more people, we partner with other companies to allow Skype to be offered via those companies’ services. If you use Skype through a company other than Microsoft, that company’s privacy policy governs how it handles your data. To comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, or to help our partner company or local operator comply or respond, we may access, transfer, disclose, and preserve your data. That data could include, for example, your private content, such as the content of your instant messages, stored video messages, voicemails, or file transfers.
Skype Manager
. Skype Manager lets you manage a group’s (such as your family’s) Skype usage from one central place. When you set up a group, you will be the Skype Manager Administrator and can see the patterns of usage, including detailed information, like traffic data and details of purchases, of other members of the group who have consented to such access. If you add information like your name, other people in the group will be able to see it. Members of the group can withdraw consent for Skype Manager by visiting their
Skype account page
.
Push notifications
. To let you know of incoming calls, chats, and other messages, Skype apps use the notification service on your device. For many devices, these services are provided by another company. To tell you who is calling, for example, or to give you the first few words of the new chat, Skype has to tell the notification service so that they can provide the notification to you. The company providing the notification service on your device will use this information in accordance with their own terms and privacy policy. Microsoft is not responsible for the data collected by the company providing the notification service. If you do not want to use the notification services for incoming Skype calls and messages, turn it off in the settings found in the Skype application or your device.
Translation features
. When you use Skype’s translation features, Skype collects and uses your conversation to provide the translation service. With your permission, your data may be used to help improve Microsoft products and services. To help the translation and speech recognition technology learn and grow, sentences and automatic transcripts are analyzed and any corrections are entered into our system, to build better performing services. This data may include manual transcription of your voice clips. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
Recording features
. Some versions of Skype have a recording feature that allows you to capture and share all or part of your audio / video call. The recording will be stored and shared as part of your conversation history with the person or group with whom the call occurred.
You should understand your legal responsibilities before recording any communication. This may include obtaining the prior consent of everyone participating in the conversation or any other authorizations as required.
Microsoft is not responsible for how you use your recordings or the recording features.
Skype bots
. Bots are programs offered by Microsoft or third parties that can do many useful things like search for news, play games, and more. Depending on their capabilities, bots may have access to your display name, Skype ID, country, region, language, and any messages, audio, video, or content that you share with the bot. Please review the bot profile and its privacy statement before engaging in a one-to-one or group conversation with a bot. You can delete a bot that you no longer wish to engage with. Prior to adding a bot to a group, please ensure that your group participants have consented to their information being shared with the bot.
Captioning
. Certain Skype features include accessibility functionality such as captioning. During Skype calls, a call participant can activate a voice-to-text feature, which allows the user to view the audio chat as text. If a user activates this feature, other call participants will not receive a notification. Microsoft uses this voice and text data to provide captioning of audio for users.
Camera Features
. When you use the camera feature in Skype, you can choose to enhance your video and images with third party lens services. Lens is a feature that uses Augmented Reality (AR) to transform your selfies in a fun way, such as making you look like your favorite animal. Using the camera in Skype, you can select the lens feature that is incorporated in the Skype to transform your face and hands. Depending on which lens you choose, your video and images may be processed to extract information about the location of different areas on your face and hands. The extracted data is used for the sole purpose of applying AR effects to your face and hands. None of this data is used to personally identify you. This data is processed for the duration of the session on your device only, and then deleted immediately. This data is not sent to Skype or any third party.
Back to top
Surface
Microsoft offers its family of Surface devices and accessories to provide a great computing experience, including surfing the web, watching and streaming videos, playing games, running apps like Excel, Word, and OneNote, and more. These include devices and accessories like Surface Laptops, Surface Studios, Surface Book, Surface Pro, Surface Headphones, Surface Earbuds, Surface Dock, Surface Keyboard, and more. As part of that experience, Microsoft collects certain diagnostic data, as described below.
Diagnostic data
. Microsoft collects diagnostic data as you use your Surface devices, Surface accessories, and Surface applications. Diagnostic data can include information about crashes, performance, and usage of Surface products. The data that is sent to Microsoft is used to help keep Surface secure, up to date, and performing as expected and can help us make other improvements to Surface.
There are two levels of diagnostic and activity data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data.
Required diagnostic data
is the minimum amount of data that we need to help keep Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application secure, up-to-date, and performing as expected.
Optional diagnostic data
is additional diagnostic and usage data about your Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application. If you choose to send optional diagnostic data to Microsoft, required diagnostic data is also included.
Required diagnostic data is always sent to Microsoft for all Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application. But you can choose whether to allow Surface to collect optional diagnostic data and send it to Microsoft. You can make that choice when you first set up your Surface device or change the setting at any time in the Surface app.
For more information, see
Diagnostic data for Surface products
and
Diagnostic data in the Surface app
. For a list of Surface required diagnostic data collected, see
Required diagnostic data for Surface products
.
Back to top
Surface Duo
The Surface Duo is a device featuring two screens that fits in your pocket for productivity on the go. Powered by the Google Android operating system, Surface Duo supports cellular and Wi-Fi connectivity and can be used for email, internet browsing, games, and business connectivity.
Microsoft provides a core Surface Duo experience that runs on the Android operating system. The core Surface Duo experience includes apps such as the Microsoft Launcher, Setup Wizard, and Your Phone Companion. You can sign in with a Google ID and enable various Google services; you can then also sign in with your Microsoft account (MSA) and enable Microsoft’s services. Microsoft apps and services may rely on information provided by Google. Some features, such as location, require that you enable this functionality for Google and separately allow Microsoft to leverage this information.
Diagnostic data
. Surface Duo collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep the core Surface Duo experience up to date, secure, and operating properly. This data also helps us improve Surface Duo and related Microsoft products and services. The data does not include your user name, email address, or the content of your files. There are two levels of diagnostic data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data.
Required
. The minimum data necessary to help keep the core Surface Duo experience secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Optional
. Additional data that helps us make product improvements and provides enhanced information to help Microsoft detect, diagnose, and remediate issues.
Learn more in Surface Duo Privacy Settings
.
Surface Duo location settings
. Surface Duo relies on Google location services to determine the device’s precise geographic location to display the local weather. The location of your Surface Duo can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy and may in some cases be determined precisely. If you want Microsoft apps to be able to reference or display weather or other location related information, you need to enable Google location services and Microsoft location access. Some apps may require these settings be enabled independently for the app and can be set or changed in the Surface Duo’s Settings. The
Google Privacy Policy
provides details about Google’s location service and related data privacy practices. See
Surface Duo Location Settings
for more information.
Microsoft apps included with the Surface Duo
. The diagnostic data options for the core Surface Duo experience are configured when you initially set up your Surface Duo and can be changed in the Surface Duo’s Settings under the Diagnostic Data section.
The other Microsoft apps on your Surface Duo may prompt you to enable functionality to enable the full experience of the app or you may be asked to allow optional diagnostic data collection. You can change the settings for these apps in the Surface Duo Settings under the app name. More information about these apps is available in the
Productivity and communications products
and
Search and Browse
sections of this Privacy Statement.
Back to top
LinkedIn
To learn about the data LinkedIn collects and how it is used and shared, please see LinkedIn’s
Privacy Policy
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Search and browse
Search and browse products connect you with information and intelligently sense, process, and act on information—learning and adapting over time. For more information on artificial intelligence and Copilot capabilities in Microsoft’s search products, please see
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
section above.
Search and browse products connect you with information and intelligently sense, process, and act on information—learning and adapting over time. For more information on artificial intelligence and Copilot capabilities in Microsoft’s search products, please see
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
section above.
Bing
Bing services include search and mapping services, as well as other apps and programs described in this section. Bing services collect and process data in many forms, including text that has been inked or typed, voice data, and images. Bing services are also included within other Microsoft services, such as Microsoft 365, and certain features in Windows (which we refer to as Bing-powered experiences).
When you conduct a search, or use a feature of a Bing-powered experience that involves conducting a search or entering a command on your behalf, Microsoft will collect the searches or commands you provide (which may be in the form of text, voice data, or an image), along with your IP address, location, the unique identifiers contained in our cookies or similar technologies, the time and date of your search, and your browser configuration. For example, if you use Bing voice-enabled services, your voice input and performance data associated with the speech functionality will be sent to Microsoft. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
. And, if you use Bing image-enabled services, the image you provide will be sent to Microsoft. When you use Bing-powered experiences, such as Bing Lookup to search a particular word or phrase within a webpage or document, that word or phrase is sent to Bing along with some surrounding content in order to provide contextually relevant search results.
AI-enhanced Bing search
. Bing search now includes an AI-enhanced web search functionality, using Microsoft Copilot in Bing, which supports users by providing relevant search results, reviewing and summarizing from across the web, refining research queries through the chat experience, and sparking creativity by helping users create content. Copilot in Bing’s use and collection of personal data is consistent with Bing’s core web search offering as described in this section. More information about Copilot in Bing is available at
Copilot in Bing: Our approach to Responsible AI
.
Search suggestions
. For the search suggestions feature, the characters that you type into a Bing-powered experience (such as search and site suggestions in the Microsoft Edge browser) to conduct a search and what you click on will be sent to Microsoft. This allows us to provide you with relevant suggestions as you type your searches. To turn this feature on or off, while using Bing Search, go to
Bing Settings
. There are other methods to control this feature in other Bing-powered experiences, such as the Microsoft Edge browser. Search Suggestions cannot be turned off in the search box in Windows 10 and Windows 11. If you choose, you can always hide the search box or icon on the taskbar.
Bing experience improvement program for Bing Desktop and Bing Toolbar
. If you are using Bing Desktop or Bing Toolbar and choose to participate in the Bing Experience Improvement Program, we also collect additional data about how you use these specific Bing apps, such as the addresses of the websites you visit, to help improve search ranking and relevance. To help protect your privacy, we do not use the data collected through the Bing Experience Improvement Program to identify or contact you or target advertising to you. You can turn off the Bing Experience Improvement Program at any time in the Bing Desktop or Bing Toolbar settings. Finally, we delete the information collected through the Bing Experience Improvement Program after 18 months.
Retention and de-identification
. We de-identify stored search queries by removing the entirety of the IP address after 6 months, and cookie IDs and other cross-session identifiers that are used to identify a particular account or device after 18 months.
Personalization through Microsoft account
. Some Bing services provide you with an enhanced experience when you sign in with your personal Microsoft account, for example, syncing your search history across devices. You can use these personalization features to customize your interests, favorites, and settings, and to connect your account with third-party services. Visit
Bing Settings
to manage your personalization settings, or the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
to manage your data.
Managing search history
. When you’re signed-in to a personal Microsoft account, you can erase your search and chat history on the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. The Search History service from Bing, located in Bing Settings, provides another method of revisiting the search terms you've entered and results you've clicked when using Bing search through your browser. You may clear your search history on a device through this service. The conversations you have with Microsoft Copilot in Bing are also remembered as “Recent activity”. The history of previous Recent activities is saved, with the names of chats based by default on the first query of the chat. Your Recent activity is displayed on the right-hand side of the chat window when you are using the service. Clearing your history prevents that history from being displayed in your Search History or chat history, but does not delete information from our search logs, which are retained and de-identified as described above or as you have instructed through the privacy dashboard. If you are signed-in to a work or school Microsoft account using Microsoft Search in Bing, you can export your Microsoft Search in Bing search history, but you cannot delete it. Your Microsoft Search in Bing service administrator can see aggregated search history across all enterprise users but cannot see specific searches by user.
Third-party services that use Bing
. You may access Bing-powered experiences when using third-party services, such as those from Yahoo!. In order to provide these services, Bing receives data from these and other partners, including your search query and related data (such as date, time, IP address, and a unique identifier). This data will be sent to Microsoft to provide the search service. Microsoft will use this data as described in this statement or as further limited by our contractual obligations with our partners. You should refer to the privacy policies of the third-party services for any questions about how they collect and use data.
Data passed to destination website
. When you select a search result or advertisement from a Bing search results page and go to the destination website, the destination website will receive the standard data your browser sends to every web site you visit—such as your IP address, browser type and language, and the host name of the site you came from (in this case,
https://www.bing.com/
).
Sharing data from Bing and Bing-powered experiences with third parties
. We share some de-identified data (data where the identity of a specific person is not known) from Bing and Bing-powered experiences with selected third parties. Before we do so, we run the data through a process designed to remove certain sensitive data that users may have included in the search terms themselves (such as social security numbers or credit card numbers). Additionally, we require these third parties to keep the data secure and to not use the data for purposes other than for which it is provided.
Back to top
Microsoft Edge
Whenever you use a web browser to access the internet, data about your device ("standard device data") is sent to the websites you visit and online services you use. Standard device data includes your device's IP address, browser type and language, access times, and referring website addresses. This data might be logged on those websites' or online services’ web servers. Which data is logged and how that data is used depends on the privacy practices of the websites you visit and web services you use. Certain features in Microsoft Edge, such as when you open a new tab in the browser, connect you to Microsoft Start Content and your experiences with such content is covered by the Microsoft Start section of this privacy statement. Additionally, Microsoft Edge sends a unique browser ID to certain websites to enable us to develop aggregate data used to improve browser features and services.
Microsoft Edge for Windows, Linux, and macOS
. Microsoft Edge is the default web browser for Windows 10 and later and is also available on other supported versions of Windows and macOS.
Data about how you use your browser, such as your browsing history, web form data, temporary internet files, and cookies, is stored on your device. You can delete this data from your device using Clear Browsing History.
Microsoft Edge allows you to capture and save content on your device, such as:
Settings and More
. Allows you to manage your favorites, downloads, history, extensions, and collections.
Collections
. Allows you to collect text, images, videos, and other content in a note page in your browser. When you drag content into your collection, it is cached on your device and can be deleted through your collection.
Website Pin to Taskbar
. Allows you to pin your favorite websites to the Windows taskbar. Websites will be able to see which of their webpages you have pinned, so they can provide you a notification badge letting you know there is something new for you to check out on their websites.
Microsoft collects data necessary to provide features you request in Microsoft Edge. When signed into Microsoft Edge using your Microsoft personal account or work or school account, Microsoft Edge will sync your browser data saved on your device across other signed-in devices. You may choose which browser data to sync, including your favorites, browsing history, extensions and associated data, settings, open tabs, autofill form entries (such as your name, address, and phone number), passwords, payment information, and other data types as they become available. If you choose to sync extensions that you acquired from third-party web stores, a copy of those extensions will be downloaded directly from those web stores on your synced device(s). If you have turned on Password Monitor, your saved credentials are hashed, encrypted and sent to Microsoft’s Password Monitor service to warn you if your credentials were detected as part of a malicious attack or a breach. Microsoft does not retain this data after the check is complete. You can disable or configure syncing in the Microsoft Edge settings.
When you sign into Microsoft Edge with your Microsoft personal account or work or school account, Microsoft Edge will store your account’s privacy preferences. Microsoft Edge will use the stored preferences to migrate your account’s privacy choices across your signed-in devices, including during Windows device set up or when you sign into Microsoft Edge with your account on a new device.
Microsoft Edge’s
Search and site suggestions
uses your search queries and browsing history to provide you with faster browsing and more relevant search recommendations. Microsoft Edge sends the information you type into the browser address bar to the default search provider configured in the address bar to offer search recommendations as you type each character. You can turn off these features at any time in the browser settings. In order to provide search results, Microsoft Edge sends your search queries, standard device information, and location (if you have location enabled) to your default search provider. If Bing is your default search provider, we use this data as described in the Bing section of this privacy statement.
Microsoft Edge collects and uses data from your search activity across the web, including websites Microsoft does not own or operate, to improve Microsoft services, such as Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing and Microsoft News. This data may include the search query, the search results that are displayed to you, demographic information that is part of the search results, and the interaction you have with those search results, such as the links you click. Microsoft Edge takes steps to de-identify the data it collects by removing data that identifies the person or device from which it was collected and retains this data for one year from when it is collected. Microsoft does not use this collected data to personalize or provide ads to you. You can turn off the collection of this data at any time in the browser settings.
Microsoft Edge downloads content from Microsoft services to enhance your browsing experiences; for example, when data is downloaded to prerender site content for faster browsing or to provide content required to power features you choose to use, such as providing templates for Collections.
You may also choose to share your Microsoft Edge browsing activity to allow us to personalize Microsoft Edge and Microsoft services like ads, search, shopping, and news. Microsoft Edge browsing activity includes your history, favorites, usage data, web content, and other browsing data. For more information about our
advertising privacy policies
see the Advertising section of the privacy statement. In the Microsoft privacy dashboard you can control the use of your browsing activity for personalized ads in the
See ads that interest you
setting. If you disable this setting in the Microsoft privacy dashboard you will continue to receive personalized web experiences like search and news based on your browsing activity. You may stop sharing your Microsoft Edge browsing activity by disabling
Allow Microsoft to use your browsing activity including history, favorites, usage and other browsing data to personalize Microsoft Edge and Microsoft services like ads, search, shopping and news
within Edge settings. When using Copilot features in the Microsoft Edge sidebar, you can choose to allow Microsoft Copilot in Edge to access the content of the webpage you are viewing in order to provide further insights, such as page summaries. Use of data connected with Copilot experiences is consistent with the Copilot data use described in the Bing section of this privacy statement.
Microsoft Edge collects required diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Microsoft Edge up to date, secure, and operating properly. Required diagnostic data also helps us improve Microsoft Edge and Windows.
Separate from your search activity data mentioned above, you can choose to send optional diagnostic data about how you use Microsoft Edge and information about your browser activity, including browsing history and search terms to Microsoft to help us improve Microsoft Edge and other Microsoft products and services. For Microsoft Edge on Windows 10 and later, this information is provided when you have enabled optional diagnostic data. For details, see the Windows Diagnostics section of the privacy statement. For Microsoft Edge on other operating systems, optional diagnostic information is provided when you enable
Improve Microsoft products by sending data about how you use the browser
or
Make searches and Microsoft products better by sending info about websites you visit in Microsoft Edge
in the browser settings.
The diagnostic data collected by Microsoft Edge is transmitted to Microsoft and is stored with one or more unique identifiers that help us recognize an individual browser installation on a device and understand the browser's service issues and use patterns.
Learn more about Microsoft Edge, browsing data, and privacy
.
Microsoft Edge on iOS and Android
. Microsoft Edge on iOS and Android devices collects data necessary to provide features you request in Microsoft Edge. Microsoft also collects required diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Microsoft Edge up to date, secure, and operating properly. Required diagnostic data also helps us improve Microsoft Edge.
Additionally, you may share optional diagnostic data about how you use Microsoft Edge and information about websites you visit (browsing history) for personalized experiences on your browser, Windows, and other Microsoft products and services. This information also helps us improve Microsoft Edge and other Microsoft products and services. This optional diagnostic data is sent to us when you enable
Share usage data for personalization
or
Share info about websites you visit
in the browser settings.
The diagnostic data collected by Microsoft Edge is transmitted to Microsoft and is stored with one or more unique identifiers that help us recognize an individual user on a device and understand the browser's service issues and use patterns.
Microsoft Edge uses data from your search activity across the web, including search activity on websites Microsoft does not own or operate, to improve Microsoft services like Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing, and Microsoft News. The data Microsoft Edge collects may include personal data; however, Microsoft Edge takes steps to scrub and de-identify the data. Microsoft Edge does not use this data to personalize or provide ads for you. You can turn off the collection of this data at any time in the browser settings.
Learn more about Search results data for product improvement
.
For information about the privacy practices of legacy versions Microsoft Edge (versions 44 and below), see the Web browsers—Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer section of the privacy statement.
Back to top
Microsoft Translator
Microsoft Translator is a machine translation system and service designed to automatically translate text and voice input between numerous supported languages. Microsoft Translator is made available as a stand-alone consumer app for Android, iOS, and Windows and its service capabilities are also integrated in a variety of Microsoft products and services, such as Translator Hub, Translator for Bing, and Translator for Microsoft Edge. Microsoft Translator processes the text, image, and voice data you submit, as well as device and usage data. We use this data to provide Microsoft Translator, personalize your experiences, and improve our products and services. Microsoft has implemented business and technical measures designed to help de-identify the data you submit to Microsoft Translator. For example, when we randomly sample text and audio to improve Microsoft Translator and Microsoft’s speech recognition technologies, we delete identifiers and certain text, such as email addresses and some number sequences, detected in the sample that could contain personal data. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
Separate from Microsoft Translator, Microsoft translation services are available as features in other Microsoft products and services that have different privacy practices than Microsoft Translator. For more information on the Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services Translator Text API, Custom Translator, and Translator Speech API, see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement. For the Translate feature in Microsoft 365 apps and Skype, see the
Productivity and communications products
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
SwiftKey
The Microsoft SwiftKey keyboard and related cloud-based services (collectively, the “SwiftKey Services”) process data about words you use and how you type and use this data to learn your writing style and provide personalized autocorrection and predictive text that adapts to you. We also use this data to offer a range of other features, such as emoji predictions.
SwiftKey prediction technology learns from the way you use language to build a personalized language model. This model is an optimized view of the words and phrases that you use most often in context and reflects your unique writing style. The model itself contains the words you commonly type arranged in a way that enables SwiftKey’s algorithms to make predictions, based on text you have already entered. The model draws from all scenarios in which you use your keyboard, including when you type while using apps or visiting websites. The SwiftKey keyboard and model attempt to avoid collecting sensitive data, by not collecting data from certain fields such as those recognized as containing password or payment data. SwiftKey Services do not log or store, the data contained in your model, unless you choose to share your data with us (as described further below). When you use SwiftKey Services, we also collect device and usage data. When you sign into your SwiftKey account and agree to share the following data, we will use de-identified device data, usage data, and model data to analyze service performance and help improve our products.
The SwiftKey Services also include an optional cloud component called a SwiftKey Account. If you choose to create a SwiftKey Account, your language model will be synchronized with the SwiftKey Account cloud service, so you can benefit from that model on the different devices you use and access additional services such as prediction synchronization and backup. When you create a SwiftKey Account, Microsoft will also collect your email address and basic demographic data. All data collected is transferred to our servers over encrypted channels. If you are signed in to your SwiftKey account, you can control your personal data and SwiftKey account preferences at
data.swiftkey.com
.
As part of your SwiftKey account, you may also opt in to share your language and/or typing data for the purposes of improving Microsoft products and services. If you opt-in, SwiftKey may send short snippets of data about what and how you type and related correction data to our servers for processing. These text snippets are used in various automated processes to validate that our prediction services are working correctly and to make product improvements. To preserve your privacy, SwiftKey Services de-identify these text snippets, and even if you have a SwiftKey Account, these text snippets will not be linked to it.
If you sign into your SwiftKey Account and opt-in to share your language and typing data, Microsoft will process your shared data to look for new patterns of language usage across our user base. This allows us to improve our basic models for individual languages. Language and typing data used in this process is aggregated and any words or combinations of words that might be personal to individuals or small groups of users are filtered out.
You can withdraw your consent to share your language and typing data for product improvement at any time in SwiftKey Settings. You can also withdraw your consent for SwiftKey Services to retain your personal data in SwiftKey Settings. When you withdraw consent for SwiftKey to retain your personal data, all personal data collected through your use of the SwiftKey Services will be deleted.
You may receive occasional notifications on your device alerting you to product updates and features that may be of interest to you. You can disable these notifications at any time in the SwiftKey Settings.
When you use the camera feature in SwiftKey, you can choose to enhance your video and images with third party lens services. Lens is a feature that uses Augmented Reality (AR) to transform your selfies in a fun way, such as making you look like your favorite animal. Using the camera in SwiftKey keyboard, you can select the lens feature that is incorporated in the keyboard to transform your face and hands. Depending on which lens you choose, your video and images may be processed to extract information about the location of different areas on your face and hands. The extracted data is used for the sole purpose of applying AR effects to your face and hands. None of this data is used to personally identify you. This data is processed for the duration of the session on your device only, and then deleted immediately. This data is not sent to SwiftKey or any third party.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Windows
Windows is a personalized computing environment that enables you to seamlessly roam and access services, preferences, and content across your computing devices from phones to tablets to the Surface Hub. Rather than residing as a static software program on your device, key components of Windows are cloud-based, and both cloud and local elements of Windows are updated regularly, providing you with the latest improvements and features. In order to provide this computing experience, we collect data about you, your device, and the way you use Windows. And because Windows is personal to you, we give you choices about the personal data we collect and how we use it. Note that if your Windows device is managed by your organization (such as your employer or school), your organization may use centralized management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data and to control device settings (including privacy settings), device policies, software updates, data collection by us or the organization, or other aspects of your device. Additionally, your organization may use management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data from that device, including your interaction data, diagnostic data, and the contents of your communications and files.
The Windows Settings
, formerly known as PC Settings, is an essential component of Microsoft Windows. It provides a convenient interface for adjusting user preferences, configuring the operating system, and managing connected devices so that you can manage user accounts, adjust network settings, and personalize various aspects of Windows. Windows provides a mechanism for apps to access various device capabilities such as the device’s camera, microphone, location, calendar, contacts, call history, messages and more, while controlling access to your personal data. Each capability has its own privacy settings page in Windows settings, so you can control which apps can use each capability. Here are some key features of Settings:
Customization: You can personalize various aspects of Windows, including the look and feel, language settings, and privacy options. Windows settings uses your microphone when controlling the volume, camera when using integrated camera and location to change brightness at night time to help you customize your Windows.
Peripheral Management: Install and manage peripherals such as printers, monitors, and external drives.
Network Configuration: Adjust networking settings, including Wi-Fi, Ethernet, cellular and VPN connections and will use physical MAC address, IMEI and mobile number if device supports cellular.
Account Management: Add or remove user accounts, change account settings, and manage sign-in options.
System-Level Options: Configure display settings, notifications, power options, manage list of installed apps and more.
Privacy & security management: configure your privacy preferences such as location, collection of diagnostic data etc. Fine-tune which individual apps and services can access device capabilities by turning them on or off.
For more information about data collection in Windows, see
Data collection summary for Windows
. This statement discusses Windows 10 and Windows 11 and references to Windows in this section relate to those product versions. Earlier versions of Windows (including Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) are subject to their own privacy statements.
Windows is a personalized computing environment that enables you to seamlessly roam and access services, preferences, and content across your computing devices from phones to tablets to the Surface Hub. Rather than residing as a static software program on your device, key components of Windows are cloud-based, and both cloud and local elements of Windows are updated regularly, providing you with the latest improvements and features. In order to provide this computing experience, we collect data about you, your device, and the way you use Windows. And because Windows is personal to you, we give you choices about the personal data we collect and how we use it. Note that if your Windows device is managed by your organization (such as your employer or school), your organization may use centralized management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data and to control device settings (including privacy settings), device policies, software updates, data collection by us or the organization, or other aspects of your device. Additionally, your organization may use management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data from that device, including your interaction data, diagnostic data, and the contents of your communications and files.
The Windows Settings
, formerly known as PC Settings, is an essential component of Microsoft Windows. It provides a convenient interface for adjusting user preferences, configuring the operating system, and managing connected devices so that you can manage user accounts, adjust network settings, and personalize various aspects of Windows. Windows provides a mechanism for apps to access various device capabilities such as the device’s camera, microphone, location, calendar, contacts, call history, messages and more, while controlling access to your personal data. Each capability has its own privacy settings page in Windows settings, so you can control which apps can use each capability. Here are some key features of Settings:
Customization: You can personalize various aspects of Windows, including the look and feel, language settings, and privacy options. Windows settings uses your microphone when controlling the volume, camera when using integrated camera and location to change brightness at night time to help you customize your Windows.
Peripheral Management: Install and manage peripherals such as printers, monitors, and external drives.
Network Configuration: Adjust networking settings, including Wi-Fi, Ethernet, cellular and VPN connections and will use physical MAC address, IMEI and mobile number if device supports cellular.
Account Management: Add or remove user accounts, change account settings, and manage sign-in options.
System-Level Options: Configure display settings, notifications, power options, manage list of installed apps and more.
Privacy & security management: configure your privacy preferences such as location, collection of diagnostic data etc. Fine-tune which individual apps and services can access device capabilities by turning them on or off.
For more information about data collection in Windows, see
Data collection summary for Windows
. This statement discusses Windows 10 and Windows 11 and references to Windows in this section relate to those product versions. Earlier versions of Windows (including Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) are subject to their own privacy statements.
Activation
When you activate Windows, a specific product key is associated with the device on which your software is installed. The product key and data about the software and your device is sent to Microsoft to help validate your license to the software. This data may be sent again if there is a need to re-activate or validate your license. On phones running Windows, device and network identifiers, as well as device location at the time of the first power-up of the device, are also sent to Microsoft for the purpose of warranty registration, stock replenishment, and fraud prevention.
Back to top
Activity history
Activity history helps keep track of the things you do on your device, such as the apps and services you use, the files you open, and the websites you browse. Your activity history is created when using different apps and features such as Microsoft Edge Legacy, some Microsoft Store apps, and Microsoft 365 apps and is stored locally on your device.
You can turn settings off or on for storing activity history locally on your device, and you can also clear your device’s activity history at any time by going to
Privacy > Activity history
in the Windows settings app.
Learn more about activity history in Windows
.
Back to top
Advertising ID
Windows generates a unique advertising ID for each person using a device, which app developers and advertising networks can then use for their own purposes, including providing relevant advertising in apps. When the advertising ID is enabled, both Microsoft apps and third-party apps can access and use the advertising ID in much the same way that websites can access and use a unique identifier stored in a cookie. Thus, your advertising ID can be used by app developers and advertising networks to provide more relevant advertising and other personalized experiences across their apps and on the web. Microsoft collects the advertising ID for the uses described here only when you choose to enable the advertising ID as part of your privacy setting.
The advertising ID setting applies to Windows apps using the Windows advertising identifier. You can turn off access to this identifier at any time by turning off the advertising ID in the Windows settings app. If you choose to turn it on again, the advertising ID will be reset and a new identifier will be generated. When a third-party app accesses the advertising ID, its use of the advertising ID will be subject to its own privacy policy.
Learn more about advertising ID in Windows
.
The advertising ID setting does not apply to other methods of interest-based advertising delivered by Microsoft or third parties, such as cookies used to provide interest-based display ads on websites. Third-party products accessed through or installed on Windows may also deliver other forms of interest-based advertising subject to their own privacy policies. Microsoft delivers other forms of interest-based ads in certain Microsoft products, both directly and by partnering with third-party ad providers. For more information on how Microsoft uses data for advertising, see the
How we use personal data
section of this statement.
Back to top
Diagnostics
Microsoft collects Windows diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Windows up to date, secure, and operating properly. It also helps us improve Windows and related Microsoft products and services. While the device is running, diagnostic data is collected and periodically transmitted to Microsoft and stored along with one or more unique identifiers that can help us recognize an individual user on an individual device and understand the device's service issues and use patterns.
There are two levels of diagnostic and activity data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data. Certain product documentation and other materials refer to Required diagnostic data as Basic diagnostic data and to Optional diagnostic data as Full diagnostic data.
If an organization (such as your employer or school) uses Microsoft Entra ID to manage the account it provides to you and enrolls your device in the Windows diagnostic data processor configuration, Microsoft’s processing of diagnostic data in connection with Windows is governed by a contract between Microsoft and the organization. If an organization uses Microsoft management tools or engages Microsoft to manage your device, Microsoft and the organization will use and process diagnostic and error data from your device to allow the management, monitoring, and troubleshooting of your devices managed by the organization, and for other purposes of the organization.
Required diagnostic data
includes information about your device, its settings and capabilities, and whether it is performing properly. We collect the following Required diagnostic data:
Device, connectivity, and configuration data:
Data about the device such as the processor type, OEM manufacturer, type of battery and capacity, number and type of cameras, firmware, and memory attributes.
Network capabilities and connection data such as the device’s IP address, mobile network (including IMEI and mobile operator), and whether the device is connected to a free or paid network.
Data about the operating system and its configuration such as the OS version and build number, region and language settings, diagnostics data settings, and whether the device is part of the Windows Insider program.
Data about connected peripherals such as model, manufacturer, drivers, and compatibility data.
Data about the applications installed on the device such as application name, version, and publisher.
Whether a device is ready for an update and whether there are factors that may impede the ability to receive updates, such as low battery, limited disk space, or connectivity through a paid network.
Whether updates complete successfully or fail.
Data about the reliability of the diagnostics collection system itself.
Basic error reporting, which is health data about the operating system and applications running on your device. For example, basic error reporting tells us if an application, such as Microsoft Paint or a third-party game, hangs or crashes.
Optional diagnostic data
includes more detailed information about your device and its settings, capabilities, and device health. Optional diagnostic data may also include data about the websites you browse, device activity (also sometimes referred to as usage), and enhanced error reporting that helps Microsoft to fix and improve products and services for all users. When you choose to send Optional diagnostic data, Required diagnostic data will always be included, and we collect the following additional information:
Additional data about the device, connectivity, and configuration, beyond that collected under Required diagnostic data.
Status and logging information about the health of operating system and other system components beyond that collected about the update and diagnostics systems under Required diagnostic data.
App activity, such as which programs are launched on a device, how long they run, and how quickly they respond to input.
Browser activity, including browsing history and search terms, in Microsoft browsers (Microsoft Edge or Internet Explorer).
Enhanced error reporting, including the memory state of the device when a system or app crash occurs (which may unintentionally contain user content, such as parts of a file you were using when the problem occurred).
Some of the data described above may not be collected from your device even if you choose to send Optional diagnostic data. Microsoft minimizes the volume of Optional diagnostic data it collects from all devices by collecting some of the data from only a subset of devices (sample). By running the Diagnostic Data Viewer tool, you can see an icon which indicates whether your device is part of a sample and also which specific data is collected from your device. Instructions for how to download the Diagnostic Data Viewer tool can be found in the Windows settings app under Diagnostics & feedback.
Specific data items collected in Windows diagnostics are subject to change to give Microsoft flexibility to collect the data needed for the purposes described. For example, to enable Microsoft to troubleshoot the latest performance issue impacting users’ computing experience or update a Windows device that is new to the market, Microsoft may need to collect data items that were not collected previously. For a current list of data types collected at
Required diagnostic data
and
Optional diagnostic data
, see
Windows Required (Basic level) diagnostic events and fields
or
Windows Optional (Full level) diagnostic data
. We provide limited portions of error report information to partners (such as the device manufacturer) to help them troubleshoot products and services which work with Windows and other Microsoft product and services. They are only permitted to use this information to repair or improve those products and services. We may also share some aggregated, de-identified diagnostic data, such as general usage trends for Windows apps and features, with selected third parties.
Learn more about diagnostic data in Windows
.
Inking and typing Recognition
. You also can choose to help Microsoft improve inking and typing recognition by sending inking and typing diagnostic data. If you choose to do so, Microsoft will collect samples of the content you type or write to improve features such as handwriting recognition, autocompletion, next word prediction, and spelling correction in the many languages used by Microsoft customers. When Microsoft collects inking and typing diagnostic data, it is divided into small samples and processed to remove unique identifiers, sequencing information, and other data (such as email addresses and numeric values) which could be used to reconstruct the original content or associate the input to you. It also includes associated performance data, such as changes you manually make to text, as well as words you've added to the dictionary.
Learn more about improving inking and typing in Windows
.
Back to top
Personalized offers
If you choose to turn on
Personalized offers
, we will use information about your device and how you use it, including Windows diagnostic data, in combination with your account info and data collected by other Microsoft products and services to offer you personalized tips, ads, and recommendations to enhance your Windows experiences. Personalized offers include suggestions on how to customize and optimize Windows, as well as ads and recommendations for Microsoft and third-party products and services, features, apps, and hardware to enhance your Windows experiences. For example, Windows might tell you about new features to help you get the most out of your device. If you stream movies in your browser, Windows might recommend an app from the Microsoft Store that streams more efficiently. Or, if you are running out of space on your hard drive, Windows might recommend you try OneDrive or purchase hardware to add more storage.
When Personalized offers is on, Windows may use your required diagnostic data to personalize offers. This data may include information about your device, its settings and capabilities, and whether it is performing properly. If you have decided to share optional diagnostic data, the data used to personalize offers may also include information about how you use apps and features, plus additional information about the health of your device. We may also use information about your device and your activity to personalize offers locally on your device, even when the data does not leave your device. We do not use the content of crash dumps, speech, typing, or inking input data for personalizing offers.
In addition to information about your device and how you use it, including Windows diagnostic data, we may use or combine the following data from other Microsoft products and your account with Windows diagnostic data to personalize offers:
Web activity, if you give Microsoft Edge permission to collect your web activity for personalized search, ads, and news.
Info about your use of other Microsoft products and services, including Microsoft Bing, Microsoft 365, Xbox, and Microsoft websites, such as MSN.com.
Subscription and purchase history.
Data from third-party websites which may be shared with Microsoft.
We may also use information about your interactions with tips, recommendations, and promotions to provide and improve the personalized offers and similar messages in other Microsoft products.
To manage how data collected by other Microsoft products is used to personalize offers, you can visit your
Personalized ads and offers page
. The data we use to personalize offers may change over time, but this page will always have the latest list of data sources so you can make decisions on how your data is used by Microsoft. In some regions such as the European Economic Area, turning off Personalized offers on Windows also stops the use of data from other Microsoft products to personalize tips, ads, and recommendations in Windows. In other regions, you can manage how data collected by other Microsoft products is used to personalize offers by visiting your
Personalized ads and offers page
.
Contextual data from your device and some basic account data are used to show you appropriate messaging in Windows regardless of whether the Personalized offers setting or the use of data from other Microsoft products to personalize offers are turned off. For example, this data is used to make sure content is in the correct language and appropriate for your age group.
Personalized offers applies to tips, offers, ads, and recommendations you see in Windows. Changing this setting will not impact the kinds of offers you may see in other Microsoft products. You can change this setting at any time by searching for
Personalized offers
in the Windows Settings app.
Learn more about personalized offers
.
Tailored experiences
Tailored experiences is being replaced by Personalized offers in more recent versions of Windows. If you have not installed the latest Windows Update, you may still see Tailored experiences on your device.
If you choose to turn on Tailored experiences, we will use your Windows diagnostic data (Required or Optional as you have selected) to offer you personalized tips, ads, and recommendations to enhance Microsoft experiences. If you have selected Required as your diagnostic data setting, personalization is based on information about your device, its settings and capabilities, and whether it is performing properly. If you have selected Optional, personalization is also based on information about how you use apps and features, plus additional information about the health of your device. However, we do not use information about the websites you browse, the content of crash dumps, speech, typing, or inking input data for personalization when we receive such data from customers who have selected Optional. Tailored experiences data is transmitted to Microsoft and stored with one or more unique identifiers that can help us recognize an individual user on an individual device and understand the device’s service issues and use patterns.
Tailored experiences include suggestions on how to customize and optimize Windows, as well as ads and recommendations for Microsoft and third-party products and services, features, apps, and hardware for your Windows experiences. For example, to help you get the most out of your device, we may tell you about features you may not know about or that are new. If you are having a problem with your Windows device, you may be offered a solution. You may be offered a chance to customize your lock screen with pictures, or to be shown more pictures of the kind you like, or fewer of the ones you do not. If you stream movies in your browser, you may be recommended an app from the Microsoft store that streams more efficiently. Or, if you are running out of space on your hard drive, Windows may recommend you try OneDrive or purchase hardware to gain more space.
Learn more about tailored experiences in Windows
.
Back to top
Feedback Hub
Feedback Hub provides a way to gather feedback on Microsoft products and installed first party and third-party apps. When you use Feedback Hub, Feedback Hub periodically reads the installed app list to determine apps for which feedback can be sent. Feedback Hub determines the apps installed in your device through public APIs. Additionally, for HoloLens, Feedback Hub uses your camera and microphone when you choose to share surroundings and audio input. It also uses picture and document library to access screenshots and screen recordings that you attach for sending as part of feedback.
You can sign into Feedback Hub using either your personal Microsoft account or an account provided by your organization (such as your employer or school) that you use to sign into Microsoft products. Signing in with your work or school account allows you to submit feedback to Microsoft in association with your organization. Any feedback you provide whether using your work or school account or personal Microsoft account may be publicly viewable depending on the settings configured by your organization’s administrators. Additionally, if feedback is provided using your work or school account, your feedback can be viewed through the Feedback Hub or via admin center by your organization’s administrators.
When you submit feedback to Microsoft about a problem or add more details to a problem, diagnostic data will be sent to Microsoft to improve Microsoft products and services. Depending on your Diagnostic data settings in the
Diagnostics & feedback
section of the Windows settings, Feedback Hub will either send diagnostic data automatically or you will have the option to send it to Microsoft at the time you provide feedback. Based on the category chosen when submitting feedback, there may be additional personal data collected that helps to further troubleshoot issues; for example, location related information when submitting feedback about location services or gaze related information when submitting feedback on Mixed Reality. Microsoft may also share your feedback along with the data collected when you submit your feedback with Microsoft partners (such as a device manufacturer, or firmware developer) to help them troubleshoot products and services that work with Windows and other Microsoft products and services.
Learn more about diagnostic data in Windows
.
Back to top
Get Help
Get Help enables Windows users to get technical support on Windows and other Microsoft applications.  It provides self-service support (such as links to help articles or directions on how Windows users can solve problems on their own), Diagnostics, and connecting the customer to a live Microsoft agent as appropriate. You can sign into the Get Help component with your Microsoft account to create a consumer support case.  Enterprise account users may also be permitted to create a customer support case depending on their organization’s support contract, and if enabled by their tenant administrator.
Get Help may suggest you run a Diagnostic. If you consent, diagnostic data is handled in accordance with the
Diagnostics
section.
If permitted by system settings, the system microphone may be used to capture the support question instead of your needing to type. You can control this in the “Microphone Privacy Settings” in the Windows Settings application. Get Help will also access your Application List to aid in opening the Feedback Hub to the correct app if you choose to start the feedback process within Get Help. All feedback will be entered and controlled by the Feedback Hub, as described in the Feedback Hub section of this Privacy Statement. Get Help does not use your location data as part of its services.
Back to top
Live captions
Live captions transcribe audio to help with the comprehension of spoken content. Live captions can generate captions from any audio containing speech, whether the audio is online, audio you have downloaded to your device, or audio received from your microphone. By default, transcribing microphone audio is disabled.
Voice data that is captioned is only processed on your device and is not shared to the cloud or with Microsoft.
Learn more about live captions
.
Back to top
Location services and recording
Windows location service
. Microsoft operates a location service that helps determine the precise geographic location of a specific Windows device. Depending on the capabilities of the device, the device’s location can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy and may in some cases be determined precisely. When you have enabled location on a Windows device, or you have given permission for Microsoft apps to access location information on non-Windows devices, data about cell towers and Wi-Fi access points and their locations is collected by Microsoft and added to the location database after removing any data identifying the person or device from which it was collected. This de-identified location information is used to improve Microsoft's location services.
Windows services and features, apps running on Windows, and websites opened in Windows browsers can access the device’s location through Windows if your settings allow them to do so. Some features and apps request location permission when you first install Windows, some ask the first time you use the app, and others ask every time you access the device’s location. For information about certain Windows apps that use the device’s location, see the
Windows apps
section of this privacy statement.
When an app or feature accesses the device’s location and you are signed in with a Microsoft account, your Windows device will also upload its location to the cloud where it is available across your devices to other apps or services that use your Microsoft account and for which you’ve granted permission. We will retain only the last known location (each new location replaces the previous one). Data about a Windows device's recent location history is also stored on the device even if not using a Microsoft account, and certain apps and Windows features can access this location history. You can clear your device's location history at any time in the Windows settings app.
In the Windows settings app, you can also view which apps have access to the device’s precise location or your device's location history, turn off or on access to the device’s location for particular apps, or turn off access to the device’s location. You can also set a default location, which will be used when the location service can’t detect a more exact location for your device.
There are some exceptions to how your device’s location can be determined that are not directly managed by the location settings.
Desktop apps are a specific type of app that won’t ask for separate permission to discover your device location information and won’t appear in the list that allows you to choose apps that can use your location. They can be downloaded from the Microsoft Store, downloaded from the internet, or installed with some type of media (such as a CD, DVD, or USB storage device). They’re opened using an .EXE, .MSI, or .DLL file, and they typically run on your device, unlike web-based apps (which run in the cloud).
Learn more about third-party desktop apps and how they may still be able to determine your device’s location when the device’s location setting is off
.
Some web-based experiences or third-party apps that surface on Windows could use other technologies (such as Bluetooth, Wi-Fi, cellular modem, etc.) or cloud-based location services to determine your device’s location with varying degrees of accuracy even when you’ve turned off the device location setting.
In addition, to facilitate getting help in an emergency, whenever you make an emergency call, Windows will attempt to determine and share your precise location, regardless of your location settings. If your device has a SIM card or is otherwise using cellular service, your mobile operator will have access to your device’s location.
Learn more about location in Windows
.
General Location
. If you turn on Location services, apps that cannot use your precise location may still have access to your general location, such as your city, postal code, or region.
Find my device
. The Find my device feature allows an administrator of a Windows device to find the location of that device from account.microsoft.com/devices. To enable Find my device, an administrator needs to be signed in with a Microsoft account and have the location setting enabled. This feature will work even if other users have denied access to location for all their apps. When the administrator attempts to locate the device, users will see a notification in the notification area.
Learn more about Find my device in Windows
.
Recording
. Some Windows devices have a recording feature that allows you to capture audio and video clips of your activity on the device, including your communications with others. If you choose to record a session, the recording will be saved locally on your device. In some cases, you may have the option to transmit the recording to a Microsoft product or service that broadcasts the recording publicly.
Important: You should understand your legal responsibilities before recording and/or transmitting any communication. This may include obtaining the prior consent of everyone participating in the conversation or any other authorizations as required.
Microsoft is not responsible for how you use recording features or your recordings.
Back to top
Narrator
Narrator is a built-in screen reader tool that helps you use Windows without a screen. Narrator offers intelligent image and page title description and web page summaries when you encounter undescribed images and ambiguous links.
When you choose to get an image description by pressing Narrator + Ctrl + D, the image will be sent to Microsoft to perform analysis of the image and generate a description. Images are used only to generate the description and are not stored by Microsoft.
When you choose to get page title descriptions by pressing Narrator + Ctrl + D, the URL of the site you are visiting will be sent to Microsoft to generate the page title description and to provide and improve Microsoft services, such as Bing services as described in the Bing section above.
When you choose to get a list of popular links for a web page by pressing Narrator + double press of S, the URL of the site you are visiting will be sent to Microsoft to generate the summary of popular links and to provide and improve Microsoft services, such as Bing.
You can disable these features at any time by going to
Narrator>Get image descriptions, page titles and popular links
in Settings in Windows.
You can also send feedback about Narrator to help Microsoft diagnose and resolve problems with Narrator and improve Microsoft products and services, such as Windows. Verbal feedback can be submitted at any time in Narrator by using Narrator Key + Alt + F. When you use this command, the Feedback Hub app will launch, giving you the opportunity to submit verbal feedback. If you enable the setting “Help Make Narrator Better” in the Windows settings app and submit verbal feedback through Feedback Hub, recent device and usage data, including event trace log (ETL) data, will be submitted along with your verbal feedback to improve Microsoft products and services, such as Windows.
Back to top
Phone Link - Link to Windows
The Phone Link feature lets you link your Android phone with your Microsoft Account and your iPhone via Bluetooth to connect to your Windows PC. Your Android device will link with your Microsoft Account and your iPhone will link via Bluetooth, enabling a variety of cross-device experiences across all your Windows devices where you are signed in or connected via Bluetooth. You can use Phone Link to see recent photos from your Android phone on your Windows device; make and receive live calls from your Android phone on your Windows device; view and send text messages from your Windows device; view, dismiss, or perform other actions to your Android phone notifications from your Windows device; share your phone screen on your Windows device through Phone Link’s mirroring function; and instantly access Android apps installed on your Android phone on your Windows device. You can use Phone Link to make and receive calls from your iPhone, view and send text messages, and view, dismiss, or perform other actions on your iPhone notification from your Windows device.
To use Phone Link, Link to Windows must be installed on your Android device. You may also optionally download Phone Link to your iPhone.
To use Phone Link, you must log into your Microsoft account on the Phone Link feature on your Windows device and on Link to Windows on your Android phone or Bluetooth enabled on your iPhone. Your Android phone and your Windows device must be connected to the internet. Some features will require you to enable Bluetooth and pair your phone with your PC. To use the Calls feature, your Android phone must also have Bluetooth enabled.
During setting up your Windows device, you can choose to link your phone with your Microsoft account. This is done by signing into Link to Windows on your Android phone, granting permissions and completing the onboarding experience. Once complete, Link to Windows will sync your data to all your Windows PCs where you have signed into your Microsoft account. See below for details on how your data is used.
As part of providing Phone Link’s features to you, Microsoft collects performance, usage, and device data that includes, for example, the hardware capabilities of your mobile phone and Windows device, the number and duration of your sessions on Phone Link, and the amount of time you spent during setup.
You can unlink your Android phone from your Windows device at any time by going into your Phone Link settings and choosing to remove your Android phone. You can do the same from the settings in Link to Windows on your Android phone. For detailed information, see
our support page
.
You can unlink your iPhone from your Windows device at any time by going into Phone Link settings and choosing to remove your iPhone. You can do the same from your iPhone by going into
Settings > Bluetooth > Selecting your PC name > click on the (i) icon >
and choosing
Forget This Device
. All users can remove the Bluetooth pairing by disabling the experiences.
Text Messages – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to view text messages delivered to your Android phone on your Windows device and send text messages from your Windows device. Only text messages received and sent within the last 30 days are visible on your Windows device. These text messages are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We never store your text messages on our servers or change or delete any text messages on your Android phone. You can see messages sent via SMS (Short Message Service), MMS (Multimedia Messaging Service) on Android devices, and messages sent via RCS (Rich Communication Services) on select Samsung devices on select mobile operator networks. To provide this functionality, Phone Link accesses the content of your text messages and the contact information of the individuals or businesses from whom you are receiving or sending text messages.
Text Messages – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to view text messages delivered to your iPhone on your Windows devices and send text messages from your Windows device. Only text messages received and sent within your Bluetooth session or iMessage are visible on your Windows devices. These text messages are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We never store your text messages on our servers or change or delete any text messages on your iPhone. You can see messages sent via SMS (Short Message Service). To provide this functionality, Phone Link accesses the content of your text messages and the contact information of the individuals or businesses from whom you are receiving or sending text messages.
Calls – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to make and receive calls from your Android phone on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can also view your recent calls on your Windows device. To activate this feature, you must enable certain permissions on both your Windows device and Android phone, such as call logs access and permission to make phone calls from your PC. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your Android phone's settings. Only calls received and dialed within the last 30 days are visible under call logs on your Windows device. These call details are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We do not change or delete your call history on your Android phone.
Calls – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to make and receive calls from your iPhone on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can also view your recent calls on your Windows device. To activate this feature, you must enable Sync Contacts feature under Bluetooth settings on your iPhone. These call details are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We do not change or delete your call history on your iPhone.
Photos – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to copy, share, edit, save, or delete photos from your Android phone on your Windows device. Only a limited number of your most recent photos from the Camera Roll and Screenshots folders on your Android phone will be visible on your Windows device at any given time. These photos are temporarily stored on your Windows device and as you take more photos on your Android phone, we remove the temporary copies of the older photos from your Windows device. We never store your photos on our servers or change or delete any photos on your Android phone.
Notifications – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to view your Android phone’s notifications on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can read and dismiss your Android phone’s notifications from your Windows device or perform other actions related to the notifications. To activate this Phone Link feature, you must enable certain permissions, such as sync notifications, on both your Windows device and Android phone. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your Android phone’s settings. For detailed information, see
our support page
.
Notifications – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to view your iPhone’s notifications on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can read and dismiss your iPhone’s notifications from your Windows device or perform other actions related to the notifications. To activate this Phone Link feature, you must enable certain permissions such as sync notifications, on both your Windows device and iPhone. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your iPhone’s Bluetooth settings.
Phone Screen Mirroring – Android devices.
On supported devices
, Phone Link allows you to view your Android phone’s screen on your Windows device. Your Android phone screen will be visible on your Windows device as a pixel stream and any audio that you enable on your Android phone screen while it is linked to your Windows device through Phone Link will play through your Android phone.
Apps mirroring – Android devices.
On supported devices, Phone Link allows you to use your Android apps that are installed on your Android phone on your Windows device. For example, you can launch a music app in your Windows session and listen to audio from that app on your PC speakers. Microsoft collects a list of your installed Android apps and recent activity to provide the service and show you your most recently used apps. Microsoft does not store what apps you have installed or any of the information displayed by the app in your experience with it.
Content transfer – Android devices.
On supported devices, Phone Link allows you to copy and paste contents such as files, documents, photos, etc. between your Android phone and your Windows device. You can transfer content from your Android phone to your Windows device and from your Windows device to your Android phone by drag and drop contents between the devices.
Instant Hotspot – Android devices.
On supported devices, Link to Windows enables users to share mobile hotspot information with their paired PC over secure Bluetooth communication. Your PC can then be connected to the internet through the Windows network flyout. Please note mobile data charges may apply depending on the mobile data plan you have.
Contacts sync – Android devices.
Link to Windows allows you to sync your Android contacts into the Microsoft cloud to access them in other Microsoft products and services. You can enable this feature by going into Link to Windows settings and enabling “Contacts sync” feature. Your contacts information is stored online and associated with your Microsoft account. You may choose to disable sync and delete these contacts at any time.
Learn more
.
Contacts sync – iPhone.
Phone Link allows you to sync your contacts from your iPhone to access them for messaging and calling. You can enable this feature by going into Bluetooth settings on your iPhone and toggle on Sync Contacts under your PC name after connecting your iPhone to Phone Link. You may choose to disable syncing at any time by toggling off Sync Contacts.
Text-to-voice.
Phone Link features include accessibility functionality such as text-to-voice. You can activate a text-to-voice feature, which allows you to hear the contents of a text message or notification as audio. If you activate this feature, your text messages and notifications will be read out loud as they are received.
Office Enterprise – Android Devices.
Link to Windows allows you to insert photos into web and desktop versions of select Microsoft 365 apps, such as PowerPoint, Excel, and Word directly from your mobile phone. This requires your IT Administrator to have enabled Optional Connected Experiences for Microsoft Office applications and you will need to associate your mobile device with your work or school account and provide Photos permission to your account. After onboarding, your session will last 15 minutes to enable you to transfer your Photos from your mobile device. To use this feature again, you will need to scan your QR code. Link to Windows does not collect your work or school account information or information about your Enterprise. In order to provide this service, Microsoft uses a cloud service to relay your files for the purpose of inserting the photos into web and desktop version of select Microsoft 365 apps, such as PowerPoint, Excel, and Word files.
Back to top
Cross-device experiences
Cross-device experiences in Windows allow you to access your mobile device from your PC using your Microsoft Account. These can be managed under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in your Windows PC Settings. As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects performance usage and device data, including information about the hardware capabilities of your mobile and Windows devices. You can turn this feature on or off at any time in your Windows PC Settings.
Use your mobile device as a connected camera.
This feature allows you to use your mobile device’s camera in apps or products on Windows that support camera functionality. You can enable this feature under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in the Settings on your PC. Microsoft does not record or store your camera sessions or any of the information displayed by your camera in any of the applications or products.
Get new photo notifications from your mobile device.
This feature allows you to receive notifications from your linked mobile device on your Windows PC. These photos are temporarily stored on your Windows PC while you are editing or opening those photos. You will need to initiate saving to your PC to store those photos until you decide to delete them. We never store your photos on our servers or change or delete any photos on your mobile device.
Show your mobile device in File Explorer
. This feature allows you to access your mobile device’s files in File Explorer. You can enable this feature under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in the Settings on your PC. Microsoft will not store your file contents in its services.
Back to top
Security and safety features
Device encryption
. Device encryption helps protect the data stored on your device by encrypting it using BitLocker Drive Encryption technology. When device encryption is on, Windows automatically encrypts the drive Windows is installed on and generates a recovery key. The BitLocker recovery key for your personal device is automatically backed up online in your personal Microsoft OneDrive account. Microsoft doesn't use your individual recovery keys for any purpose.
Malicious Software Removal Tool
. The Malicious Software Removal Tool (MSRT) runs on your device at least once per month as part of Windows Update. MSRT checks devices for infections by specific, prevalent malicious software ("malware") and helps remove any infections found. When the MSRT runs, it will remove the malware listed on the Microsoft Support website if the malware is on your device. During a malware check, a report will be sent to Microsoft with specific data about malware detected, errors, and other data about your device. If you do not want MSRT to send this data to Microsoft, you can disable MSRT's reporting component.
Microsoft Family
. Parents can use Microsoft Family Safety to understand and set boundaries on how their child is using their device. Please carefully review the information at
Microsoft Family Safety
if choosing to create or join a family group. If you live in a region that requires permission to create an account to access Microsoft services, you may be prompted to request or give parental consent. If a user is under the statutory age in your region, during the registration process they will be prompted to request consent from a parent or guardian by entering an adult’s email. When Family activity reporting is turned on for a child, Microsoft will collect details about how the child uses their device and provide parents with reports of that child's activities. Activity reports are routinely deleted from Microsoft servers.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen and Smart App Control
. Microsoft strives to help protect your device and passwords from unsafe apps, files, and web content.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen helps protect you when using our services by identifying threats to you, your device, and your passwords. These threats might include potentially unsafe apps or web content that Microsoft Defender SmartScreen discovers while checking websites you visit, files you download, and apps you install and run. When Microsoft Defender SmartScreen checks web and app content, data about the content and your device is sent to Microsoft, including the full web address of the content. When additional analysis is needed to identify security threats, information about the suspicious website or app—such as content displayed, sounds played, and application memory—may be sent to Microsoft. This data will only be used for security purposes in detecting, protecting against, and responding to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, or other malicious, deceptive, or illegal activities. If Microsoft Defender SmartScreen detects that content is potentially unsafe, you will see a warning in place of the content. Microsoft Defender SmartScreen can be turned on or off in the Windows Security app.
Where supported, Smart App Control helps check software that is installed and runs on your device to determine if it is malicious, potentially unwanted, or poses other threats to you and your device. On a supported device, Smart App Control starts in evaluation mode and the data we collect for Microsoft Defender SmartScreen such as file name, a hash of the file’s contents, the download location, and the file’s digital certificates, is used to help determine whether your device is a good candidate to use Smart App Control for additional security protection. Smart App Control is not enabled and will not block during evaluation mode. Some devices may not be good candidates if Smart App Control would otherwise get in the way and interfere with a user’s otherwise intended and legitimate tasks – for instance, developers who use a lot of unsigned files. If you are a good candidate for Smart App Control, then it will automatically be turned on, and will provide additional protection to your device beyond Microsoft Defender SmartScreen. Otherwise, Smart App Control will be unavailable and permanently turned off. If your device is unsupported or not a good candidate for Smart App Control, Microsoft Defender SmartScreen will continue to help protect your device. When Smart App Control is enabled and identifies an app as malicious, potentially unwanted, or unknown and unsigned, it will block and notify you prior to opening, running, or installing the app.
Learn more about Smart App Control
.
When either Microsoft Defender SmartScreen or Smart App Control checks a file, data about that file is sent to Microsoft, including the file name, a hash of the file’s contents, the download location, and the file’s digital certificates.
Smart App Control can be turned on or off in the Windows Security app.
Microsoft Defender Antivirus
. Microsoft Defender Antivirus looks for malware and other unwanted software, potentially unwanted apps, and other malicious content on your device. Microsoft Defender Antivirus is automatically turned on to help protect your device if no other antimalware software is actively protecting your device. If Microsoft Defender Antivirus is turned on, it will monitor the security status of your device. When Microsoft Defender Antivirus is turned on, or is running because Limited Periodic Scanning is enabled, it will automatically send reports to Microsoft that contain data about suspected malware and other unwanted software, potentially unwanted apps, and other malicious content, and it may also send files that could contain malicious content, such as malware or unknown files for further inspection. If a report is likely to contain personal data, the report is not sent automatically, and you'll be prompted before it is sent. You can configure Microsoft Defender Antivirus not to send reports and suspected malware to Microsoft.
Back to top
Speech, Voice Activation, Inking, and Typing
Speech
. Microsoft provides both a device-based speech recognition feature and cloud-based (online) speech recognition technologies.
Turning on the Online speech recognition setting lets apps use Microsoft cloud-based speech recognition. Additionally, in Windows 10, the Online speech recognition setting enables your ability to use dictation within Windows.
Turning on speech while setting up a HoloLens device or installing Windows Mixed Reality allows you to use your voice for commands, dictation, and app interactions. Both device-based speech recognition and online speech recognition settings will be enabled. With both settings enabled, while your headset is turned on the device will always be listening to your voice input and will send your voice data to Microsoft’s cloud-based speech recognition technologies.
When you use cloud-based speech recognition technologies from Microsoft, whether enabled by the Online speech recognition setting or when you interact with HoloLens or voice typing, Microsoft collects and uses your voice recordings to provide the speech recognition service by creating a text transcription of the spoken words in the voice data. Microsoft will not store, sample, or listen to your voice recordings without your permission. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
You can use device-based speech recognition without sending your voice data to Microsoft. However, Microsoft cloud-based speech recognition technologies provide more accurate recognition than the device-based speech recognition. When the online speech recognition setting is turned off, speech services that do not rely on the cloud and only use device-based recognition—like live captions, Narrator, or voice access—will still work and Microsoft won’t collect any voice data.
You can turn off online speech recognition at any time. This will stop any apps that rely on the Online speech recognition setting from sending your voice data to Microsoft. If you are using a HoloLens or Windows Mixed Reality headset, you can also turn off device-based speech recognition at any time. This will stop the device from listening for your voice input.
Learn more about speech recognition in Windows
.
Voice Activation
. Windows provides supported apps with the ability to respond and take action based on voice keywords that are specific to that app.
If you’ve given permission for an app to listen for voice keywords, Windows will be actively listening to the microphone for these keywords. Once a keyword is recognized, the app will have access to your voice recording, can process the recording, take action, and respond, such as with a spoken answer. The app may send the voice recording to its own services in the cloud to process the commands. Each app should ask you for permission before accessing voice recordings.
Additionally, voice activation can be enabled when the device is locked. If enabled, the relevant app will continue listening to the microphone for voice keywords when you have locked your device and can activate for anyone who speaks near the device. When the device is locked, the app will have access to the same set of capabilities and information as when the device is unlocked.
You can turn off voice activation at any time.
Learn more about voice activation in Windows
.
Even when you’ve turned off voice activation, some third-party desktop apps and services could still be listening to the microphone and collect your voice input.
Learn more about third-party desktop apps and how they may still be able to access your microphone even with these settings turned off
.
Voice typing
. In Windows 11, dictation has been updated and renamed as voice typing. Voice typing may use both device-based and online speech recognition technologies to power its speech-to-text transcription service. You can also choose to contribute voice clips to help improve voice typing. If you choose not to contribute voice clips, you can still use voice typing. You can change your selection anytime in the voice typing settings. Microsoft will not store, sample, or listen to your voice recordings without your permission.
Learn more about Microsoft and your voice data
.
Voice access
. Windows enables everyone, including people with mobility disabilities, to control their PC and author text using their voice. For example, voice access supports scenarios like opening and switching between apps, browsing the web, and reading and authoring mail. Voice access leverages modern, on-device speech recognition to accurately recognize speech and is supported without an internet connection. When a user invokes voice access it uses the device microphone.
Learn more about voice access
.
Inking & Typing Personalization
. Your typed and handwritten words are collected to provide you with a custom word list, better character recognition to help you type and write on your device, and text suggestions that appear as you type or write.
You can turn off inking & typing personalization at any time. This will delete your customer word list stored on your device. If you turn it back on, you’ll need to recreate your custom word list.
Learn more about inking & typing personalization in Windows
.
Back to top
Sync and backup settings
When you sign into Windows with your Microsoft account, Windows can store your settings, files, and device configuration data in Microsoft’s servers. Windows will only use the stored settings, files, and device configuration data to make it easier for you to migrate your experience on a different device.
You can turn off this feature and stop Windows from storing your settings, files, and configuration data from the Windows settings. You can delete the data that has been backed up previously to your Microsoft account, by visiting
your Microsoft Account Devices page
.
Learn more about Windows backup and sync settings
.
Back to top
Update Services
Update Services for Windows includes Windows Update and Microsoft Update. Windows Update is a service that provides you with software updates for Windows software and other supporting software, such as drivers and firmware supplied by device manufacturers. Microsoft Update is a service that provides you with software updates for other Microsoft software such as Microsoft 365.
Windows Update automatically downloads Windows software updates to your device. You can configure Windows Update to automatically install these updates as they become available (recommended) or have Windows notify you when a restart is required to finish installing updates. Apps available through the Microsoft Store are automatically updated through the Microsoft Store, as described in the
Microsoft Store
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Web browsers—Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer
This section applies to legacy versions of Microsoft Edge (versions 44 and below). See the
Microsoft Edge
section of the Privacy Statement for information about non-legacy versions of Microsoft Edge.
Microsoft Edge is the default web browser for Windows. Internet Explorer, the legacy browser from Microsoft, is also available in Windows. Whenever you use a web browser to access the internet, data about your device ("standard device data") is sent to the websites you visit and online services you use. Standard device data includes your device's IP address, browser type and language, access times, and referring website addresses. This data might be logged on those websites' web servers. Which data is logged and how that data is used depends on the privacy practices of the websites you visit and web services you use. Additionally, Microsoft Edge sends a unique browser ID to certain websites to enable us to develop aggregate data used to improve browser features and services.
Additionally, data about how you use your browser, such as your browsing history, web form data, temporary internet files, and cookies, is stored on your device. You can delete this data from your device using Delete Browsing History.
Microsoft Edge allows you to capture and save content on your device, such as:
Web note
. Allows you to create ink and text annotations on the webpages you visit, and clip, save, or share them.
Active reading
. Allows you to create and manage reading lists, including websites or documents.
Hub
. Allows you to easily manage your reading lists, favorites, downloads, and history all in one area.
Website Pin to Taskbar
. Allows you to pin your favorite websites to the Windows taskbar. Websites will be able to see which of their webpages you have pinned, so they can provide you a notification badge letting you know there is something new for you to check out on their websites.
Some Microsoft browser information saved on your device will be synced across other devices when you sign in with your Microsoft account so you can access your data on all your signed-in browsers across your devices. For instance, in Internet Explorer, this information includes your browsing history and favorites; and in Microsoft Edge, it includes your favorites, reading lists, autofill form entries (such as your name, address, and phone number), and may include data for extensions that you have installed. As an example, if you sync your Microsoft Edge reading list across devices, copies of the content you choose to save to your reading list will be sent to each synced device for later viewing. You can disable syncing in Internet Explorer by going to
Start
>
Settings
>
Accounts
>
Sync your settings
. (For more information, see the
Sync settings
section of this privacy statement.) You can also disable syncing of Microsoft Edge browser information by turning off the sync option in Microsoft Edge Settings.
Microsoft Edge and Internet Explorer use your search queries and browsing history to provide you with faster browsing and more relevant search results. These features include:
Search suggestions
in Internet Explorer automatically sends the information you type into the browser address bar to your default search provider (such as Bing) to offer search recommendations as you type each character.
Search and site suggestions
in Microsoft Edge automatically sends the information you type into the browser address bar to Bing (even if you have selected another default search provider) to offer search recommendations as you type each character.
You can turn off these features at any time. In order to provide search results, Microsoft Edge and Internet Explorer send your search queries, standard device information, and location (if you have location enabled) to your default search provider when the app is used. If Bing is your default search provider, we use this data as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Windows AI Features
Click to Do
Click to Do can run in partnership with Recall or as a stand-alone feature. Once started, you can use Click to Do to capture and analyze screenshots and identify the presence of text and images, then allowing you to take relevant actions for each. For instance, Click to Do can give you options to edit a screenshot image, or revise or rework text that it captures. Click to Do is unable to identify the content of the text or images identified within a screenshot, but you can use local AI and other tools to modify the content if you wish. Everything remains on your local device unless you make an explicit choice, like sending an image off to Bing for a search, asking Click to Do to provide a summary of text the user has selected (in which case it will be sent to Microsoft’s Azure AI cloud service), or using another local AI or other tool to modify a Click to Do screenshot.
Click to Do also allows you to use your microphone to search for text within a capture screenshot. When you click on the microphone button, Click to Do starts listening to what’s said, which is entered into the Search box, and will highlight all the matches from the search. The audio captured by the microphone is not transmitted off your device.
Windows Recall
Recall is a Windows feature only available in CoPilot+ PCs that allows users to find things they've seen on their device using the text and visual clues they remember. To use Recall, a user must opt-in to save snapshots on their Copilot+ PC, which are images of everything open and visible on the user’s screen and include associated metadata such as the app name and time-date stamp. All data is stored locally on the device and is protected with Windows Hello Enhanced Sign-in Security (ESS), which provides more secure biometric sign-ins and helps ensure only the customer can have access to their information. Every time a user launches Recall they will be asked to authenticate using Windows Hello biometric sign-in or PIN before the contents of the snapshot folder will decrypt. Click to Do runs on top of snapshots in Recall and helps the user get things done faster by allowing them to take actions with their content, either images or text, on the screen. The analysis of snapshots is always performed locally on the device and the actions available to take change based on what kind of content is detected.
Recall also allows you to use your Copilot+ PC device microphone as a way to search for text within captured snapshots. When you click on the microphone button located inside the Search input box within the Recall window, it starts listening to what’s said and enters it into the Search box. The microphone remains in use until you pause your speech, at which point it is turned off until you explicitly press the microphone button again. All the matches from the search will be highlighted in the results. The audio captured by the microphone is not transmitted off your device.
Data captured by Recall including personal data (e.g., snapshots, metadata, processing results, and user queries) remain local to the device within your signed-in account on the Copilot+ PC, and is not transmitted off the device unless you take certain action. For example, if you copy and paste a snapshot into another app, or choose to include a snapshot when submitting feedback through the Windows Feedback Hub. The only way Recall content can be shared with anyone is by explicit on-device action taken by the user.
You can control your content (such as Snapshots, metadata, search queries, and history) by pausing or deleting snapshots, filtering content, or using a supported browser in privacy mode. Learn more about your privacy and control over your Recall experience
here
.
In addition to the Recall search feature, Recall also has a timeline, in which your snapshots are organized chronologically and visualized in a horizontal scrollbar that you can use to find and leverage your past activities on your PC. In addition to the features available within the timeline, you can delete snapshots from this view, either individually or by all snapshots containing a website domain (e.g., all from www.bing.com) or those from a specific app.
Recall also has a Sensitive Content filter that is on by default to help prevent the retention of information that might be more delicate in nature (e.g., credit card numbers, state issued ID numbers, etc.). Users can turn this filter off if they wish in Windows Settings.
Back to top
Windows apps
A number of Microsoft apps are included with Windows and others are available in Microsoft Store. Some of those apps include:
Maps app
. The Maps app provides location-based services and uses Bing services to process your searches within the Maps app. When the Maps app has access to your location, and you have enabled location-based services in Windows, when you use the “@” key to initiate a search in supported text boxes in Windows apps, Bing services collects the text you type after the “@” key to provide location-based suggestions. To learn more about these Bing-powered experiences, see the
Bing
section of this privacy statement. When the Maps app has access to your location, even when the app is not in use, Microsoft may collect de-identified location data from your device to improve Microsoft services. You can disable the Maps app's access to your location by turning off the location service or turning off the Maps app's access to the location service.
You can keep track of your favorite places and recent map searches in the Maps app. Your favorite places and search history will be included as search suggestions. If you grant the Maps app access to your camera, you’ll be able to capture the location of where your photos took place – for instance, a photo of your car will also tell you where your car is parked. You can also share your location with other people in your contacts. If you're signed in with your Microsoft account, your favorite places, search history, and certain app settings will be synced across other devices and services. For more information, see the
Sync and backup settings
section of this privacy statement.
Camera app
. If you allow the Camera app to use your location, location data is embedded in the photos and videos you take with your device. Other descriptive data, such as camera model and the date that the picture or video was taken, is also embedded in photos and videos. If you choose to share a photo or video, any embedded data will be accessible to the people and services you share with. Once enabled, you can always disable the Camera app's access to your location by turning off all access to the location service in your device's Settings menu or turning off the Camera app's access to the location service.
When the Camera app is open, it shows rectangles detected by the selected camera for areas in the image that are potentially used for image enhancement. The Camera app does not retain any image enhancing data. You can always change your camera access settings in the Windows Settings menu. The Camera app uses various device capabilities such as location, camera, microphone, video, and picture library. Please visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Photos app
. There are two versions of the Photos app available. The updated Photos app includes features like iCloud integration and local and cloud folder views. The previous legacy version of the Photos app includes features like Video Editor, the People tab, and Albums. You are using the updated Photos app if the “About” section in the Photos app settings indicates the app is the “Updated” Photos app. In some cases, a user may have both the updated Photos app and the Photos legacy version downloaded on their device.
The updated Photos app helps you organize, view, and share your photos and videos. For example, the Photos app presents different ways to group photos and videos by name, date taken, or date modified, and also in folders where those files are stored, such as stored locally on your device or synced to your device from OneDrive, iCloud, and other cloud services. The app also allows you to move, copy or upload files to different locations on your computer or to OneDrive. The All Photos tab displays your locally stored or synced photos and videos according to the date they are taken. The Favorites tab lets you view photos and videos you previously liked or favorited. The Folders tab allows you to view photos or videos by their storage location. There are also tabs where you can see your photos and videos from available cloud services (such as OneDrive and other third-party services) that you have synced to your device.
The Photos legacy app also helps you organize, view, and share your photos and videos. However, if you are using the Photos legacy app, you may see other features that are not available in the newer version of the Photos app, including Collections, Albums, Video Editor and the People setting. The Collection tab displays photos and videos according to the date they are taken. The Albums tab helps you organize your photos and videos by location and common tags. The Video Editor allows you to edit, create, and share videos.
The People setting can be enabled on the Photos legacy app's Settings page and in the People tab of the app. When enabled, the Photos legacy app will use face grouping technology to organize your photos and videos into groups. The grouping feature can detect faces in a photo or video and determine whether they are visually similar to faces in other photos and videos in your local photo collection. You can choose to associate a facial grouping with a contact from your People app.
When enabled in the Photos legacy app, your groupings will be stored on your device for as long as you choose to keep the groupings or the photos or videos. If the People setting is turned on, there will be a prompt to allow the Photos legacy app to continue to permit facial groupings after three years of non-interaction with the Photos legacy app. At any time, you can go to the Settings page in the Photos legacy app to turn the People setting on or off. Turning the feature off will remove facial grouping data from the Photos legacy app but will not remove your photos or videos.
Learn more about the Photos legacy app and facial grouping
.
If you choose to share a photo or video using the Photos app or the Photos legacy app, any embedded data (such as location, camera model, and date) will be accessible to the people and services you share the photo or video with.
People app
. The People app lets you see and interact with all your contacts in one place. When you add an account to the People app, your contacts from your account will be automatically added to the People app. You can add other accounts to the People app, including your social networks (such as Facebook and Twitter) and email accounts. When you add an account, we tell you what data the People app can import or sync with the particular service and let you choose what you want to add. Other apps you install may also sync data to the People app, including providing additional details to existing contacts. When you view a contact in the People app, information about your recent interactions with the contact (such as emails and calendar events, including from apps that the People app syncs data from) will be retrieved and displayed to you. You can remove an account from the People app at any time.
Mail and Calendar app
. The Mail and Calendar app allows you to connect all your email, calendars, and files in one place, including those from third-party email and file storage providers. The app provides location-based services, such as weather information in your calendar, but you can disable the app’s use of your location. When you add an account to the Mail and Calendar app, your email, calendar items, files, contacts, and other settings from your account will automatically sync to your device and to Microsoft servers. At any time, you can remove an account or make changes to the data that’s synced from your account. To configure an account, you must provide the app with the account credentials (such as user name and password), which will be sent over the internet to the third-party provider’s server. The app will first attempt to use a secure (SSL) connection to configure your account but will send this information unencrypted if your email provider does not support SSL. If you add an account provided by an organization (such as a company email address), the owner of the organizational domain can implement certain policies and controls (for example, multi-factor authentication or the ability to remotely wipe data from your device) that may affect your use of the app. This app uses your device capabilities such as location, camera. Please visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Windows Operator Messages (previously Microsoft Messaging) app
. The Windows Operator Messages app receives and shows account-related SMS texts from your mobile operator about your data plan (such as your billing and data limits) on your PC or device. These messages are stored locally on your device. From your device, you can also access, view, and delete these messages. This app uses your device capabilities such as Contacts. Please visit Microsoft Store on Windows to learn more.
The Clock app
is your hub for time management and focus on Windows. When users sign in with their Microsoft account they can enable Microsoft To Do which is a cloud connected experience. When the user turns on Focus Session, session data is stored locally and user can clear it by going to the clock settings page. Additionally, Focus Sessions supports connecting to Spotify accounts to listen to ambient audio to help users focus. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft Journal
is a Windows application specifically designed for touch-focused, pen-capable devices such as tablets and 2-in-1 devices. It provides users with freeform personal note-taking experience. The app leverages artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning to better recognize your handwriting that processes data locally on your device. When connected to Microsoft 365 (subscription required), users can seamlessly access their M365 calendar and contacts within the app. All user created content is automatically saved at the default save location in the document library for future reference. Journal lets you access photos library and the device camera and microphone so that you can add them to a workbook. Learn about Journal app
here
or visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Mobile plans
app helps you get online easily and in more places on your Windows 10 PC and 11 LTE devices. Upon signing up for a data plan on your device, it establishes a connection with the mobile operator, enabling you to complete purchases through the mobile operator’s online portal. You will need a supported SIM card in order to use this app. The Mobile Plan App will use your IMEI, IMSI, EID, ICCID, and Country (coarse location determined by Cellular Network ID or Wi-Fi Reverse IP) to determine which mobile operators are available in your area. The mobile operator may send notifications to users through the Mobile Plans App. This app uses your device’s capabilities such as its camera and microphone. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft PC Manager
is available in select regions and is a desktop tool aimed at boosting your PC’s performance. Based on your request, PC Manager will scan your device, and allows you to delete unneeded or temporary documents, optimize cache, stop or recover from unauthorized changes, or use other features such as health check, one-click boost, storage clean-up, file and pop-up management, and protection of your default settings.
PC Manager will block pop-ups based on ad-block rules and the pop-up windows selected by you through custom block. If you agree to join the “Microsoft PC Manager Pop-up Plan,” when you block pop-up windows through custom block, you can help us optimize the pop-up management feature of Microsoft PC Manager by taking screenshots of the pop-up and sending them to Microsoft. Microsoft does not collect information other than screenshots, Windows title, and the class of Windows. Screenshots sent are only retained for a short period of time and regularly deleted. You can manage your Pop-Up Plan preferences through the PC Manager settings at anytime. The feedback feature in PC Manager may also process personal data if you include it in the feedback you provide to Microsoft. The feedback from users is regularly deleted after processing. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Snipping Tool
is a handy utility in Windows that uses your microphone and pictures library to capture and store screenshots and screen recordings. The Snipping Tool includes a Text Action feature, which uses built-in optical character recognition (OCR) support. You can select and copy text directly from images using OCR. Additionally, you can use the Text Action feature to redact sensitive information from captured text. With clipboard integration items copied from the Snipping Tool are also copied to your clipboard. If you enable clipboard history across devices, the copied content can be used seamlessly across different devices. Users can manage their clipboard and snipping preferences through the Windows settings. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Sound Recorder app
is a versatile tool designed for capturing audio via your microphone in various scenarios. While recording, you can mark key moments to easily locate important sections later. You can also trim, adjust volume levels, or apply other modifications as needed, and playback your recordings. Your recordings are autosaved and stored in your Documents folder for easy access, and you can share your recorded audio with friends and family. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft Clipchamp
is a video editor designed to make video creation easy. It allows users to combine videos, images, and audio files, as well as add text and effects, and then save the finished video to their device, or store their videos in their personal OneDrive via their Microsoft account. Users can also add stock videos and stock music or sound effects, stickers, graphical elements, backgrounds, and more. Users can choose to allow Clipchamp to access their camera and microphone to record videos directly from their device. To provide a better experience, such as which language to display to you, Clipchamp will collect your imprecise location. Users can access Clipchamp with a personal or family Microsoft account via the Clipchamp app for Windows 10 or Windows 11 and in the Edge or Chrome browser at
https://app.clipchamp.com
.
Media Player
is the default built-in player of multimedia (audio and video) files. When you choose to open a multimedia file, Media Player will read the contents of that file. When you open Media Player, it will read the contents of your Music library and Video library folders to populate its own Music library and Video library pages inside the Media Player to help you organize, view, and play multimedia content.
To enrich your experience when playing music, Media Player will automatically attempt to display artist art and album art for the content you play and the content in your music library. To provide this information, Media Player sends an information request to Microsoft containing standard device data, such as your device IP address, device software version, your regional and language settings, and an identifier for the content. If desired, this feature can be disabled on the app’s Settings page.
Movies and TV.
Microsoft Movies & TV allows you to rent or buy movies and TV episodes, and play them on your device.
To help you discover content that may interest you, Movies & TV will collect data about what movies and TV shows you watch, including the length of play and any ratings you give.
Movies & TV can also display and play local video files stored on your PC. To do this, it needs access to the video library on your device.
Windows Media Player Legacy.
When you use Windows Media Player Legacy, it can read media content such as video, audio, and picture files which allows you to play CDs and other digital content (such as video and audio files), rip CDs, and manage your media library. To enrich your experience when you play content in your library, Windows Media Player Legacy displays related media information, such as album title, song titles, album art, artist, and composer. To augment your media information, Windows Media Player Legacy will send a request to Microsoft which contains standard computer information, an identifier for the media content, and the media information already contained in your Windows Media Player Legacy library (including information you may have edited or entered yourself) so that Microsoft can recognize the track and then return additional information that is available.
Windows Media Player Legacy also allows you to play back content that is streamed to you over a network. To provide this service, it is necessary for Windows Media Player Legacy to communicate with a streaming media server. These servers are typically operated by non-Microsoft content providers. During playback of streaming media, Windows Media Player Legacy will send a log to the streaming media server or other web server(s) if the streaming media server requests it. The log includes such details as: connection time, IP address, operating system version, Windows Media Player Legacy version, Player identification number (Player ID), date, and protocol. To protect your privacy, Windows Media Player Legacy defaults to sending a Player ID that is different for each session.
Back to top
Windows Hello
Windows Hello provides instant access to your devices through biometric authentication. If you turn it on, Windows Hello uses your face, fingerprint, or iris to identify you based on a set of unique points or features that are extracted from the image and stored on your device as a template—but it does not store the actual image of your face, fingerprint, or iris. Biometric verification data that's used when you sign in doesn't leave your device. Your biometric verification data will remain on your device until you remove it. However, after a significant period of Windows Hello inactivity, you will be prompted to confirm that you want to continue to store your biometric verification data. You can delete your biometric verification data from within Settings. Learn more about
Windows Hello
.
Back to top
Windows Search
Windows Search lets you search your stuff and the web from one place. If you choose to use Windows Search to search "your stuff," it will provide results for items on your personal OneDrive, your OneDrive for Business if so enabled, other cloud storage providers to the extent supported by those third-party providers, and on your device. If you choose to use Windows Search to search the web, or get search suggestions with Windows Search, your search results will be powered by Bing and we will use your search query as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Learn more about search in Windows
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Entertainment and related services
Entertainment and Related Services power rich experiences and enable you to access a variety of content, applications and games.
Entertainment and Related Services power rich experiences and enable you to access a variety of content, applications and games.
Xbox
The Xbox network is the online gaming and entertainment service from Microsoft that consists of software and enables online experiences across different platforms. This service lets you find and play games, view content, and connect with friends on Xbox and other gaming and social networks.
When you sign up for an Xbox profile, we assign you a gamertag (a public nickname) and a unique identifier. When you sign in on Xbox devices, apps, and services, the data we collect about your use is stored using these unique identifier(s).
Xbox consoles are devices you can use to find and play games, movies, music, and other digital entertainment. When you sign in to Xbox experiences—in apps or on a console—we also assign a unique identifier to your device. When your Xbox console is connected to the internet, for instance, and you sign in to the console, we identify which console and which version of the console’s operating system you’re using.
Data we collect
about your use of Xbox services, games, apps, and consoles includes:
When you sign in and sign out of Xbox, any purchases you make, and content you obtain.
Which games you play and apps you use, your game progress, achievements, play time per game, and other play statistics.
Performance data about Xbox consoles, Xbox Game Pass and other Xbox apps, the Xbox network, connected accessories, and your network connection, including any software or hardware errors.
Content you add, upload, or share through the Xbox network, including text, pictures, and video you capture in games and apps.
Social activity, including chat data and interactions with other gamers, and connections you make (friends you add and people who follow you) on the Xbox network.
If you sign in to use Xbox on another device capable of accessing the Xbox network, and that device includes a storage device (hard drive or memory unit), usage data will be stored on the storage device and sent to Microsoft the next time you sign in to Xbox, even if you’ve been playing offline.
Data we collect enables us to provide you with our services and with curated experiences. This includes connecting you to games, content, and services, as well as presenting you with offers, discounts, and recommendations. To change your settings for these recommendations, visit
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
page.
Camera and Microphone
. While using Xbox, players can use the device’s capabilities such as the microphone, camera and screen recording to improve their gaming experience. When an Xbox game is played in the Windows Game Bar, the camera and microphone may be used, including to read photos and videos and to capture and record screenshots.
Xbox diagnostic data
. Diagnostic data has two categories: required and optional.
Required
. Xbox will send required data to Microsoft. The minimum data necessary to help keep Xbox safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Optional
. Optional data is additional data that you choose to share with Microsoft. Optional data may include additional details about the operation, usage, and performance of your Xbox products and services, as well as enhanced error reporting.
Learn more at
Manage settings for optional data sharing
.
Game captures
. Any player in a multiplayer game session can record video (game clips) and capture screenshots of their view of the game play. Other players’ game clips and screenshots can capture your in-game character and gamertag during that session. If a player captures game clips and screenshots on a PC, the resulting game clips might also capture audio chat.
Captioning
. During Xbox real-time (“party”) chat, players may activate a voice-to-text feature that lets them view that chat as text. If a player activates this feature, all voice communication in the party is captioned for the player. Microsoft uses the resulting text data to provide captioning of chat for players who need it, as well as the other purposes described in this statement.
Xbox data viewable by others
. Your gamertag, game and play statistics, achievements, presence (whether you are currently signed in to Xbox), content you share, and other data about your activity on Xbox can be seen by:
Other players signed in to Xbox.
Customers of third-party services you’ve linked your profile to, or
Other services associated with Xbox (including those of partner companies).
For example, your gamertag and scores that show on game leaderboards are considered public and cannot be hidden. For other data, you can adjust your privacy settings on consoles and at
Xbox.com
to limit or block what is shared with the public or with friends.
Learn more at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
Xbox data shared with third parties including game and apps publishers
. When you use an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on your Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, the publisher of that game or app has access to data about your usage to help the publisher deliver, support, and improve its product. This data may include: your Xbox user identifier, gamertag, limited account info such as country and age range, data about your in-game communications, any Xbox enforcement activity, game-play sessions (for example, moves made in-game, types of vehicles used in-game), your presence on the Xbox network, the time you spend playing the game or app, rankings, statistics, gamer profiles, avatars, or gamerpics, friends lists, activity feeds for official clubs you belong to, official club memberships, and any content you create or submit in the game or app.
Third-party publishers and developers of games and apps have their own distinct and independent relationship with users and their collection and usage of personal data is subject to their specific privacy policies. You should carefully review their policies to determine how they use the data. For example, publishers may choose to disclose or display game data (such as on leaderboards) through their own services. You may find their policies linked from game or app detail pages in the Microsoft Store.
Learn more at
Data Sharing with Games and Apps
.
To stop sharing game or app data with a publisher, remove its games or app from all devices where you have installed them. Some publisher access to your data may be revoked at
https://microsoft.com/consent
.
Children and family
. If you have kids who want to use the Xbox network, you can set up child and teen profiles for them once they have Microsoft accounts. Adult organizers in your Microsoft family group can change consent choices and online safety settings for child and teen profiles on
Xbox.com
.
Learn more about Microsoft family groups at
Simplify your family’s life
.
Learn more about managing Xbox profiles, at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
For more information about Microsoft’s collection of data from children, including Xbox, please see the
Collection of data from children
section of this privacy statement.
Safety
. In order to help make the Xbox network a safe gaming environment and enforce the Community Standards for Xbox, we may collect and review voice, text, images, videos and in-game content (such as game clips you upload, conversations you have, and things you post in clubs and games).
Anti-cheat and fraud prevention
. Providing a fair gameplay environment is important to us. We prohibit cheating, hacking, account stealing, and any other unauthorized or fraudulent activity when you use an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on your Xbox console, PC, or mobile device. In order to detect and prevent fraud and cheating, we may use anti-cheat and fraud prevention tools, applications, and other technologies. Such technologies may create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) using certain information collected from your Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, and how you use that device. This can include information about the browser, device, activities, game identifiers, and operating system.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. This Xbox console collects limited required diagnostic data to keep your console functioning as expected while using a console connected to the Xbox network.
Kinect
. The Kinect sensor is a combination of camera, microphone, and infrared sensor that can enable motions and voice to be used to control gameplay. For example:
If you choose, the camera can be used to sign you in to the Xbox network automatically using facial recognition. This data stays on the console and is not shared with anyone, and you can choose to delete this data from your console at any time.
For game play, Kinect will map distances between your body's joints to create a stick figure representation of you that helps Kinect enable play.
The Kinect microphone can enable voice chat between players during play. The microphone also enables voice commands for control of the console, game, or app, or to enter search terms.
The Kinect sensor can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
Learn more about Kinect at
Xbox Kinect and Privacy
.
Back to top
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Store is an online service, accessible via PC, the Xbox Console and the Xbox App, that allows you to browse, download, purchase, rate, and review applications and other digital content. It includes:
Apps and content for Windows devices such as phones, PCs, and tablets.
Games, subscriptions and other apps for Xbox consoles and other devices.
Products and apps for Microsoft 365, SharePoint, Exchange, Access, and Project (2013 versions or later).
We collect data about how you access and use Microsoft Store; the products you've viewed, purchased, or installed; the preferences you set for viewing apps in Microsoft Store; and any ratings, reviews, or problem reports you submit. Your Microsoft account is associated with your ratings and reviews; and if you write a review, the name and picture from your Microsoft account will be published with your review. Microsoft Store uses the region configured on your device to show relevant and eligible content and merchandising. Microsoft Store uses your device identifier to manage product rights tied to a specific device.
Permission for Microsoft Store apps
. Many apps you install from the Microsoft Store are designed to take advantage of specific hardware and software features of your device. An app's use of certain hardware and software features may give the app or its related service access to your data. For example, a photo editing app might access your device's camera to let you take a new photo or access photos or videos stored on your device for editing, and a restaurant guide might use your location to provide nearby recommendations. Information about the features that an app uses is provided on the app's product description page in Microsoft Store. Many of the features that Microsoft Store apps use can be turned on or off through your device’s privacy settings. In Windows, in many cases, you can choose which apps can use a particular feature. Go to
Start > Settings > Privacy or Privacy & Security
, select the feature (for example, Calendar), and then select which app permissions are on or off. The lists of apps in Windows privacy settings that can use hardware and software features will not include "Classic Windows" applications, and these applications are not affected by these settings.
App updates
. Unless you have turned off automatic app updates in the relevant Microsoft Store settings or have acquired an app provided and updated by the app developer, Microsoft Store will automatically check for, download, and install app updates to verify that you have the latest versions. Updated apps might use different Windows hardware and software features from the previous versions, which could give them access to different data on your device. You will be prompted for consent if an updated app accesses certain features, such as location. You can also review the hardware and software features an app uses by viewing its product description page in Microsoft Store.
Each app's use of your data collected through any of these features is subject to the app developer's privacy policies. If an app available through Microsoft Store collects and uses any of your personal data, the app developer is required to provide a privacy policy, and a link to the privacy policy is available on the app's product description page in Microsoft Store.
Sideloaded apps and developer mode
. Developer features such as the "developer mode" setting are intended for development use only. If you enable developer features, your device may become unreliable or unusable, and expose you to security risks. Downloading or otherwise acquiring apps from sources other than Microsoft Store, also known as "sideloading" apps, may make your device and personal data more vulnerable to attack or unexpected use by apps. Windows policies, notifications, permissions, and other features intended to help protect your privacy when apps access your data may not function as described in this statement for sideloaded apps or when developer features are enabled.
Back to top
Microsoft Start
Microsoft Start (formerly known as MSN or Microsoft News) is a content service that includes news, weather, sports, and finance. The Microsoft Start app is available on various platforms, including iOS and Android. The Microsoft Start service is also included within other Microsoft services, including the Microsoft Edge browser and widgets on Windows.
When you install the Microsoft Start, MSN Weather, or Microsoft News apps, we collect data that tells us if the app was installed properly, the installation date, the app version, and other data about your device such as the operating system and browser. This data is collected on a regular basis to help us determine the number of app users and identify performance issues associated with different app versions, operating systems, and browsers. When you use the weather app, we use your location to provide you with relevant weather content.
We also collect data about how you interact with Microsoft Start content, such as usage frequency and articles viewed, to provide you with relevant content. Microsoft Start provides an enhanced experience when you sign in with your Microsoft account, including allowing you to customize your interests and favorites. We use your location to provide you with relevant content such as local weather and news. You can manage personalization through Microsoft Start and Bing settings, as well as through settings in other Microsoft services that include Microsoft Start services. We also use the data we collect to provide you with advertisements that may be of interest to you. You can opt out of interest-based advertising through the advertising links within Microsoft Start services, or by visiting the Microsoft
opt-out page
.
Previous versions of MSN Money allow you to access personal finance information from third-party financial institutions. MSN Money only displays this information and does not store it on our servers. Your sign-in credentials used to access your financial information from third parties are encrypted on your device and are not sent to Microsoft. These financial institutions, as well as any other third-party services you access through MSN services, are subject to their own terms and privacy policies.
Back to top
Silverlight
Microsoft Silverlight helps you to access and enjoy rich content on the Web. Silverlight enables websites and services to store data on your device. Other Silverlight features involve connecting to Microsoft to obtain updates, or to Microsoft or third-party servers to play protected digital content.
Silverlight Configuration tool
. You can make choices about these features in the Silverlight Configuration tool. To access the Silverlight Configuration tool, right click on content that is currently being displayed by Silverlight and select
Silverlight
. You can also run the Silverlight Configuration tool directly. In Windows, for example, you can access the tool by searching for "Microsoft Silverlight."
Silverlight application storage
. Silverlight-based applications can store data files locally on your computer for a variety of purposes, including saving your custom settings, storing large files for graphically intensive features (such as games, maps, and images), and storing content that you create within certain applications. You can turn off or configure application storage in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Silverlight updates
. Silverlight will periodically check a Microsoft server for updates to provide you with the latest features and improvements. A small file containing information about the latest Silverlight version will be downloaded to your computer and compared to your currently installed version. If a newer version is available, it will be downloaded and installed on your computer. You can turn off or configure updates in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Digital Rights Management
. Silverlight uses Microsoft Digital Rights Management (DRM) technology to help protect the rights of content owners. If you access DRM-protected content (such as music or video) with Silverlight, it will request media usage rights from a rights server on the Internet. In order to provide a seamless playback experience, you will not be prompted before Silverlight sends the request to the rights server. When requesting media usage rights, Silverlight will provide the rights server with an ID for the DRM-protected content file and basic data about your device, including data about the DRM components on your device such as their revision and security levels, and a unique identifier for your device.
DRM updates
. In some cases, accessing DRM-protected content will require an update to Silverlight or to the DRM components on your device. When you attempt to play content that requires a DRM update, Silverlight will send a request to a Microsoft server containing basic data about your device, including information about the DRM components on your computer such as their revision and security levels, troubleshooting data, and a unique identifier for your device. The Microsoft server uses this identifier to return a unique DRM update for your device, which will then be installed by Silverlight. You can turn off or configure DRM component updates on the
Playback
tab in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Back to top
Windows Mixed Reality
Windows Mixed Reality allows you to enable a virtual reality experience that immerses you in apps and games. Mixed Reality uses a compatible headset’s camera, microphone, and infrared sensors to enable motions and voice to be used to control gameplay and to navigate apps and games.
Microsoft collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Mixed Reality running on Windows up to date, secure, and operating properly. Diagnostic data also helps us improve Mixed Reality and related Microsoft products and services depending on the diagnostic data settings you’ve chosen for your device.
Learn more about Windows diagnostic data
.
Mixed Reality also processes and collects data specifically related to the Mixed Reality experiences, such as:
Mixed Reality maps distances between your body's joints to create a stick figure representation of you. If you are connected to the Internet, we collect those numeric values to enable and improve your experience.
Mixed Reality detects specific hand gestures intended to perform simple system interactions (such as menu navigation, pan/zoom, and scroll). This data is processed on your PC and is not stored.
The headset's microphones enable voice commands to control games, apps, or to enter search terms.
Learn more about voice data collection
.
Windows Mixed Reality can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Back To Top
Sub-policy 15
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/:
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Sign In
Sign Up
Back
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Trust Center
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Sovrn Legal
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
– Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
– Information We Collect
– How We Collect Information
– How We Use Information
– Our Information Sharing Practices
– How To Opt Out
– Children’s Privacy
– Retention of Personal Information
– Security
– Country and US State Specific Disclosures
– Changes in this Privacy Policy
– Contact Us
– Revision Log
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Privacy Policy
Last Updated November 18, 2022
Effective Date: December 19, 2023
Sovrn provides data and monetization tools to our customers that allow for revenue generation through digital advertising, affiliate network marketing and commercial data products. We believe in transparency and respecting consumer choice as a foundation of trust, so we have crafted this Privacy Policy to help you understand how we handle Personal Information, and your privacy choices.
Our products are used on websites and other internet-connected services (such as smart TV’s and mobile devices). A more in-depth description of our Services can be found at our
Publisher Products
site.
This
“Privacy Policy”
describes how Sovrn collects, uses, and shares personal information in connection with (i) Sovrn Services; and (ii) our public-facing business websites found at
www.sovrn.com
and other websites that we own and operate that link to this Privacy Policy (collectively, the
“Site”
).
If unsure about any of the information provided, please reach out to privacy@sovrn.com.
Definition of Terms
Throughout this Privacy Policy, we use some phrases that are unique to our business or the technology underlying our Services or may just be new to you. The following are definitions of some of the key terms that you’ll need to know to make it easier to understand this Privacy Policy:
“Advertiser”
means an entity providing ads to be placed on Publisher websites.
“Interest-Based Advertising”
is an umbrella term used throughout this Privacy Policy to indicate cross-device targeting, targeted advertising, cross-contextual behavioral advertising, and similar activities related to the use of profiles to understand the browsing and/or purchasing behaviors of consumers.  For more information, please see the
BBB National Programs
site.
“Non-Personal Information”
means information that is not associated with or linked to Personal Information including aggregate or de-identified information.
“Personal Information”
means any information that can be used to directly or indirectly identify a natural person, such as contact information (i.e., name, address, e-mail address, and/or phone number), and/or information that uniquely and persistently identifies a browser or device, such as an IP address, mobile advertising identifier, unique online  identifiers, email address that has been hashed to generate an alphanumeric identifier, or combination of information about a browser or device (such as IP address and browser type/settings).
“Publishers”
are websites or publications that use Sovrn Services, or natural persons who interact with Sovrn on behalf of such websites or publications.  Publishers are also Sovrn customers.
“Readers”
are individuals who visit our Publishers’ websites or the Site.
“Sovrn”
or
“we,” “us,”
or
“our”
means Sovrn, Inc. with our affiliates (including those not under the Sovrn brand).
Description of Sovrn Services
The Sovrn Services that collect information from Readers are
Exchange and Ad Management for
Interest-based Advertising
;
Commerce for affiliate network marketing, shopping galleries and price comparisons; and
Signal for viewer engagement metrics.
Sovrn is a data broker, allowing us to provide commercial data products (
“Data”
) to our customers, which are also part of the Services. As a data broker we may share your Personal Information with other parties for our commercial interests. Please refer to “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” for more information related to specific privacy rights related to disclosures through our data brokerage.
In order to provide the Services, we collect Personal Information from our Publishers as described in our Publisher contractual agreements, and this Privacy Policy.
Please note that the Services may contain links to websites or content operated and maintained by third parties over which we have no control. We encourage review of the privacy policies of such third-party websites and content before disclosing any information to them.
In addition to the Services, Sovrn collects Personal Information through interactions with the Site. By visiting or submitting Personal Information through the Site, you acknowledge the processing of your Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
Sovrn supports industry self-regulatory principles and endorses industry recognized practices and self-regulatory standards.
Sovrn follows and adheres to the industry Self-Regulatory Principles of the
Digital Advertising Alliance
(“DAA”).
Sovrn also adheres to the
Interactive Advertising Bureau
(“IAB”) Code of Conduct, and actively participates in the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
(TCF 2.0). We comply with IAB’s Specifications and Policies under vendor identification number 13.
For more information about industry self-regulation of Interest-Based Advertising, please visit:
www.networkadvertising.org
and
www.aboutads.info
.
Information We Collect
The information we collect allows us to see browsing habits at an individual device level, but we do not attempt to identify the exact individual who is browsing. Here we outline the types of information used in Interest-Based Advertising, as well as what to expect when visiting our Site.
Sovrn Services and Site collects both Personal Information and Non-Personal Information. Sovrn does not collect personally identifiable information (
“PII”
) about Readers that could directly identify them to Sovrn, such as names, surnames, plain-text email addresses, physical addresses, or phone numbers, unless provided to us through the Site when requesting materials or information from us. For clarity, none of the information collected through the Site is used in our commercial Data products.
The following provides more detail into the types of Personal Information we may collect (and in some instances purchase from partners) and use in conjunction with the Sovrn Services and Site:
Identifier
Description
Used by
Cookie ID
A randomly generated identifier (including those created by Sovrn) that is stored on a browser and allows us to understand Reader browsing behavior, without knowing the exact identity of the individual. Also known as a third-party cookie.
All Services and Site
Connected television identifier (CTV ID)
Examples of connected televisions (CTV) include Xbox, PlayStation, Roku, Amazon Fire TV, Apple TV, and devices provided by manufacturers such as Samsung and Vizio. A CTV ID is a unique identifier that is generated by the CTV and is used for various purposes, including Interest-Based Advertising.
Exchange
Device information
Device information can include your browser agent, browser type, operating system, device type, use of ad blocking tools, and information about the possible relationships among different browsers and devices.
All Services and Site
Hashed email
Hashing is a way of making a piece of data, like an email address, into a hexadecimal string so that it is no longer readable. Each email address has its own unique hexadecimal string that remains consistent no matter where the email address is used.
Ad Management and Signal (collect); Data (procure)
IP address
An Internet Protocol address (IP address) is a numerical label assigned by an Internet Service Provider (ISP) to each device connected to a computer network that allows the device to communicate on the Internet. Most IP addresses are dynamic, meaning they change every time the device is restarted.  IP addresses allow us to infer your general location in order to help us understand your data rights.
All Services and Site
Mobile advertising ID
Mobile advertising IDs are provided by the mobile device’s operating system, and can be reset by users. Typical advertising IDs are AAID/GAID (Android) and IDFA (Apple). Mobile advertising IDs allow developers and marketers to track activity associated with a specific device for targeted advertising purposes.
Exchange (collect) and Data (procure)
Personally Identifiable Information (“PII”)
Personal Information that directly identifies an individual such as name, surname and email address. PII may be required for some inquiries through the Site. Sovrn will only collect PII you voluntarily provide.
Site
Unique online identifier
An identifier created by our Publishers to understand an individual’s browsing behavior on their own site, as well as across different websites. These identifiers are shared with Sovrn to help us understand the preferences of individuals so that we can provide our targeted advertising services.
All Services and Site
Voice Recordings
When our customers interact with Sovrn through virtual meetings or by telephone, we may record the call to assist with taking notes and for internal training purposes
Sovrn Sales and Support Teams
How We Collect Information
Sovrn uses various technologies to collect both Personal- and Non-Personal Information, such as cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels, or scripts. We also collect information voluntarily provided through our Site. The term ‘cookies’ is used as an umbrella term for these technologies; for convenience, these technologies are collectively referred to in this Privacy Policy as “cookies.”
Both session cookies (which expire once the web browser is closed) and persistent cookies (which stay on a device until deleted or expire) are used to collect viewing and search behaviors by both Sovrn Services and the Site. For more information about how cookies are used or what information we collect, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Through our Site
We collect Personal Information submitted to us voluntarily, such as name and contact information. For example, when signing up to receive our newsletter or to participate in a webinar we collect your email address. When contacting us via email, we will collect the email contents.
Through Sovrn Services
The information we gather about browsing preferences and purchasing behaviors using cookies helps us provide Sovrn Services to our Publishers, which in turn provides meaningful Interest-based Advertising to Readers.
Readers
.
We set cookies (where allowed) at the first visit to any of the Publisher sites that deploy Sovrn Services. If our cookie is already set on a browser, we recognize a returning Reader and log data using the existing cookie. Readers have the option to use tools provided by browsers to decline to receive cookies or to clear cookies, which will result in us treating the Reader as a new visitor when encountering Sovrn Services. However, in order to stop Interest-based Advertising by Sovrn, individuals must explicitly opt-out as described in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section.
Some of our business partners (for example, Google Analytics) may set or use their own cookies on our Publisher websites or through Sovrn Services where Sovrn has no access to or control over these cookies. Specific to Google Analytics, opt-out by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
Publishers
.
Publishers provide Personal Information about themselves when registering to use Sovrn Services. Alternatively, Publishers may register for Sovrn Services using an existing Google account, in which case Sovrn will receive Personal Information from Google as defined by Google’s privacy policy. Personal Information collected at registration may include: a valid email address, username and password, first and last name, telephone number, website(s) URLs, software, mobile applications, log-in IP address(es), physical address, ZIP code, and country of residence for the Publisher contact.
When using the Sovrn Platform to manage your account, we will also set cookies that allow us to remember your preferences, as well as to collect analytics about how our customers are interacting with the service.
We collect Publisher payment information from those who purchase Sovrn Services. Sovrn provides a third-party service to manage revenue payments to Publishers. This service also provides transactional information to Sovrn for financial reporting purposes.
We may also collect and categorize information about the content on Publisher pages integrated with Sovrn Services and link this information to Personal Information collected through the delivery of Sovrn Services.
Publishers may choose not to provide us with certain Personal Information, but this may limit the features of the Sovrn Services available for use.
Through Internet-Connected Technology
As Publishers use the Sovrn Services or Readers access or use digital properties within the Sovrn Publisher network (including websites or applications on internet-connected technology, such as computers, mobile devices, or internet-connected televisions), we may also collect web viewing and search activities across non-affiliated websites (including websites accessed through your television), directly through content viewed on an internet-connected television, and mobile applications (
“apps”
) over time (also known as cross-device tracking). This information may be linked to Personal Information that identifies a browser or device, typically through cookies or tracking pixels/web beacons.
Sovrn may store cookies on your device in order to:
For Publishers, to allow you to use and access secure areas of Sovrn Services. Without these cookies, it may not be possible to load or offer key functionalities, such as logging in to your account, displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For both Publishers and Readers, for statistical purposes and to analyze and improve the use and performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, and to do the same for our Publishers’ websites. We also use cookies for a better online experience, as cookies allow us to load or offer key functionalities on our Site, such as displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For Readers, to support Sovrn Services, such as for our analytics and data services and to provide Readers with Interest-based Advertising, including through Google’s Exchange Bidding service, and the ability to opt out of such advertising, all as further described in this Privacy Policy. We also use cookies for social media and multimedia functionalities, where videos and other media often rely on cookies to function correctly. In addition, social media platforms such as Facebook and X can use cookies to see if you are logged in and enable you to “like” content or send it to your friends. When you use these features, such third-party companies can collect information from you. Depending on your settings, these external parties may also use such information for advertising purposes. If you would like to know more about this, please refer to the respective privacy policies of these third parties.
In some instances, our business partners link the information we gather through cookies to device identifiers associated with the same Reader (also known as cross-device mapping). They will then share the cross-device mapping or other user data with us, for the purpose of Interest-based Advertising.
We may also use web beacons or “pixels” to collect Personal Information, which are electronic images that may be used on website(s) (including Publisher websites and the Site) or in emails sent in Publisher campaigns or from Sovrn directly. We use tracking pixels to, for example, collect hashed emails, sync unique online identifiers, deliver cookies, count visits, understand usage and effectiveness of offers, and tell whether an email has been opened and acted upon.
In addition, we may use session replay technologies for certain automatic data collection from Publishers on the Sovrn Platform. Session replay technology is third-party software used to record a replay of users’ interactions on the Sovrn Platform (such as to troubleshoot how a Publisher interacts with our dashboard). The replay may include users’ clicks, mouse movements, scrolls, mobile app touches, typing, and other activity taken during the session. We use these replays for research and development purposes, such as to help us troubleshoot problems with the Sovrn Services, understand how Publishers interact with and use the Sovrn Services, and identify areas for improvement.
Information from Third-Party Sources
We may receive Personal- and Non-Personal Information about you from other sources and combine it with the information that we collect through Sovrn Services or the Site. Sources may include information conveyed to us by telephone, information that we receive from third-party data providers, or information provided to us by third parties through the Sovrn Publisher network.
When Publishers contact Sovrn by telephone or virtual meeting, we use a third-party service to record the call (with your consent) to assist in documentation and for training purposes.  For clarity, we will only record those actively in the call; if there are others in the vicinity, it is our expectation that they are not recorded unintentionally, unless this Privacy Policy has been provided and their approval to the recording has been obtained.
How We Use Information
We use Personal- and Non-Personal Information to support our commercial interests (Interest-based Advertising, affiliate network marketing, and Data), internal business operations (such as improving the Services, fraud prevention and security), and business intelligence.
Commercial Interests
Commercial interests are activities that allow Sovrn and/or our customers and business partners (such partners include data services and data resellers) to earn revenue and include, for example:
Serving Interest-based Advertising to Readers on behalf of our Publishers and supporting third parties’ Interest-Based Advertising activities. Options for opting-out of such advertising may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Providing Sovrn Services, or any other materials requested through the Site (such as electronic newsletters or promotional emails) to Publishers. Options for opting-out of Sovrn marketing may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Creating audience segments* by categorizing Personal Information we have collected by common interests, intent or other characteristics (for clarity, PII is not used for this purpose).  Audience segments are used to provide additional insights, enrichment of our Publisher’s first party data, and to attribute reader interests to browsers and devices to better inform advertising campaigns.
Specific to Sovrn Commerce, we will use Personal Information to optimize links, determine the best merchant destination for clicks, and set the appropriate language and region for click destinations.
We may use Publisher contact information to invite you to take part in market research.
* We do not use Personal Information to derive audience segments that could be defined as ‘sensitive’ or ‘special categories’ under various data privacy laws and regulations.  Please visit Sovrn’s
Audience Segments
page for more information.
Internal Business Operations
Internal business operations are activities that allow us to meet obligations to Publishers, Readers, and third-party partners (including regulatory bodies). Internal business operations do not directly benefit any one person or entity, and include, for example:
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality of our products, content, services and websites.
Improve and protect our products, content, services and websites, to the extent the use of the Personal Information is reasonably necessary and proportionate for these purposes.
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying Publisher information, processing payments, or providing analytic services.
Monitoring any Publisher account to prevent, investigate and/or report fraud, terrorism, misrepresentation, security incidents or crime, in accordance with applicable law.
Compliance with applicable laws and to protect Sovrn’s legitimate business interests and legal rights, including, but not limited to, use in connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory, investigative purposes (including disclosure of such information in connection with law enforcement requests, legal process or litigation), protecting our and others’ rights, privacy, safety, or property, and enforcing our agreements.
Responding to comments or complaints or sending service-related communications.
Business Intelligence
Business intelligence allows us to analyze and report on the performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, as that performance relates to Publisher or Sovrn campaigns, and includes:
Monitoring the use of Sovrn Services to support Publisher analytics and reporting.
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration.
Performing Analytical Analysis. We work with third parties that collect data about Reader use of the Site and other websites or online services over time for non-advertising purposes. For example, we use Google Analytics and other third-party services to improve the performance of Sovrn Services and for analytics and marketing purposes. For more information about how Google Analytics collects and uses data,  visit
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Opt-out of Google Analytics by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
.
A Note on Non-Personal Information
We may collect Non-Personal Information through Sovrn Services or we may create Non-Personal Information from Personal Information by removing identifying information (such as email address or device identifiers).
We may use Non-Personal Information for a variety of purposes to operate and improve the Sovrn Services, such as functional testing, analyzing usage patterns, market research, data analysis (including in support of Interest-Based Advertising), and developing new products.
We may also use Non-Personal Information on Readers’ activities collected from Publisher websites (such as page views, use of ad blocking technology, and search queries) to provide aggregate information to Publishers so that they can improve their content and optimize advertising revenue.
We may use and disclose Non-Personal Information for any purpose in our discretion, to the extent permitted under applicable law. If we are required to treat Non-Personal Information as Personal Information under applicable law, then we may use or disclose it for all the purposes for which we use and disclose Personal Information.
Our Information Sharing Practices
Sovrn shares the Personal Information collected through our Services, procured through our data partners, or our Site with the following third parties and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy:
Affiliates
: Sovrn may share some or all Reader Personal Information with our Affiliates (i.e. companies which are under common control, such as subsidiaries or joint ventures), in which case we will require our Affiliates to honor this Privacy Policy in all material respects.  Please reference the
Sovrn Careers
page to view our affiliate locations.
Business Transitions
: In the event Sovrn goes through a business transition such as a merger, acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of its assets including in bankruptcy, Personal Information may be among the assets transferred.
Law Enforcement, Government Authorities, and Private Parties
: We may disclose Personal Information if we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary to (a) comply with relevant laws or to respond to subpoenas or warrants served on us; (b) to protect and defend the rights or property of Sovrn, Publishers, or third parties; or (c) for the other compliance, fraud prevention, and safety purposes described in this Privacy Policy.  Please see our
Law Enforcement Request Policy
for the requirements applicable to law enforcement requests.
Publishers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to Publishers and their service providers to provide the Sovrn Services, such as measuring the effectiveness of advertising, advertising attribution, and preventing advertising fraud, or to indicate Reader preferences for Interest-Based Advertising.
Other Third-Party Customers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to our third-party customers that include, for example, other advertising services and data enrichment services, who will use and disclose the information for their own purposes. We may also share Non-Personal Information such as aggregated reports derived in part from the information we have collected. The information we share may also be combined with third-party data to provide an even broader service to our customers. Please see
How to Opt-Out
for more information on choices related to this practice.
Service Providers
: We may provide Personal Information to third-party service providers (sub-/processors) who work on behalf of or with us to provide the Sovrn Services including to help us communicate with you. Examples of such services include our ability to send email, perform data analysis, provide marketing assistance, process payments (including credit card payments, through a third-party service), and provide customer service. For a list of our Service Providers, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/legal/subprocessors/
Advertising Partners:
We may share your Personal Information with third parties that we partner with to engage in Interest-Based Advertising, including through the use of cookies and similar technologies. These third party advertising companies may collect information about your activity over time through the Services and across other online services to serve you advertisements. For a list of our Advertising Partners, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/third-parties/
.
Professional Advisors
: We may share Personal Information with persons, companies, or professional firms providing Sovrn with advice and consulting in accounting, administrative, legal, tax, financial, debt collection, and other matters.
How To Opt Out
Sovrn supports various opt-out mechanisms, where each option provides different results related to cross-device tracking and targeted advertising. While using these mechanisms may prevent Interest-based Advertising or the sale of your Personal Information, there are no mechanisms for preventing advertising altogether.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising
Just as there are different mechanisms for providing Interest-based Advertising (such as through a web browser, apps on your mobile device and connected televisions), there are multiple ways you can limit the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes and the sale or sharing of your personal information.
To simplify the management of Interest-based Advertising preferences, Sovrn participates in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
AdChoices program
that allows a user to manage their Interest-based Advertising preferences on their browser(s) or device(s) across all participating DAA members.
For more information on how to opt-out of the sale or sharing of personal information, please see the section, “
Your California Privacy Rights
” located in the “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” section, below or our webform found in the
Privacy Center
.
Cookies and Unique Online Identifiers Used by Web Browsers
Your opt-out choice will apply to the browser or device where you make the choice. This means that Sovrn will not deliver Interest-based Advertising to this browser or device and we will not otherwise use or transfer data collected on this browser or device for Interest-based Advertising.
Readers who wish to opt out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from a browser for Interest-based Advertising purposes can visit
https://www.aboutads.info/
to learn more about Interest-based Advertising.  There, you may also access the
DAA WebChoices
tool for managing preferences on web browsers, and to exercise opt-out choice with respect to Sovrn and other companies participating in the DAA’s self-regulatory program.
Identifiers used by connected TVs and mobile devices / apps
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from apps on a mobile device for Interest-based Advertising purposes can download the
DAA’s AppChoices
application to manage preferences on mobile platforms like Android or Apple iOS devices.  More information on your options for opting out of targeted advertising provided through your connected television streaming devices can be found on the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
site.
When using DAA’s opt-out tools, choice will be effective only on the browser or device where choice has been exercised. If using a different device or browser, the opt-out choice(s) will need to be renewed for the new device or browser. Our opt-out tool for browsers is cookie-based, so that an opt-out choice can only be honored if a browser is set to accept third-party cookies. If the opt-out cookie is deleted, then the opt-out choice(s) must be renewed.
Opting out of Interest-based Advertising prevents the collection of Personal Information but does not prevent data collection of Non-Personal Information.  We may continue to collect, use and transfer such Non-Personal Information for other purposes such as contextual advertising based on a current visit to a website, fraud prevention, or improving site performance.
Opting out also will not stop advertising from appearing in a browser. After opting-out, Readers may receive advertising from Sovrn Services when visiting websites of a Publisher who uses our Services, but that advertising will not be interest-based. After opting out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising, Readers may also continue to receive Interest-based Advertising through other companies.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Affiliate Network Marketing
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn Commerce collection, use, or transfer of Personal Information from the websites you visit, the links you click, or the merchants you make purchases from, visit our
Privacy Center
and choose ‘Disable Tracking.’
Opting out of Sovrn Commerce cookies means that Sovrn Commerce will stop placing cookies on your device when you browse Sovrn Commerce enabled websites and/or links.
To honor your opt-out choice, we need to place a cookie on your device so that we know not to track your activity. Clearing your browser’s cache or cookies will remove this cookie, and you will be required to opt-out of tracking again. Similarly, if you access sites that use Sovrn Commerce from a different browser or device than the browser or device on which you opted-out of tracking, you will be required to opt-out again.
Opting Out of Sovrn Marketing
Unsubscribe instructions will accompany each promotional email we send. Alternatively, contact us directly to change promotional email preferences at marketing@sovrn[.]com.
Regardless of your promotional communication preferences, we will send Publishers messages related to our business relationship or transactions.
For any questions regarding a Sovrn Publisher account, please contact support@sovrn[.]com.
Advertising Choices on the Site
Some of the Advertising Partners that collect data on the Site to help us advertise the Sovrn Services and our business may also participate in the DAA and/or may be members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). You can obtain more information about these companies’ information collection practices, and opt-out of receiving interest-based advertising from participating NAI and DAA members, at the
NAI’s website
or the
DAA’s website
. You can also limit collection of your information for Interest-Based Advertising by blocking third party cookies in your browser settings or using privacy plug-ins or ad blocking software that help you block third party cookies.
Many of the opt-out preferences described in this section must be set on each device and/or browser for which you want them to apply. Please note that some of the Advertising Partners we work with may not participate in the opt-out mechanisms described above, so even after opting-out, you may still receive Interest-Based Advertising from other companies. If you opt-out of Interest-Based Advertising, you will still see advertisements online but they may be less relevant to you.
Children’s Privacy
Sovrn does not knowingly collect Personal Information from or direct Sovrn Services to children under the age of 16.
If you are not 16 years old, please do not use the Site. Do not submit your name, email address, or other personal information using our web forms.
As operators of their own websites and content, our Publishers are solely responsible for compliance with law related to the collection and use of information from children under the age of 16. If, during routine review, Sovrn believes children under the age of 16 have submitted their personal information into our web forms or our customer’s websites, we will, in our sole discretion, delete the information believed to belong to those under 16 years old.
Retention of Personal Information
We will retain Personal Information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose of collection, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements, to establish and defend legal claims, for fraud prevention purposes, or as long as required to meet our legal obligations. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
Security
Sovrn has put in place commercially reasonable physical, electronic, and managerial procedures to safeguard and secure the Personal Information we collect; however, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure. As a result, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your Personal Information. For more information, please visit
Sovrn’s Security
page.
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
Various data privacy laws require specific disclosures regarding the collection and use of your Personal Information. These disclosures are meant to supplement, and are consistent with, the practices described in this Privacy Policy.
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights
This section applies only to individuals located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland or the United Kingdom (“Applicable Countries”) and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy. It describes certain rights and protections under applicable law regarding the processing of Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given to “personal data” governed by the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Role of Sovrn as a Controller or Processor
If located in one of the Applicable Countries, Sovrn may act as a “controller” as defined under applicable law when processing Personal Information. Sovrn may also act as a “processor” as defined under applicable law to the extent that we process Personal Information on behalf of and at the instruction of another party, for example a Sovrn customer.
Legal Basis for Processing
Sovrn’s legal basis for processing Personal Information depends upon the specific context in which it is collected or used. In some cases, we rely on data subject consent (as defined under applicable law) to process Personal Information for Interest-Based Advertising, which we require Publishers using Sovrn Services to obtain on our behalf. In other cases, we may rely on our legitimate interests to collect and use Personal Information, except where our interests are overridden by data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. For example, we will also process Personal Information collected from Interest-Based Advertising in order to improve the Sovrn Services for our Publishers where permitted by law. Our legitimate interests are described in greater detail in the “
How We Use Information
” section of this Privacy Policy. These legitimate interests include the operation of our business and the provision of Sovrn Services to our Publishers as required by our agreements with them.
Additionally, we may have a legal obligation to process Personal Information (such as for fraud prevention).
Exercising Data Subject Rights
Individuals may be entitled to exercise certain data subject rights available under applicable laws. These rights may include the right to request access to Personal Information we hold. Individuals may also have the right to object to, or request that we restrict, processing of Personal Information, such as profiling we perform for the purposes of direct marketing and interest-based advertising. Individuals may also have the right to ask that your Personal Information be corrected, erased, or transferred to another party. Where we have asked for consent to process data, consent may be withdrawn.
Anyone afforded any of these rights may exercise them by visiting our
Privacy Center
, or by contacting privacy@sovrn[.]com.
These rights may be limited in some situations–for example, where we can demonstrate that we have a legal requirement to process data. In some instances, this may mean that we are able to retain data even if consent is withdrawn. In other instances, we may provide the requested information with some portions redacted in order to adhere to obligations of confidentiality to others.
Where we require Personal Information to comply with legal or contractual obligations, provision of Personal Information is mandatory; in all other cases, provision of requested Personal Information is optional.
Data Transfers
Sovrn is a global company headquartered in Boulder, Colorado (USA), with data centers located in the United States and Europe. By visiting Publisher’s sites who are using Sovrn Services, Personal Information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our affiliates, and by those third parties with whom we may share your information, some of which are located outside of the Applicable Countries.
These countries (including the United States) may have data protection or other laws that differ from those in the Applicable Countries. We ensure that where Sovrn or third-party service providers receive Personal Information outside of the Applicable Countries, appropriate safeguards are in place under the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Sovrn may be required to disclose Personal Information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. Such requests are subject to Sovrn’s
Law Enforcement Request Policy
.
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
Sovrn is registered as a vendor with, and supports and encourages our clients to use, the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
(the “IAB Industry Framework”) to provide data subjects with dynamic transparency into and choice about the various vendors our clients use to serve ads, including Sovrn Services. When visiting a website, the IAB Industry Framework is designed to allow a Publisher the means to choose which registered vendors they wish to allow to access a device and process Personal Information, and provide dynamic transparency and choice about each of these vendors (either an opportunity for an individual to consent to the vendor, or opt out of data processing by the vendor, depending on that vendor’s legal basis and processing activities).
Questions or Complaints
Individuals located in one of the Applicable Countries who have questions or concerns about how we process Personal Information may contact our Data Protection Officer at dpo@sovrn.com. If we are not able to resolve the issue, individuals have the right to lodge a complaint with their local data privacy authority. For contact details of local Data Protection Authorities, please visit the
European Data Protection Board member list
or the
UK data protection regulator
.
IT Governance Europe Limited acts as our EU representative. If you wish to exercise your rights under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (EU GDPR) or have any queries in relation to your rights or general privacy matters, please email
eurep@itgovernance.eu
. Please ensure to include our company name (“Sovrn”) in any correspondence.
Notice to California Residents: Your Privacy Choices
This section applies only to California residents and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy.  It describes how we collect, use, sell, share, and retain Personal Information of California residents, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given in the California privacy laws but does not include information exempted from the scope of those laws.
Personal Information We Collect and Purposes of Collection and Use
Personal Information we collect (or have collected in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy) about California residents are listed below by reference to the categories specified under California privacy law. Examples in the list refer to the types of Personal Information described above in this Privacy Policy.
Identifiers
, such as cookie ID, unique online identifiers, device information, hashed email, IP address, connected television ID, and mobile advertising ID.
Customer Records
, such as Publisher PII and payment information.
Commercial information
, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered.
Internet or Network Activity
, such as browsing history, search history, and interactions with a website, email, application, or advertisement.
Inferences
drawn from the Personal Information identified above to create a profile reflecting preferences, characteristics or behavior.
We may collect these categories of Personal Information directly from you and from your device as you visit our Site or Publisher sites in our network subscribing to Sovrn Services, or from other third parties as further described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Collect Information.”
The purposes, including the specific business and commercial purposes, for which we collect and use these categories of Personal Information are described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Use Personal Information.”
To the extent that we may collect any sensitive Personal Information (as defined under California privacy law), such as to provide account management for our Publishers, we only use or disclose it for purposes permitted under California law (i.e., to perform the Sovrn Services, process customer transactions, detect security incidents and prevent fraud, or to verify and maintain the quality of the Services). We do not collect or use sensitive personal information for the purpose of inferring characteristics about California residents.
We retain each of the categories of Personal Information listed above as described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“Retention of Personal Data.”
Personal Information “Sold,” “Shared” or Disclosed for Business Purposes
“Sale” is defined under California privacy law as disclosing a California resident’s Personal Information to a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration.  Where such disclosure is for cross-context behavioral advertising, whether or not for monetary or other valuable consideration, it qualifies as “sharing” under California privacy law.
The following table describes the categories of Personal Information “sold” or “shared” for our commercial purposes to each of the categories of third parties listed, and includes our practices in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy.
Each category of Personal Information listed in the following table may also have been disclosed for our business purposes (such as for internal use and business intelligence), and have in the preceding 12 months been disclosed, to each of the categories of third parties listed.
The categories of third parties listed, along with our business and commercial purposes for which we “sold,” “shared” or disclosed Personal Information, are described in this Privacy Policy under
“Our Information Sharing Practices”
within the section titled,
“How We Use Information.”
Category of Personal Information
To whom the category of Personal Information is “sold” or “shared”
Identifiers
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Customer Records
N/A
Commercial Information
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Internet or Network Activity
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Inferences
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
For clarity, Personal Information collected through Sovrn Services, from third parties,  or Internet Connected Technology, (and where Sovrn has a license to further disclose Personal Information to third parties) is included in our commercial Data and “sold” or “shared.” Publisher Personal Information provided for account management is not “sold” or “shared” as defined under California privacy law.
California consumers may request to
opt-out of the sale or sharing
of their Personal Information at any time. Please see “Your California Privacy Rights” below for more information.
Sovrn does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, in addition to the rights described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, you have the privacy rights listed below.  However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may not be able to respond to your request, such as when a legal exemption applies or if we are not able to verify your identity.
Know/Access
. You can request the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information:
– The categories of Personal Information that we have collected.
– The categories of sources from which we collected Personal Information.
– The business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” Personal Information.
– The categories of third parties with whom we disclose Personal Information.
– A copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Delete
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correct
. You can ask us to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we maintain about you.
Opt-out of sales/sharing
. If we “sell” or “share” your Personal Information, you can opt-out.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above without receiving discriminatory treatment.
You may request to exercise the California privacy rights described above as follows:
Right to know/access, delete, or correct
. You can request to exercise your access, deletion, or correction rights by:
– Visiting our Privacy Center and completing the
data rights request webform
;
– Emailing privacy@sovrn[.]com – Please put the statement “CCPA Consumer Request” in the subject line; or
– Calling +1 (888) 280-8085.
Right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information
. You can request to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information by clicking here:
Your Privacy Choices
and completing the webform or broadcasting the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal through your browser settings.
– Our Services will honor the GPC signal you broadcast so that the Personal Information that you provide to the Publishers using our Services will be opted-out from “sales” or “sharing.”
– Note that due to technological limitations, if you visit our Services or the Site from a different computer or device, or clear cookies on your browser that store your preferences, you will need to return to the
Your Privacy Choices
page to re-submit your preferences.
– If you direct us not to sell/share your Personal Information, we will consider it a request pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to stop sharing your Personal Information covered by that law with third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
Please visit our
CCPA Metrics page
for details around the type of data rights requests received during the previous calendar year.
Verification Process and Required Information
We reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and will need to confirm your identity to process your requests to exercise your right to know/access, delete, and correct. This is a security measure to, for example, help ensure we do not disclose information to a person who is not entitled to receive it. The identity verification process may vary depending on how you submit your request. We will only ask for information needed to verify your identity, such as a different email address, or cookie ID.
Authorized Agent
Consistent with California law, you may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf. If you do so, we may require proof of your identification, the authorized agent’s proof of identification, and any other information that we may request in order to verify the request, including evidence of valid permission for the authorized agent to act on your behalf. We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it. Authorized agents may submit a request through our
Privacy Center
, where instructions are provided for completing the request.
Fees
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal information (or to exercise any of the other rights).  However, we may charge a reasonable fee or decline to comply with your request if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive, or excessive.
Changes in this Privacy Policy
We may modify or amend this Privacy Policy from time to time at our discretion. When we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will amend the revision date at the top of this page and such modified or amended Privacy Policy shall be effective as to the Personal Information governed by this Privacy Policy as of that revision date. We encourage periodic review of this Privacy Policy to view any updates, as well as the revision log found at the end of this page.
Contact Us
Please contact us at privacy@sovrn[.]com with questions or concerns regarding our Privacy Policy or how we process your Personal Information.
Sovrn will respond in good faith to all privacy inquiries but may not be able to provide complete information if the request requires Sovrn to release confidential information of third parties, or otherwise imposes an undue burden or expense.
Sovrn U.S. Headquarters
1600 Pearl St
Second Floor
Boulder, CO 80302
United States
Sovrn U.K. Headquarters
53, 64 Chancery Ln,
London WC2A 1QU
United Kingdom
Sovrn Switzerland, S.A.
Via Cantonale 19, CH-
6900 Lugano
Switzerland
Revision Log
Section
Revision summary
Version
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Removed information related to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Dec. 2023
Information We Collect
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose the collection of voice recordings to support Publisher Sales and Support teams
Sep. 2023
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights; Contacts
Updated semantics for readability; updated Sovrn UK, Limited address
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Apr. 2023
Throughout
Updated Privacy Policy for required disclosures under new US state privacy laws in effect Jan 1 2023, and for general readability
Jan. 2023
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Added information related to our integration with the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Aug. 2022
Throughout
Revised email addresses throughout to reduce spam
Aug. 2022
Exercising California Consumer Rights
Replaced toll-free number with new toll-free number
Aug. 2022
Entire Policy
Consolidated Website and Service Privacy Policies, reordered sections, and updated internal links.
Apr. 2021
Information We Collect
Added ‘Universal ID’ to the list of Personal Information types
Apr. 2021
Personal Data Rights (throughout)
Separation of UK from EU personal data rights as a result of the enactment of the UK GDPR
Feb. 2021
Personal Data Rights: Questions or Complaints
Addition of EU representative as a result of the UK’s exit from the EU
Feb. 2021
Revision Log
New section added for clarity of changes over time
Feb. 2021
We use cookies on our website to give you the most relevant experience by remembering your preferences and repeat visits. By clicking “Accept”, you consent to the use of ALL the cookies, but may change your preferences by clicking “Cookie settings". For more information, please visit our
Privacy Policy
.
Cookie settings
Manage cookie consent
Close
Privacy Overview
This website uses cookies to improve your experience while you navigate through the website. Out of these cookies, the cookies that are categorized as necessary are stored on your browser as they are essential for the working of basic functionalities...
Necessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. These cookies ensure basic functionalities and security features of the website, anonymously.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hssrc
session
This cookie is set by Hubspot whenever it changes the session cookie. The __hssrc cookie set to 1 indicates that the user has restarted the browser, and if the cookie does not exist, it is assumed to be a new session.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-advertisement
1 year
Set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin, this cookie is used to record the user consent for the cookies in the "Advertisement" category .
cookielawinfo-checkbox-analytics
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Analytics".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-functional
11 months
The cookie is set by GDPR cookie consent to record the user consent for the cookies in the category "Functional".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-necessary
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookies is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Necessary".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-others
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Other.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-performance
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Performance".
csrftoken
1 year
This cookie is associated with Django web development platform for python. Used to help protect the website against Cross-Site Request Forgery attacks
viewed_cookie_policy
11 months
The cookie is set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin and is used to store whether or not user has consented to the use of cookies. It does not store any personal data.
Functional cookies help to perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collect feedbacks, and other third-party features.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__cf_bm
30 minutes
This cookie, set by Cloudflare, is used to support Cloudflare Bot Management.
__hssc
30 minutes
HubSpot sets this cookie to keep track of sessions and to determine if HubSpot should increment the session number and timestamps in the __hstc cookie.
_auth
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_referrer
past
This cookie is set by Pinterest to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_sess
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_routing_id
session
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
bcookie
2 years
LinkedIn sets this cookie from LinkedIn share buttons and ad tags to recognize browser ID.
lang
session
This cookie is used to store the language preferences of a user to serve up content in that stored language the next time user visit the website.
language
session
This cookie is used to store the language preference of the user.
lidc
1 day
LinkedIn sets the lidc cookie to facilitate data center selection.
sp_landing
1 day
The sp_landing is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
sp_t
1 year
The sp_t cookie is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors.
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hstc
1 year 24 days
This is the main cookie set by Hubspot, for tracking visitors. It contains the domain, initial timestamp (first visit), last timestamp (last visit), current timestamp (this visit), and session number (increments for each subsequent session).
_ga
2 years
The _ga cookie, installed by Google Analytics, calculates visitor, session and campaign data and also keeps track of site usage for the site's analytics report. The cookie stores information anonymously and assigns a randomly generated number to recognize unique visitors.
_gat_gtag_UA_52355958_2
1 minute
This cookie is set by Google and is used to distinguish users.
_gcl_au
3 months
Provided by Google Tag Manager to experiment advertisement efficiency of websites using their services.
_gid
1 day
Installed by Google Analytics, _gid cookie stores information on how visitors use a website, while also creating an analytics report of the website's performance. Some of the data that are collected include the number of visitors, their source, and the pages they visit anonymously.
hubspotutk
1 year 24 days
This cookie is used by HubSpot to keep track of the visitors to the website. This cookie is passed to Hubspot on form submission and used when deduplicating contacts.
vuid
2 years
Vimeo installs this cookie to collect tracking information by setting a unique ID to embed videos to the website.
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with relevant ads and marketing campaigns. These cookies track visitors across websites and collect information to provide customized ads.
Cookie
Duration
Description
_mkto_datetime
1 month
This cookie is set by Marketo.
bscookie
2 years
This cookie is a browser ID cookie set by Linked share Buttons and ad tags.
test_cookie
15 minutes
The test_cookie is set by doubleclick.net and is used to determine if the user's browser supports cookies.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Sub-policy 16
https://pubmatic.com/legal/privacy/:
POLICIES
Ad Choices
Advertising Platform Privacy Policy
Ad Quality Policy
Careers Privacy Policy
CCPA Privacy Policy
Platform Cookie Policy
PubMatic Properties Privacy Policy
Website Cookie Policy
TERMS
DSR Notice
EEA Data Subject Rights Notice
Opt-Out of the Sale of Personal Information
PubMatic Opt-Out
You can view an archive of our older policies
here
.
About Cookies On This Site
We use cookies to personalize and enhance your experience on our site. Visit our
Privacy Policy
to learn more or manage your personal preferences in our
Cookie Consent Tool
. By using our site, you agree to our use of cookies.
Decline
Accept
Options
Sub-policy 17
https://www.rhythmone.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Click Here to Opt-Out of Interest-Based Advertising
We, at the Tremor Group Companies (Tremor International Ltd, Tremor Video, Inc., Unruly, LLC formally known as RhythmOne, LLC, Unruly Group Ltd, “Company” or “we”, “us” or “our”),
understand that your privacy is important to you.  We use advertising cookies and similar tracking technologies (such as SDKs or pixel tags) to automatically collect information about your device (such as your computer, mobile device or Smart-TV) and related activities on certain websites or platforms to send you targeted ads. You may always opt out of our targeted advertisements by clicking on the opt-out button on the relevant device.
Such opt-out will affect only the device where you have made that selection. After you opt out, Tremor will no longer collect this information to deliver targeted ads on such device. Ads may continue to be served based on information available in the Internet environment, such as the content of a web page, browser type, time of day and operating system. If you have opted out of Tremor advertising cookies and other similar tracking technologies on a device and subsequently delete the “opt out” cookie from your browser on such device, change your browser, or buy a new computer/device, you will need to repeat this process and opt out again.
Contact Us:
privacy@tremorinternational.com
Last Updated September 23, 2022
We, at the Tremor Group Companies (Tremor International Ltd, Tremor Video, Inc., Unruly, LLC formally known as RhythmOne, LLC, Unruly Group Ltd, “Company” or “we”, “us” or “our”), understand that your privacy is important to you. This privacy policy (the “Privacy Policy”) explains how we collect, use, and disclose information collected through our web-based, connected-TV and mobile-based advertising services, as well as the Sites listed below. This policy does not apply to any entities that the Company does not own or control. For information about how we collect and use information through our corporate websites, including
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
and
www.www.rhythmone.com
(collectively, the “Sites”), please scroll down to
Section
9
titled “PRIVACY INFORMATION FOR THE COMPANY CORPORATE WEBSITES.” If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you by Company (whether through web or mobile delivery mechanisms), please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
1. The Company Platform
Company operates several platforms and services that comprise our “Services.”  These include the Unruly Platform (formally known as RhythmOne Platform), Tremor Video DSP, and Unruly DMP.
As further described below, through our Services, we work with websites, web services, content publishers, mobile applications, and various platforms (like connect TV platforms) that provide services for those types of organizations, in particular to help them display personalized and more engaging ads on their properties. In many cases, providing personalized ads help businesses of all sizes (including small and mid-sized businesses) to get their name out, and also help website operators, content publishers, app developers and platform owners to subsidize the cost of their content – often, allowing them to provide consumers with some or all of their content for free.  We also work with advertisers (and their service providers) – brands, retailers, entertainment companies, non-profits and others – to help them advertise in a way that is efficient and relevant to both them and the consumer.   We use data in a variety of ways to help support these businesses, and likewise provide a variety of ways for consumers to control how data is used to market to them.  The purpose of this Privacy Policy is to explain what that data is, how it is used, and what those choices are.
2. The Information We Collect and Use In Providing Our Services
We are able to help advertisers as well as publishers provide more relevant content and targeted advertising by collecting certain information about you, including when you interact with our Services.  This may include your interactions with our customers, which include:
(a) advertisers and other ad partners (collectively, “
Advertisers
”) to show you ads that we think may interest you, on our Services and on other companies’ websites, apps, and devices; and
(b) publishers, app developers and other customers who operate connected TVs (CTV), web and mobile apps or other online services (collectively, “
Publishers
”).
In this Privacy Policy, when we use the term “
Customers
”, we are referring to both Advertisers and Publishers, as described above.
Sometimes we work with other marketing or advertising services, demand partners, service providers or data platforms who provide certain services (such as measurement and analytics solutions) to us as well as Customers:  we refer to these companies as “
Partners
.”
We (or our Customers or these Partners) may provide relevant content and targeted advertising to consumers by using automated technologies such as cookies, including non-HTTP cookies, pixel tags, mobile identifiers and SDKs, each of which we describe below, and in
Section 3
below titled, “Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies?”.   These technologies often generate or collect unique identifiers, such as cookie IDs or mobile advertising IDs.
We describe below these and other categories of information that we receive from consumers’ operating systems, browsers and devices, as well as from Customers, Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one such category.)  We have tried to describe the information that we collect or receive in a way that is easy to understand:
a.    Information that you provide to us directly
We collect certain information that you provide to us, including your contact information and information – for example, when you visit our Sites or when you contact us.
You may also interact with and provide information to us in other ways, including but not limited to when you complete a survey, enter a contest, giveaway, or sweepstakes, choose to hear from us or participate in our marketing or promotion campaigns. When you do so, we collect the information you provide to us, for example your contact information.
If you submit to us a request to access or delete your information, we will collect your contact information and other information, as needed to respond to your request.
b. Identifiers automatically collected from website and app sources,
whether directly or through other content and information platforms, including:
Online cookie IDs;
Mobile advertising identifiers (e.g., IDFAs, Ad IDs) and other mobile device or browser identifiers;
IP addresses;
Wi-Fi access points;
Product model numbers;
Chipset IDs; and
Identifiers related to the device used, such as connected TVs (e.g. name of device and any “friendly name” assigned by you to the device).
We refer to all of the above as “IDs“
c.    Online usage information or “log” information
We collect data about your interactions with our Sites and the Services. Such data is generally related to the above IDs and include:
Language and region settings;
Data related to or describing a web browser, operating system, and device, such as the name and version of your browser, as well as hardware and software version of the app;
Connection data, including (as described above) current IP address, from which location may be inferred;
Online usage data including websites visited, websites visited prior to a web visit, date/time stamp;
Information related to interactions with ads and marketing, such as consumer engagement with an ad (i.e. ads that you view and click on);
Information related to interactions with websites, such as whether a consumer was “referred” through another website or a shared link;
TV viewership data (including information about the content and programs viewed, and amount of time spent viewing Smart TV content, as further described in Section 2 on “Viewing Data” below); and
We may link any of the above to our own or our Partners’ and Customers’ IDs.
We receive the above information from Customers and Partners, advertising platforms and networks, and data resellers.  (Some companies may fit into more than one of those categories.)
d.    Demographic and Interest-Based Information
We may collect, use, or create “audience segments” (also referred to as “data segments), which are generally used to tailor advertising and marketing to consumers and to analyze consumer interaction with such ads.  Audience segments are interest-based or demographic-based groupings of large numbers of users, generally in aggregated form, tied to the above IDs.  For instance, an inference that Ad ID X35%979J is interested is “Sports” might be drawn from the fact that the browser often views sports-related content.  Or, an inference that Cookie ID 4Qj7e9!x may be interested in a new car may be drawn from the corresponding browsers frequent search of new automobile reviews.   (Actual IDs are generally much longer strings of code; the above are simply used for illustration.)
Sometimes these inferences are made from “offline data” that is coded and linked to cookies and IDs (and further linked to our own cookies and IDs) by Partners that create “hashed” (coded) values to replace “real-world” identifiers such as email addresses.
Sometimes these inferences are made from demographic information (“protected classifications” for purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act), such as gender or age, or inferred income level.
Sometimes, these audience segments are associated with the likelihood to have a particular health condition.   A list of our standard health segments is
here
. (We endeavor to update the list frequently, but the list may not be current to the precise date.)   In addition, we may sometimes create “custom” health-related segments, or work with Customers or Partners who use such segments.  Those “custom” segments change over time, but a representative sample is included. Note that such information is only collected/processed at an aggregate level and solely in the U.S. and Canada.
e.    Transactional information from our Customers
Our Customers may provide us with their own proprietary or licensed information, including “audience segments” described above, to help us better perform or deliver our Services.
f.    Geolocation Information
The mobile information we collect or receive from our Partners and Customers also may include geolocation information, which may be precise, that may help us or our Customers to target ads or tailor content to your precise location. For instance, if we believe that you are often near a particular store in Northern New Jersey, we might send you an ad targeted to that store, rather than another store in the general area.
g.    Viewing Data
We provide advertising services to certain Smart TV and connected devices (like Hisense and VIDAA Smart TVs), which like many inter-connected TVs, are equipped with Automatic Content Recognition (“ACR”) functionality that (when enabled) enable us to collect certain information from the device in order to provide personalized advertising based on the content, programs or ads watched on those devices and other devices with the same IP address, or browsers.
What is Viewing Data?
When enabled on the Smart TV device, Tremor will use audio-based ACR technology to collect information about the  programming content (e.g. TV channels and shows, movies, and advertisements watched)  playing on the device, including content from any media players, gaming consoles, over the air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through the Smart TV. We call this information the “
Viewing Data
” and this also includes information such as timestamp, IP address, and Smart TV device identifier.
The ACR technology captures a “fingerprint” from the Smart TV, and the fingerprint is mapped against a content and ad catalog to identify content that was played through the TV. Content or ad ID, IP address, device ID, and other metadata are appended to the audio fingerprint. These identifiers are ingested into Tremor’s platform and mapped to a Household ID, and then aggregated, and deduplicated against other data sources.  The ACR process will associate the data collected with the device’s IP address, but otherwise does not collect, store, or transfer any directly identifiable personal information, audio, or video from this device.
For example, we may collect TV viewing information such as the programs, commercials, and channels you view, the date, time and duration of the viewing. It may also include information about the TV or display, including IP address and SmartTV device ID.
How is Viewing Data used and shared?
To create audience segments:
We use Viewing Data, such as the content, programs or ads watched on your Smart TV, to include you and your household in relevant audience segments for interest-based advertising, as described below. A segment is a grouping of consumer profiles by one or more attributes (e.g. food fans, sports enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.). Individuals are identified by a digital identifier (like an IP address) in these segments but are not identifiable by name or other personal information that directly reveals their identity. We also share these audience segments with our Partners for their own purposes, including to enable their interest-based advertising activities.
Targeting Personalized Ads:
We use Viewing Data to help us, and our Partners, target and show you personalized ads that we think may interest you or other members of your household (a practice known as “interest-based advertising
“
) across your devices, based on the audience segments created from your Viewing Data (as described above). These ads may be shown to you on your Smart TV or other linked devices sharing the same IP address.
Audience Measurement:
We use Viewing Data and may share it with advertising measurement providers to help us and our Partners understand the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads and how they responded. These measurement providers collect or receive information such as the creative and placement ID, IP address, and whether you viewed or interacted with an ad.
Linking devices for household targeting: With the assistance of our third-party service providers, we use the IP address collected from your Smart TV to identify “households” (a group of linked devices sharing the same IP address broadcast by a modem). This allows us and our Partners to deliver personalized advertising to you and other members of your household across various devices (such as mobile phones and tablets) and browsers based on audience segments associated with your household. If you do not enable or otherwise if you opt-out of personalized advertising on your Smart TV, we will no longer collect and use your Smart TV IP address to identify your household for personalized advertising purposes. However, once you opt out of personalized advertising, you may continue to see personalized advertising on devices that were previously targeted on the basis of Viewing Data that was shared when personalized advertising was still enabled on your Smart TV, prior to the opt-out.
Our Partners:
More information about each of our Partners and how they may use data about you and your household is available at:
https://tremorinternational.com/acrpartners/
How can I turn OFF or ON the Viewing Data (ACR) feature?
The option to enable ACR (and related functionality) is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR (and related functionality) at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Turning the Viewing Data feature off or on will affect only the Smart TV where you have made that selection. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information on Viewing Data and your choices.
h.    Further Description of Technologies
For additional explanation of the technologies through which IDs and other data are collected, please see
Section 3
further below regarding cookies, pixel tags and SDKs.  We may use cookies, pixel tags, SDKs and similar technologies to collect the above information, or to associate certain types of information with each other.
e. Information collected from other sources
We also may obtain other behavioral and demographic data from trusted third-party data sources. We may use this data to draw inferences about your preferences, choices, and interests to provide you with customized ads about products and services tailored to your individual interests. We may collect and combine information about your online activities over time and across devices, apps, websites and online services to provide you with customized ads.
3. Cookies, Pixel Tags, SDKs and Similar Technologies
The Company (along with our Partners and Customers) uses a variety of technology to collection information.  These are listed and described below.
a.    Pixels
A tracking “pixel” is a transparent graphic image (usually a 1 x 1 pixel) that is placed on a web page and allows for the collection of information regarding the use of the web page that contains the tracking pixel. Company collects technical and usage information through the use of tracking pixels.
b.    Cookies
A “cookie” is a string of stored code used by a website to send some data to a user’s device.  Depending on the settings of the device or web browser this data may be stored on the user’s device so that the device can later return that data to the same website.  Cookies can be used with online services, such as websites, email deliveries or advertising technologies, to recognize an Internet or mobile-connected device that they have encountered before.  We use cookies to, among other things, “remember” you, track user trends, and collect information about how you use our Customer’s sites or interact with the advertising we (or others) deliver on their behalf. We likewise use cookies to provide relevant content to you and replace non-relevant ads with ads that better match your interests.   We also use cookies when you visit our corporate Sites.
c.      Mobile Device Identifiers and SDKs
We also sometimes use, or partner with Publishers or Publisher-facing and app developer platforms that use mobile SDKs to collect information, such as mobile identifiers (e.g., IDFAs and Android Advertising IDs), and information connected to how mobile devices interact with our Services and those using our Services. A mobile SDK is the mobile app version of a pixel tag or beacon (see “Pixels,” above).  The SDK is a bit of computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, data to be collected, and related services to be implemented. We may use this technology to deliver certain advertising through mobile applications and browsers based on information associated with your mobile device. If you’d like to opt-out from having ads tailored to you in this way on your mobile device, please follow the instructions in Section 6 (“
Your Choices
”) below.
d.      Third Party Suppliers and Vendors
The Company works with third party technology or service providers that provide us with hosting, serving, general campaign or site analytics, ad serving data, or demographic and other audience data about the use and viewership of our Customers’ advertising, or websites that display that advertising on Publishers we work with. Such third-party providers may utilize pixels, cookies, flash cookies, web beacons and/or similar technologies that may be activated when our advertising Customers’ advertisement is encountered on a Publisher. In all instances where the use, collection and disclosure of information is by one of these third-party providers, their privacy policies shall govern and this Privacy Policy does not apply.
e.      Disabling Cookies
Most Web browsers are set up to accept cookies. You may be able to set your browser to warn you before accepting certain cookies or to refuse certain cookies. However, if you disable the use of cookies in your web browser, some features of our Services may be difficult to use or inoperable.  In addition, we may use (or work with certain third-party companies that use) techniques other than or in addition to HTTP cookies to recognize your computer or device and/or to collect and record information about your web surfing activity, including those integrated with our Services.  These technologies may rely on the collection and analysis of “non-cookie” information from your browser or device, such as, your operating system, plug-ins, system fonts, resolution and other data, for purposes of creating a unique profile or “fingerprint” of your browser or device. We (or other third parties) may use this profile to understand and analyze how you interact with the Services, to customize content or advertising to you through the Services, to monitor against fraud or misuse of the Services, or in other ways consistent with this Privacy Policy. Please keep in mind that your web browser may not permit you to block the use of these techniques, and those browser settings that block conventional cookies may have no effect on such techniques.
4. The Business Purposes For Which We Use and Share the Information We Collect
a.    Our Purposes Generally
Principally, we use the information described in
Section 2
to operate, provide, develop and improve our Services. This involves facilitating various types of advertising and marketing to make them more effective, more relevant, and (we believe) more likely to engage and interest (and less likely to annoy) consumers.
b.    Personalized Advertising
This includes facilitating and providing behavioral advertising, i.e., tailoring advertising and content using the types of “audience segments” or “data segments” (and other, related types of information) we describe in
Section 2
above.   As we also describe in
Section 2
, these audience segments may be based on your activity across multiple websites or mobile apps over time, on your transactions, on your location, or on coded or “hashed” data derived from offline demographic and interest data. Generally, the tailoring of ads to devices and browsers (and sometimes through other channels) based on this type of data is called “interest-based” or “personalized” advertising.  (Please go to
Section 6
to learn about what choices you have, in control how you are marketed to in this way.)
c.    Other Advertising and Analytics Purposes
We also use the information to analyze, measure the effectiveness of, frequency-cap or sequence advertising. For instance, we may use the information we collect to compare how many “clicks” the recipients of one ad campaign receives vs. a different ad campaign.  Or, we may track which users have seen which ads, to avoid a user being shown the same ad repeatedly.
d.    Syncing Identifiers
We sometimes integrate our information with Partners, to allow Advertisers to access our information across other platforms (and their information across our platform), in order to allow Advertisers to reach more consumers across various channels. This may include online, offline, social media or television advertising.
e.    Identity Graphing
We may also create or help our Customers or Partners to create “identity” graphs, to help locate users across various channels, such as based on common personal, device-based, or network-based identifiers (
e.g.,
IP address, email address).
f.    Statistical information
We may use statistical information about you or your devices such as generalized location and estimated age group. We obtain this statistical information from commercially available sources (as permitted by law) such as our third-party service providers. We only work with third-party service providers who ensure that this information has been obtained in accordance with applicable law and can be provided to us for use and disclosure.
g. Other Business Purposes
We also may also use the information we collect for internal research, internal operations, auditing, detecting and preventing security incidents, anti-fraud purposes, debugging, short-term and transient use, quality control, and legal compliance.
5. Why And With Whom We Share the Information We Collect
a.    To Provide our Services
Generally, we share the information that we collect in order to perform our Services, including for purposes of targeting advertising, performing analytics on ads, and measuring ad performance.
We share the information we collect with our Customers, who are a wide range of businesses, retailers, content publishers, non-profit entities, business-to-business service companies and other consumer brands, as well as their ad agencies and service providers.
We also share information with our Partners and other companies that provide services to us. For example, we may email or other contact information to resolve Customer support inquiries, and IP address and advertising identifiers with service providers.
b.    For Legal Purposes
We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms of Service, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate of potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our Customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public. We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, and spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
c.    In the Event of a Corporate Transaction
We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
d.    With Corporate Affiliates
We share information within the Tremor Group Companies in order to operate the Site and Services, perform data analytics, design and execute advertising and marketing campaigns, conduct product management, and/or engineer or improve and develop new products or services.
d.    With Partners
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners to assist in our advertising and marketing efforts and show ads that may interest you. The Advertisers we use (including their service providers) may rely on pixel tags and similar technologies to collect information, from or about you to tailor advertisements, measure advertising effectiveness, and enable other enhancements. We may also compile and provide reports, including in aggregated or de-identified forms, to Advertisers about the reach, viewership and effectiveness of their campaigns. We use information to help our Customers to reach the desired audience and understand improve their ad campaigns.
Summary Analytics and Reports. We may, with our Customers and Partners, analyze Viewing Data to create summary reports to help deliver relevant information and advertising to interested groups of consumers.  These summary reports are built from automated analysis of data elements, without connecting the information to any known natural person.  For example, a Customer who is an Advertiser may want to measure the effectiveness of their promotions, in the aggregate.  Thus, a  Partner may identify another device that shares an IP address or display and analyze: (a) whether a particular website was viewed or commercial location was visited by a device with location tracking enabled (e.g., a smartphone) after a related promotion was viewed, and (b) whether a particular program was viewed following exposure to a promotion for that program.  In addition, some Partners may use a third-party data aggregator to identify demographic or other attributes or traits (such as gender or age range or income range or behavioral data) associated with the IP addresses collected, and then send to Customers the demographic information associated with those addresses.
Personalized Advertisements. As further described in Section 2 above, audience segments may be shared with Customers and Partners for the purpose of targeting and tailoring the advertising you see on certain Smart TV and connected devices, including other devices associated with your IP address or device ID on the basis of Viewing Data. Viewing Data may also be enhanced with household demographic data and data about digital actions (e.g., digital purchases, location, and other consumer behavior taken by devices associated with the IP address collected), for the purpose of delivering relevant advertising that are likely to be useful or timely.
e. With advertising measurement providers and services
We share information collected, including IP address and advertising identifiers, with Partners  and their service providers in order to help us and our Advertisers understand information about the content and ads viewed, and the effectiveness of ad campaigns, including the audience that saw their ads, how they engaged or responded, determine which programs are most popular, how many people watch a program to its conclusion, and whether and how often people watch commercials.
The measurement providers we use collect or receive information about your viewing of or interaction with content and ads, including ads that you view on your Smart TV and ads you view on other websites, mobile apps, and connected devices (including Smart TVs) to which we provide advertising services. We also share demographics data and audience segments (e.g., food fans, sport enthusiasts, sitcom fans, etc.) with advertising measurement providers and their service providers. Viewing Data may also be combined with other demographic and similar information, including by working with data aggregators.
Measurement providers use such information to create statistics about what content and ads are being watched – for example, to help them and their clients understand the audience viewing the content or ads, and to measure the effectiveness of the ads.
Through our advertising services, we provide measurement and analytics solutions to other companies. In providing these services, we analyze and reorganize ad campaign data from these companies and provide analytics reports to help them better understand the audience that viewed the company’s ads and whether those viewers belong to the same household.
6. Your Choices:  How To Opt-Out of Tracking (Interest-Based Advertising) on Web Browsers and Mobile Devices
a.    Opting Out of Interest-Based Advertising
The Company adheres to the DAA principles and Tremor Video, Inc adheres to the DAAC principles. To learn more about interest-based advertising or to opt-out of this type of interest-based advertising by those third parties that are members of DAA’s opt-out program, please go to
https://www.aboutads.info/.
Unruly, LLC formally known as RhythmOne, LLC is a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising, and adheres to the NAI Code of Conduct. To learn more about the NAI and its members, or to opt out of interest-based advertising facilitated by NAI members, please go to
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1.
You may also opt out of our own interest-based advertising on those same web pages, or you can simply visit our
Opt-Out page
.  (We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.)
You can opt-out of receiving our Cookies. Persistent Cookies may be removed by following your Internet browser help file directions. If you choose to disable Cookies, some areas of our Website may not work properly. If you opt out, your web browser will be associated with a generic “opt-out” cookie, which will prevent us from associating any non-personally identifiable information with your browser.
You can also opt-out of targeted advertising based on data collected via your browser by using (i) the NAI’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; (ii) the DAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; (iii) the DAAC’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
; or (iv) the EDAA’s opt-out tool, which can be found
here
.
When you opt out, we will stop (a) collecting information about your interests via your browser and (b) serving you targeted advertising based on the data collected via your browser.
We will subsequently place a piece of data in your browser’s cookie that tells us that you have opted out – it does not contain any data about you except for the fact that you have opted out. We need this cookie in place so that we know not to collect information about your interests and serve you targeted advertising based on your interests in the future. Our “opt-out” cookie has a 13-month expiration date.
Keep in mind that participating in our opt-out program does not prevent you from seeing advertising served by us, instead, the ads we serve to you will be generic and not be targeted to
b.    In-App Data Opt-Out
You may opt out of mobile app interest-based advertising through your mobile device settings, as applicable to most (but not necessarily all) mobile devices.   Please go to the
NAI “Mobile Choices” web page
for further information about how to do this.  When you do this, we will no longer use information collected through your mobile apps to deliver behaviorally targeted advertising to your device. Please note that you will continue to receive advertising after you opt-out, but it may not be tailored to your interests.
c.    Viewed Content Advertising and Smart TVs
If you choose to activate this functionality, we may collect certain information on certain Smart TV and connected devices equipped with automatic content recognition (ACR) functionality in order to provide personalized advertising based on the programs or ads being watched on those devices, other devices with the same IP address, or browsers. We refer to the information collected as “Viewing Data” in this Policy. If you have opted-in to activating ACR on such device, the ACR functionality will continuously analyze audio from any onscreen content accessed or displayed on your Smart TV at that moment, including content from any set-top-boxes, media players, gaming consoles, over the air broadcast, or other audiovisual sources playing through your smart TV.  For more information, see Section 2 above on “Viewing Data” [LINK TO SECTION].
The option to enable ACR is presented during the initial setup of the Smart TV and can also be accessed at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. You can disable ACR at any time via the Settings of the Smart TV. Please refer to the device’s Privacy Notice and the Enhanced Viewing Service Privacy Notice of your Smart TV for more information.
7. Do Not Track
Although certain of our technology honors “do not track” (DNT) signals and similar mechanisms transmitted by web browsers or mobile device operating systems, we are not responsible, and shall not be liable, for the acts of third parties, such as ad networks, with respect to such third parties’ tracking policies.  We make no representation about the accuracy or effectiveness of other providers’ opt out mechanisms, including those listed on the above industry websites.
8. Children
Our Sites and Services are neither developed for, nor directed at, children under the age of 16.  We do not knowingly collect personal information from nor employ or offer targeting towards children under the age of 16.  If you believe your child, who is under the age of 16, has provided us with personal information or registered at one of our Sites, please contact us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
and we will use reasonable efforts to remove that information from our records.
9.  Privacy Information for the Sites
The below provides information about how information is collected and used on our Sites, including
www.tremorinternational.com
,
www.tremorvideo.com
,
www.unruly.co
,
www.www.rhythmone.com
and any website on which this Privacy Policy is posted.
a.    Collection of Personal Information
The Company’s customers are businesses and other organizations, groups and institutions, not individuals, and our corporate website collects contact information from our customers and prospective customers who request information from us.  We may also sometimes collect information through business channels such as trade shows, or through marketing platforms that help us identify new customers.   In addition, we and advertising and data platforms we work with may use cookies, pixels, device identifiers or other tracking methods to collect and retain “identifiers” such as cookie IDs, IP addresses to recognize you and to target or retarget ads to you when you visit our website, visit other sites across the internet, or visit other applications and services.
b.    How We Use This Personal Information
Generally, we use the information we collect to provide customers and potential customers with information that they requested, to correspond about any questions or concerns brought to our attention, to notify such persons of new services or updates to our existing Services or more generally to market and promote our Services.   We also use this information as follows:
For Legal Purposes:  We may share any information we have with third parties in order to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our contracts, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts, or to investigate of potential violations thereof; (c) protect the rights, property or personal safety of us, our platform, our customers, our agents and affiliates, its users and/or the public.  We likewise may provide information to other companies and organizations (including law enforcement) for fraud protection, and spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
In the Event of a Corporate Transaction:  We may also share personal information in the event of a corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets, or for purposes of due diligence connected with any such transaction.
With Service Providers:  We may share personal information we collect with our service providers, which may include (for instance) providers involved in tech or customer support, operations, web or data hosting, billing, accounting, security, marketing, data management, validation, enhancement or hygiene, or otherwise assisting us to provide, develop, maintain and improve our Services.
c.    Your Marketing Choices
Anyone who has provided personal contact information through our Sites may e-mail us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
to update, delete, and/or correct their personal contact information, or contact us at the information provided in
Section 16
. You may likewise request access or “deletion” of your information through the same means:  however, if you are an entity we have done business with, we will likely need to retain your data for business purposes such as accounting, billing, auditing and fulfilling other legal requirements.   To “opt out” of advertising platforms we may work with for our own corporate purposes (e.g., to “retarget” our customers or potential customers from this website), you may generally rely on the consumer choice mechanisms we set out in
Section 6
.
d. Sale of Personal Information
We may allow certain third parties (such as Partners) to collect your personal information. You have the right to opt out of such disclosure of personal information, as described below in Section 10.
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this Privacy Policy, we have disclosed the following categories of personal information:
Identifier such as a unique personal identifier (such as a device identifier, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar technology, other forms of identifiers), online identifier and IP address;
Commercial information, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered, and other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies; and
Internet and other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, information regarding your interaction with websites, applications or advertisements.
10. Additional Information for California Residents
California’s “Shine the Light” law (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.83) permits California residents to request and receive, once per calendar year and free of charge, information about our sharing of your personal information (if any) with third parties for their own direct marketing use. If you are a California resident and would like to make such a request, please send an email to
privacy@tremorinternational.com
. In your request, please include your name and attest to the fact that you are a California resident and provide a current California address. We may ask you for additional information to confirm your identity before responding to this request.
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to residents of California. This Section of the Privacy Policy applies if you are a natural person who is a resident of California (“California Consumer”) in the capacity as a business partner of the Company and uses the Services, or are a consumer whose information is collected or used by us in providing the Services.  This Section of the Privacy Policy is intended solely for and is applicable only to California Consumers:  if you are not a California Consumer (or a resident of California), this does not apply to you and you should not rely on it.
a.    The right to access and disclosure
You may have the right to request, twice during a twelve-month period, the following information about the personal information we have collected about you during the past 12 months:
the categories and specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you;
the categories of sources from which we collected the personal information;
the business or commercial purpose for which we collected or sold the personal information;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared the personal information; and
the categories of personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom we sold or disclosed that information for a business purpose.
b.    The right to deletion
You may have the right to request that we delete the personal information we have collected from you.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.  We need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you, and may retain certain information for important business purposes, such as fulfilling our legal obligations, or for security, auditing or de-bugging purposes.
c.    How to exercise your access and deletion rights
California residents may exercise their California access or deletion rights by accessing our
Do Not Sell
link or, by sending an email to
privacy@tremorinternational.com
.
For security purposes, we will verify your identity – in part by requesting or automatically capturing certain information from you — when you request to exercise your California privacy rights.  For instance, you may need to provide your email address. To request that we provide you with the specific pieces of personal information we have from you or to delete personal information we have collected from you, we may also need to ask you for additional information to verify your identity.  Once we have verified your identity (and your agent, as applicable), we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above or another permissible business, security or legal purpose.  Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
d.    The right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
e.    The right to opt-out of the sale of your personal information
You have the right to opt out of the sale of your personal information.  California law broadly defines sale such that it may include, for example, allowing third parties to receive and use certain information, such as cookies IP address and/or browsing behavior, to deliver targeted advertising.
If you wish to “opt out” of our “sale” of your information, i.e., for purposes of personalized advertising, we recommend employing the options we provide and explain in
Section 10 c
. (as we believe those methods are the easiest and most efficient).   However, you may also visit the interactive form that we make available at our
opt-out location
.
f.    Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney.
11. Where Company Stores Personal Data
We are a global company with affiliates, varied business processes, management structures and technical systems around the world. Information that we collect or that is collected by us or on our behalf may be stored on connected devices (including Smart TV) to which we provide advertising or measurement and analytics services, or on our servers, and may be transferred to, accessed from, or stored and processed globally in any other country where we or our service providers maintain facilities or call centers, including jurisdictions that may have different data privacy laws from those in your home country. The data that we collect from you may be transferred to, and stored at, a destination outside the European Economic Area (“EEA”). It may also be processed by staff operating outside the EEA who work for us or for one of our suppliers. Such staff may be engaged in, among other things, the fulfillment of your order or the provision of support services. We strive to transfer your information where there are appropriate measures and controls in place, and we strive to ensure that all information you provide to us is stored on secure servers.
12. For European Residents: About your GDPR Privacy Rights
If you are located in Europe, you may have certain right under European privacy law, principally the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).   This Section of the Privacy Policy is intended solely for, and is applicable only as to, such consumers, i.e., “data subjects”:  if you are not an EEA resident (or otherwise located in an EEA country), this does not apply to you and you should not rely on it.
a.    Our legal bases for using personal information
All organizations need a legal reason to use your personal information. There are a number of legal grounds that enable data processing. Below are the most relevant grounds you should be aware of.
With your consent
There are some activities where we process personal information with your consent. For example, where we want to send you marketing messages by email, we would ask your permission first and you could opt out at any time.
For a legitimate interest
We may use your information where there is a legitimate interest to do so. For example, we may use your information where it would help achieve our business objectives or to facilitate a benefit to you or someone else.  Our legitimate interests in processing personal data include:
to develop, deliver and maintain relevant and engaging products, services and advertising;
understanding when audiences engage with our Customer’s ads;
to build a clearer understanding of who our Customer’s audiences are in order to better serve more relevant advertising to those audiences, for the benefit of both individuals and our Customers;
to maximize advertising revenues for publishers and therefore help to maintain a diverse ecosystem of online independent publishers of content for users to enjoy and educate themselves;
to support individual and societal rights to receive information;
to improve user website experience by delivering brand safe, high quality advertising to all of the publishers of online content with which we work;
to carry on the business of a commercial organization;
to demonstrate that we provide services and products to agreed industry standards;
sharing information with the Tremor International group companies for analysis, audience insights, business efficiencies, content personalization and to deliver relevant advertising.
To comply with legal obligations
There may be situations where we need to use your information to comply with legal and regulatory obligations or defend claims.
b.    Exercising Your Data Subject Rights Under the GDPR
If you are a resident of the European Economic Area, you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, you can do so at any time by contacting us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
or you may visit our
[your data page]
, where you may make an “access” or “right to know” request, or request that we “opt out” your personal information from our active database.
In addition, you can object to processing of your personal data, ask us to restrict processing of your personal information or request portability of your personal information. Again, you can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
.
You have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing e-mails we send you. To opt-out of other forms of marketing (such as postal marketing or telemarketing), then please contact us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
.
Similarly, if we have collected and process your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time, by contacting us at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
or (as to information that we use in our Services), by going to
[your data page]
.  Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
13. Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update our Privacy Policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material Privacy Policy changes if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.
You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the “last updated” date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
14. Data Retention
Personal information we collect may be retained for as long as needed to fulfill legitimate business purposes. The Company expires certain cookies, including cookies directed to European users, after 12 months. Except as permitted by law, we may retain aggregated and anonymized user information (e.g., to create group-level data), for an indefinite period but usually no more than 2 years.
15. Information Security
We take measures to protect against unauthorized access to or unauthorized alteration, disclosure, or destruction of data we collect and store.  These may include internal reviews of our data collection, storage, firewalls and processing practices and security measures.  Of course, no security system is perfect. Thus, while we do take measures to safeguard against unauthorized access to, or alteration of data we collect and store, we cannot guarantee that it will not be disclosed or accessed inadvertently or through the unauthorized acts of others.
16. How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or requests please contact us by email at
privacy@tremorinternational.com
or 1177 Avenue of the Americas, 9th Floor, New York, NY, 10036.
Want To Learn More?
Discover how you can achieve higher ROI and better engagement with RhythmOne.
Get in Touch
Sub-policy 18
https://www.improvedigital.com/platform-privacy-policy/:
Home
»
Platform Privacy Policy
Platform Privacy Policy
Improve Digital Platform Privacy Notice
We at Azerion Technology B.V. (
“Improve Digital SSP”
, “
Improve Digital
”, “
we
”, “
us
” or “
our
”) respect your privacy and recognise the importance of providing a secure environment for your personal data. Therefore, we are committed to being transparent about how we collect and process your personal data.
Improve Digital is an advertising technology company that provides a variety of online advertising-related services to sell side and demand side partners. Our technology, allowing the provision of all these services is called our “
Platform
”. In brief, Platform helps our clients to monetise their advertising spaces, buy and sell online ads, including through online programmatic and non-programmatic auctions (together, “
Platform Services or Services
”).
Throughout this Policy we refer to our clients that sell advertisement (ads) space as “
Publishers”
. Publishers own or operate the “
Digital Properties
” (websites, apps, Smart TV platforms etc.), including the advertising spaces that we may fill in, you may use or visit. We refer to clients that buy advertisement spaces (e.g. advertisers) as
Demand Side Platforms
(“
DSPs
”) or “
Buyers”
. Our technology enables our clients to serve advertisements that you see online such as in web pages, apps, and video content.
Improve Digital participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies. Improve Digital’s identification number within the framework is 253.
The purpose of this privacy notice (“
Privacy Notice
”) is to inform individuals (“end users” or “you”) about why and how we process your personal data (“
Personal Data
”). What constitutes Personal Data is information that can be linked or attributed to you when you visit the digital properties of the publishers using our technology (“
Platform
”) which enables our clients to monetise their advertising spaces with advertisements or when you use our Platform on behalf of our publishers and/or buyer side partners. This includes information regarding with whom we will share your Personal Data, how long we will retain it, and which rights you have in relation to the processing.
This Privacy Notice applies whenever you visit the Digital Properties using our Platform or any of other services, all of which together we refer to as “
Services
“.
GENERAL INFORMATION
In this part of our Privacy Notice, you will find general information about how we process your Personal Data when you use our Services. For specific information with more details about our processing activities, please see the service specific information below.
1. Who is responsible for the processing of your Personal Data
We, Azerion Technology B.V., based at Boeing Avenue 30, 1119 PE Schiphol-Rijk, The Netherlands are responsible (“
the data controller
”) for the processing of your Personal Data when we show you ads when you visit Digital Properties. Therewithal, we carry out these Services partly on behalf of or jointly with our Publishers based on the nature of integration.
2. What types of Personal Data do we process and how do we collect it?
When you visit the Digital Properties of the publishers using our technology, as further explained, we collect, use, store and transfer different kinds of Personal Data via cookies, beacons, pixels, tags, and other non-cookie technologies. For example, when you visit a website or app, the publisher sends us a request to show you an ad. As a general principle, we do not collect and do not ask you to provide any “special categories of Personal Data”, which is any particularly protected information such as data concerning health, religion, political opinions or philosophical beliefs, sexual preferences or orientation.
The information we collect depends on which of our Services you use and how you use them. We process the following types of your Personal Data.
2.1. Personal Data provided by you
When you use our Platform, you provide or be asked to give us certain information, including:
Information provided in relation to our
customer service
: When you contact support, we collect information about your request (subject and content of your request) and your contact details (your name and email).
Account information:
If you create an account to access our platform, we collect your log-in data (your email address, username and password).
Information provided in relation to transaction and payment
:
We collect your (if you are a Publisher) billing information payment type, currency, depositor detail (company name, your name and surname if you are private person ), street and house number street name and house number, postal code, city and country), bank details (bank name, account number/IBAN, swift code, bank address) in order to make you payment.
2.2. Personal Data we collect
When you visit the Digital Properties of the publishers using our technology, we collect certain information about your visit. For example, when you visit a website or app, the publisher sends us a request to show you an ad. We collect certain information about ad inventory, you and your device to help inform our Demand Side Partner’s decision to serve an ad. We also collect information through Demand Side Partners that use our Services as well as from other third parties:
Browser and device information:
such as the type and version of the browser or device (screen dimensions, device brand and model), internet service information (e.g., internet service provider used by you), certain browser settings like language, time and time zone.
Unique Online Identifiers:
if available, identifiers that enable us to recognise a browser or device across different content, such as mobile ad identifiers, device IDs, and cookie IDs, Apple IDFA and Android Advertising ID.
Location:
precise geographic location, if available from the device, and provided by the publishers, and/or imprecise location as derived from IP address or provided by the publisher.
Content information
: information about activity on the digital content visited, such as visited webpages, searches or links clicked.
Ad request information:
information within the ad request provided by Publishers such as type of the request and size of the request.
2.4. Personal Data we collect from third parties
In certain scenarios, we will also obtain your Personal Data from third parties, in strict compliance with applicable data protection laws and regulations. Your Personal Data are provided by the following third parties, including:
Your Consent String
: Before you see our ads in a Digital Property, the relevant publisher or advertiser obtains your consent for our processing activities as well. If you provide your consent to that partner, we will receive your consent string which shall provide us your preferences on our processing activity.
Key Values
: If the publisher collects and decides to make this data available , key values about you (e.g. age, gender)
Interest Segments
(e.g. interest information reflects your interests as may be derived from your behavior, such as your internet activity or your purchase history)
Other information shared in connection with this data.
To learn more about which data is processed, please see the section with service specific information below.
3. Do we collect data from minors?
Our services are intended to be appropriate for general audiences. Therefore, we do not intentionally collect and/or categorise personal information from children. In the event that we learn that we have collected personal data from a user under 16 years of age within the scope of the Services explained in this Privacy Notice, such as provision of a COPPA flag within the bid requests sent by our Publishers, we will take all required actions to comply with the applicable laws such as Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), including elimination of any identifiers provided. If you believe that a user might be under the age of 16, please contact our support team.
Improve Digital does not engage in activities that require parental notice or consent under COPPA. As mentioned above we rely on the data that we receive from publishers therefore if a publisher sent us the COPPA flag, we take all the necessary actions accordingly. If you believe that Improve Digital has inadvertently collected information from a child under 16 that is subject to parental notice and consent under COPPA, please contact Improve Digital using the contact information below to request deletion of the information. We will take all reasonable measures to promptly delete all personal data from our records.
4. For what purpose do we process your data?
When we use and allow our clients to use the information we collect for the following purposes:
4.1. Provision and improvement of our Services
to provide our advertising services;
to enable the automated auction (bidding process) of ad inventory of our clients and to record views and clicks on ads and to show end users accurate advertisements in terms of technical details (size of the ad slot, type of the ad etc.);
to facilitate navigation, display information more effectively, and to personalise your experience while using the ad services, as well as auditing, researching, and analysing information to provide, protect, manage, and improve our ad services, develop new services, and ensure that our technologies function properly;
to calculate usage levels of the ad services, help diagnose server problems, and administer the ad services;
4.2. Personalisation of your experience
to infer end users’ likely commercial interests based on their activities across websites and devices over time, including to build interest-based advertising segments or audiences, as well as to supplement the information we collect with additional information we receive from third parties, such as third-party advertising segments or audiences, to allow us to customise and more effectively tailor the ads we display to end users and to optimise the display of ads (including limiting exposure to less relevant ads);
to serve targeted ads to an end user on behalf of our clients based on the end user’s activity across websites, mobile apps, and other digital properties over time and information regarding an end user’s inferred commercial interests. We also deliver location-based advertising, services, and content in real-time through the detection of approximate geolocation;
4.3. Marketing, analytics and reporting
to analyse ad performance, such as tracking views of ads, click-through rates to websites or app stores and/or installs of apps that have been advertised as well as to understand usage of our services across all our group companies to support strategy and growth;
to provide information and reports to buyers about when and how end users have been exposed to their ads, clicked on their ads, or visited their digital property to account monetary transactions;
4.4. Prevention of fraud and illegal activity
to identify invalid ad impressions, clicks, installs, or ad queries;
to protect us and our publisher clients from fraudulent behavior, and protect the security of the ad Services;
4.5. Compliance with our legal or regulatory obligations
to comply with the applicable laws (such as obtaining your consent, if you are in a consent jurisdiction of EEA or US), including laws outside an end user’s country of residence;
to comply with subpoenas, warrants, or other legal process;
to respond to requests from public and government authorities including public and government authorities outside an end user’s country of residence;
to enforce our terms and conditions;
to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates;
to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, end users, or others;
to allow us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
Please see the section with service specific information below for a more detailed description of the purposes for which we process your Personal Data.
5. Do we engage in profiling activities?
If you consent to this via the consent management platform of the Digital Property, with instruction of the publisher we allow our third party partners to conduct profiling activities to show you ads that are more relevant to you. You can also go to your privacy settings to review and amend your privacy choices related to this type of processing at any time.
6. On which legal basis do we process your Personal Data?
We process your Personal Data for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice, based on the following legal grounds:
Your consent
: We process your Personal Data if you have provided your consent via a consent management platform available in the Digital Property for a specific purpose. For example, when you visit a Digital Property for the first time, your consent is asked for the data processing in the context of personalised advertising. You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, for example by changing your privacy settings. Please note that this will not affect any processing carried out before you withdraw your consent.
Compliance with legal obligations to which we are subject
: We process your Personal Data to comply with legal obligations, For example, for tax and accounting purposes or legal disputes.
Performance of a contract
: We process your Personal Data for the performance of a contract or to take steps prior to entering into a contract to which you are party, for example, in context of providing you our platform or customer service.
Legitimate interests
: We also process your Personal Data to the extent that the processing is necessary for our legitimate interests or those of third parties while applying appropriate safeguards that protect your privacy. For example, we process your Personal Data for fraud protection and security; transfer your personal data across all our group companies for administrative transfers as well as to determine the size of the user base of our services or for serving you non-personalised ads to help our Publishers monetise their ad spaces. We are also processing your Personal Data to ensure and verify that users’ privacy choices can be and are respected, to demonstrate compliance with accountability principle. We kindly remind you that you have the right to object to such processing of personal data.
Please see for additional information the section with service specific information below.
7. With whom do we share your Personal Data?
We will not disclose your Personal Data to any party who is not authorised to process them. To manage our Services, we will share your Personal Data internally with members of our responsible departments and technical support and in each case only if access to your Personal Data is necessary for the performance of their roles.
Moreover, and only when necessary to fulfill the purposes mentioned above, we disclose your Personal Data to the following recipients or categories of recipients or allow the following third parties to collect your Personal Data in connection with your use of our Services. Often, these are vendors working on behalf of the advertiser to measure ad performance or prevent ad fraud or other purposes. This Policy does not apply to those parties, and Improve Digital is not responsible for their collection or use of information.
Customers and their service providers:
We sometimes give our customers personal data in the form of logs and other types of records and reporting related to their use of our platform.
Demand side partners:
Demand partners are companies that integrate with our Platform in order to buy ad space from publishers working with us. To facilitate these ad transactions, we transmit personal data in accordance with publishers’ instructions to demand partners so that they have information about the ad unit to be filled, and can choose whether to bid for the ad space and how much.
Vendors and service providers:
We use a variety of vendors and service providers as part of, and for the purposes of, providing our platform. These could include cloud storage and cloud computing services, or anti-fraud and security vendors. These vendors and service providers are subject to security and confidentiality restrictions to ensure their processing of the data is consistent with this policy
External service providers
: We share your Personal Data with external service providers who perform services on our behalf, like IT services, hosting and content delivery services, analytics services, data management services, video hosting service, and user notification services. Where we share your Personal Data with external service providers, we have appropriate agreements in place to ensure that your Personal Data is processed in compliance with applicable data protection laws.
Law enforcement, government authorities or courts
: We disclose your Personal Data in the event that we reasonably suspect malicious activity or fake traffic or in response to lawful requests to public authorities, including law enforcement, government authorities, or courts.
Affiliates and group companies
: We share information with our affiliated companies, i.e. companies within our corporate family, which are also subject to this policy. We also share your personal data with our group companies which are responsible for internal analytics for the purposes of cross-product audience measurement. Where we share your personal data with our group companies, we have appropriate agreements (an intra-company data sharing agreement) in place to ensure that your personal data is processed in compliance.
Other third parties
: We also disclose your Personal Data in the event of any contemplated or actual reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business or assets (including in any insolvency or similar proceedings).
Please see the section with service specific information below for more information about the third parties we may share your data with. For instance, Improve Digital processes bid requests from and to Google advertising platforms – read more about their platform policy
here
. Furthermore, you can find the full list of third parties your Personal Data may be shared with by clicking on the following link: Third Party Partners List
8. Where will my Personal Data be processed?
In general, if you are accessing our Services from the European Union (EU) / the European Economic Area (EEA) your data is stored on servers within the EU / EEA. However, with regard to certain activities described in this Privacy Notice, your data may also be shared outside the EU / EEA. We have implemented appropriate safeguards to protect your Personal Data when it is transferred outside the EU/EEA, including the execution of the European Commission’s standard data protection clauses (also known as Model Clauses) to provide safeguards for your Personal Data.
For further information on, or to receive a copy of, the adequate safeguards adopted by us for the international transfer of your Personal Data, please contact us by email at
dpo@azerion.com
. We will process any request in line with any local laws and our policies and procedures.
9. How do we protect your Personal Data?
We have implemented appropriate technical and organisational security measures designed to protect your Personal Data against accidental, unlawful or unauthorised destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use. We update and test our security standards on an ongoing basis. In addition, we take reasonable steps to assure that third parties to whom we transfer your Personal Data provide sufficient protection of Personal Data.
10. How long do we store your Personal Data?
We will not retain your Personal Data longer than necessary to fulfill the purposes for which the data was collected or to fulfill our legal obligations or necessary for the establishment, exercise of defence of legal claims or resolving disputes. Afterwards, we will delete or anonymise your Personal Data. Additional information on how long your Personal Data is stored by our service partners can be found in the respective third-party list available above.
Our cookies and relevant retention periods are as follows.
Cookie Name
Placed by
Reason
Validity Period
tuuid
Improve Digital
To enable bidding process
90 days
tuuid, with value
opt-out
Improve Digital
For users to opt out of advertising
400 days
tuuid_lu
Improve Digital
Timestamp of the last tuuid sync
90 days
pct
Improve Digital
Tracks clicks to measure conversions
90 days
pvt
Improve Digital
Tracks views to measure conversions
90 days
ih
Improve Digital
To limit number of advertisements you see (frequency capping)
90 days
fh
Improve Digital
Impression counter
Until the end of day
pxl
Improve Digital
Division by client into groups.
90 days
um
Improve Digital
To enable bidding process
90 days
umeh
Improve Digital
To enable bidding process
90 days
sh
Improve Digital
To limit number of advertisements you see (frequency capping)
Kept for 1 session – does not set expiry date
ad
Improve Digital
Track views and clicks to measure conversions.
90 days
11. What are your rights in respect of your Personal Data?
To the extent permitted by applicable data protection laws and regulations, you have the following rights in relation to your Personal Data:
Access the Personal Data we hold about you
, including information such as, for example, the source and categories of data, the processing purposes, the recipients (or categories thereof) and the respective retention period.
Request an update or correction of your Personal Data
so that it is always accurate.
Receive your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format
, including the right to transfer your Personal Data to another data controller.
Request the deletion of your Personal Data
if you believe that retention is no longer necessary for the purposes indicated above.
Restrict the processing of your Personal Data
for example, if you have contested the accuracy of your Personal Data, and for a period of time that is sufficient to allow us to verify its accuracy.
Withdraw your consent
at any time if your Personal Data is processed with your consent. Please note that this will not affect the lawfulness of data processing based on consent granted prior to its withdrawal.
Object to the processing on specific grounds
relating to your particular situation, in the event and to the extent that we process your Personal Data based on legitimate interest. In such cases we will no longer process your Personal Data unless we have compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims. You also have the right to object where we are processing your Personal Data for profiling. In that case, we will stop processing your Personal Data for such purposes.
You can exercise these rights by sending a request to the contact details set out below, providing your user identifier and/or mobile device identifier, as well as a description of your request. Your user identifier or mobile identifier is the only way we can identify you within our systems. You can find your user identifier in our “My Ad Preferences” page:
https://myads.360yield.com/
. Please note that any other information such as your full name, physical address, date of birth or IP address is not relevant for us and cannot be used to identify you within our systems.
If you believe we have not complied with our obligations under applicable data protection laws and regulations, you can lodge a complaint with a competent data protection authority, for example, the Autoriteit Persoonsgegevens in the Netherlands.
12. How can you contact us?
If you have any queries about this Privacy Notice or how we use your Personal Data, please contact our customer support via our Website or our Data Protection Officer via e-mail to dpo@azerion.com.
13. How often do we update this Privacy Notice?
We regularly review and update this Privacy Notice. When there is an important change that will have a relevant impact on the processing of your Personal Data, we will inform you by email if we have your email address. If we do not have your email address, for example because you did not create an account, we will inform you with a banner on our Website.
This Privacy Notice was last updated on 27 February 2025.
14. Additional Information for California Residents
This section for California residents supplements the information provided in this Privacy Notice and applies solely to players, and others who reside in the State of California. We provide this section to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA) and the regulations issued under it; accordingly, this section addresses the specific requirements of the CCPA and should be read together with this Privacy Notice.
We do not sell your Personal Data. However, we may share or provide access to each of the categories of Personal Data we collect as necessary for our business purposes. We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or device. In particular, we have collected the following categories of personal information (envisaged by the CCPA) from consumers within the last twelve (12) months:
Category A – Identifiers (such as your device identifier, demographic information -such as your country, your username, email address, any information you may choose to provide -such as your age or your language);
Category B – Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e));
Category D – Commercial information (such as purchase history);
Category F – Internet or other similar network activity (such as your interaction with our ads);
Category G – Geolocation data;
Category H – Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
The CCPA provides consumers (California residents) with specific rights regarding their personal information.
You have the right to access specific information, i.e. you may request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months.
You have the right to know. Under the CCPA you have the right to request that we disclose to you what Personal Data we process about you.
You have the right to deletion which means that you may request that we delete any of your personal information we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Under the CCPA, you have the right to opt out of any sale of your personal data. Please note that your right to opt out does not apply to our sharing of personal data with service providers, who are parties we engage to perform a function on our behalf and are contractually obligated to use the personal data only for that function.
Finally, you have a right to not be discriminated against for exercising your rights under the CCPA.
Please go to
My Ads
to opt-out of the sale of your personal data. You can also exercise these rights by sending a request to the contact details set out above, providing your user identifier and a description of your request. You can find your user identifier in the My Ads page. Please note that you can only opt-out yourself by turning personalised ads off from the My Ads page and we cannot opt-out you from our systems due to how cookies and similar technologies work.
Additional Information for Brazil Residents
Under the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (the “LGPD”), you have the right to access, rectify, port, erase, and confirm that we process your data. If you have given consent about processing your data, you have the right to withdraw consent anytime.
SERVICE SPECIFIC INFORMATION
In this part of our Privacy Notice, you will find specific information on how your Personal Data is processed. For general information about data processes that apply, please see above.
Hosting
Improve Digital is hosted by external companies to provide its Services to its clients. For example, every time there is an ad request from a publisher, or you make a request, for example by clicking on a link on our platform, the information allowing this request (e.g. device information and information on requested content) as well as online identifiers and your IP address,  will be sent to the external servers. This data is used to show you the content you requested in a faster and proper way. We process this data on the basis of legitimate interest, to provide and improve our service and ensure its functionality. Your full IP address is not logged.
Customer service
If you contact us for customer support by using our email address, we will process your email address, and the content of your request in order to provide you with support. The request history helps us to solve a newer request and is stored to defend against possible future legal claims. We process this data on the basis of performance of contract to provide you with customer support, and store this data on the basis of legitimate interest, to improve our services, and to be able to defend possible future legal claims.
Advertising
Our Platform helps our clients to buy and sell advertising spaces. As further explained below, such advertising is personalised or non-personalised (contextual) based on your preferences.
Personalised Advertising: In cases where you provide consent for personalised advertising, we share your Personal Data (including your IP address, advertising identifiers and the information that you have provided your consent for personalised ads) through our advertising platform with third-party advertising platforms and data management platforms which build a profile about you and your interests through cookies and similar technologies to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you. Please also note that you can adjust your preferences at any time in the Digital Property’s privacy settings.
Non-personalised/Contextual Advertising: We may also show you ads that do not reflect your interests and are content specific instead of user specific. Whenever applicable, we rely on legitimate interests to serve you contextual advertising without using any tracking technology.
Data Management Platforms
Based on your consent, upon Publisher’s instruction we allow data management platforms to process your Personal Data to show you relevant ads, based on your preferences and interests. For this purpose, your device information and online identifiers are collected and sent to external data management providers.
Payments (billing and invoicing)
We process your billing and invoicing information in order to make you payments of your revenue share from our monetisation services. We process this data on the basis of performance of the contract to provide you our Platform.
Third Parties List of Improve Digital
This list includes information about the third parties that your data may be shared with, in the way described in our Privacy Notice.
Under “Category”, you will find information about the group of recipient/activity your Personal Data is processed for, such as DSPs. The “Third party” indicates what third party specifically processes your data for the respective category. “Retention time” provides information about the amount of time your data is kept for by that party. The information that is included in this column is based on the information we have received from the third parties. For the most up to date information about the retention times, we refer to the privacy notice of the respective third party, which we have included in this list. In the third-party privacy notices, you will furthermore find information on how they collect and process your personal data.
Category
Third party
Retention time
Privacy Notice
DSP
Adman / Actuity (Illumin)
See privacy notice
https://illumin.com/legal/privacy/
Admixer
See privacy notice
https://admixer.com/privacy
Adello
See privacy notice
https://adello.com/privacy-policy/
Adform
See privacy notice
https://site.adform.com/privacy-center/platform-privacy/product-and-services-privacy-policy/
ADITION technologies AG / Active Agent
See privacy notice
https://www.adition.com/en/privacy-platform/
Adot
See privacy notice
https://we-are-adot.com/privacy-policy/
Amazon
See privacy notice
https://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html/ref=hp_left_sib?ie=UTF8&nodeId=468496
Amobee
See privacy notice
https://www.amobee.com/trust/gdpr/
AppMonsta
See privacy notice
https://appmonsta.ai/privacy/
Beeswax DSP
See privacy notice
https://www.beeswax.com/privacy/
BidSwitch
See privacy notice
https://www.bidswitch.com/privacy-policy/#data-retention
BidTheatre
See privacy notice
https://www.bidtheatre.com/privacy-policy
Blis
See privacy notice
https://blis.com/blis-privacy-policy-for-online-advertising-and-related-uses/
Blue
See privacy notice
https://www.getblue.io/privacy/en/
Brightcom
See privacy notice
https://www.brightcom.com/privacy-policy/
Bucksense
See privacy notice
https://www.bucksense.com/platform-privacy-policy/
Cloud Technologies S.A.
See privacy notice
https://www.cloudtechnologies.pl/en/internet-advertising-privacy-policy
CPM Star
See privacy notice
https://www.cpmstar.com/privacyPolicy.html
Criteo
See privacy notice
https://www.criteo.com/privacy/
Delta Projects AB
See privacy notice
https://deltaprojects.com/privacy-policy/
DynAdmic
See privacy notice
https://us.dynadmic.com/privacy-policy/
E-Planning
See privacy notice
https://www.e-planning.net/privacy-policy.php
EASYmedia GmbH
See privacy notice
https://www.easy-media.de/home.html
Emerse
See privacy notice
https://www.emerse.com/privacy-policy/
Hawk
See privacy notice
https://hawk-tech.io/privacy-policy/
Google DV360 (formerly Doubleclick Bid Manager)
See privacy notice
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Jaduda GmbH (Splicky)
See privacy notice
https://www.jaduda.com/privacy/
Localsensor
See privacy notice
https://www.localsensor.com/privacy.html
Madopi
See privacy notice
https://madopi.com/
Mars Media Group
See privacy notice
https://mars.media/#!terms
Meazy
See privacy notice
https://cz.meazy.co/privacy-policy
MediaMath
See privacy notice
https://www.mediamath.com/privacy-policy/
Mediasmart
See privacy notice
https://mediasmart.io/privacy
MGID
See privacy notice
https://www.mgid.com/services/privacy-policy
MoreMerry
See privacy notice
https://www.moremerry.com/
Opera
See privacy notice
https://legal.opera.com/privacy/
Platform 161
See privacy notice
https://platform161.com/cookies-privacy/
Powerlinks
See privacy notice
http://powerlinks.com/privacy-policy/
Proxistore
See privacy notice
https://www.proxistore.com/en/privacy/
PubNative
See privacy notice
https://pubnative.net/privacy-notice/
RhythmOne
See privacy notice
https://unruly.co/legal/privacy/
Pubwise
See privacy notice
https://admin.pubwise.io/publisher/privacypolicy
RevX
See privacy notice
https://revx.io/privacy-policy/
RTB House S.A.
See privacy notice
https://www.rtbhouse.com/privacy-center
Sociomantic
See privacy notice
https://sociomantic.com/
Seeding Alliance
See privacy notice
https://seeding-alliance.de/en/privacypolicy/
Splicky
See privacy notice
https://www.splicky.com/de/web/privacy-delivery
Targetspot
See privacy notice
https://www.targetspot.com/
Tec-Do
See privacy notice
https://www.tec-do.com/en/static/home/Tec-Do%20Privacy%20Policy_24075.pdf
The Trade Desk
See privacy notice
https://www.thetradedesk.com/us/privacy
Travel Audience
See privacy notice
https://travelaudience.com/product-privacy-notice/
Verizon (Yahoo / BrightRoll)
See privacy notice
https://www.verizon.com/about/privacy/full-privacy-policy#acc-item-31
Viralize
See privacy notice
https://www.iubenda.com/privacy-policy/41798584
Voluum
See privacy notice
https://voluum.com/privacy-policy/
WaardeX
See privacy notice
https://waardex.com/privacy-policy/
Welect
See privacy notice
https://www.de.welect.de/en/privacy-policy/
WMG International
See privacy notice
https://adwmg.com/privacy-policy/
Xandr (formerly Appnexus)
See privacy notice
https://www.xandr.com/privacy/platform-privacy-policy/
Xapads
See privacy notice
https://www.xapads.com/privacy-policy/
Yahoo
See privacy notice
https://legal.yahoo.com/us/en/yahoo/privacy/index.html
Yandex
See privacy notice
https://yandex.com.tr/legal/confidential/01032016/?lang=en
YouAppi
See privacy notice
https://youappi.com/privacy-policy/
Zemanta
See privacy notice
https://www.zemanta.com/privacy/
Hosting
Amazon Web Services (
AWS
)
90 days
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/
Sparkoo
90 days
https://www.huaweicloud.com/intl/en-us/declaration-sg/sa_prp.html
Fraud Detection
DoubleVerify
See privacy notice
https://doubleverify.com/privacy-notice
Prevention of Malicious Ads
The Media Trust
See privacy notice
https://mediatrust.com/privacy-statement
Data Management Platform
Lotame
See privacy notice
https://www.lotame.com/privacy
Digital Audience
See privacy notice
https://digitalaudience.io/legal/
Hybrid Theory
See privacy notice
https://hybridtheory.com/privacy-notice/
EID Provider
ID5
See privacy notice
https://id5.io/platform-privacy-policy
LiveRamp
See privacy notice
https://liveramp.com/privacy/service-privacy-policy
Sub-policy 19
https://www.media.net/privacy-policy/:
Publishers
Advertisers
Contextual SearchSignals
Deals Desk
Privacy Policy
Last Updated and Effective as of
December 18, 2024
Previous Policy
About Our Business
Media.Net Advertising FZ-LLC, working by itself or at times with its affiliated companies, (individually and/or collectively, "Media.Net," "we," "us" or "our") utilizes its digital advertising technology platforms (our "Technology") to assist with the selection, deliver and display of contextual (nonpersonalized) and targeted (personalized) advertising (our "Services") on behalf of the advertisers and their business partners and representatives (collectively "Buyers") on websites and properties (collectively "Seller Sites") owned and/or operated by entities (collectively "Sellers") that participate in our advertising marketplace.
When Does this Privacy Policy Apply?
This Privacy Policy applies:
When we collect information about consumers and other end users who interact with our Services and Technology on Seller Sites. Buyers and Sellers may be referred to as Partners. Click
here
to learn more.
When our Buyers, Sellers, potential Buyers and potential Sellers or other end users interact with our website located at
www.media.net
(our "Website"). Click
here
to learn more.
CONSUMERS AND SELLERS IN CALIFORNIA CAN CLICK
HERE
FOR MORE INFORMATION ABOUT THEIR PRIVACY RIGHTS.
IF YOU ARE SITUATED IN THE EU OR UK, CLICK
HERE
FOR MORE INFORMATION ABOUT YOUR RIGHTS UNDER EU/UK LAW.
NOTICE AT COLLECTION.
This describes the information we collect and the purposes for which we collect it. It covers both the information collected on our Website and through our Services from End Users (individuals who visit our Website or the Website of a Partner). The section of this notice that follows describes the information collected from our Partners.
I. Privacy Practices for End Users
A. Information We Collect
The Technology we use to provide our Services collects information from end users who visit one or more Seller Sites and/or our Website. While this information does not enable us to directly identify you (e.g., we do not receive your name, email address, etc.), it may be considered "personal data" or "personal information" under applicable privacy or data protection laws.
The information we may collect includes:
Online Identifiers
. This includes your IP address, device IDs, cookie identifiers, advertising identifiers (IDFA and Google AdID), and other mobile identifiers.
Seller Site Information
. This includes the web page URL or application through which you are viewing content, referrers viewability data, contextual categories, attributes pertaining to ad formats, click data, types of advertisements viewed and other data that the Seller Sites make available to us.
Device Information
. It includes your browser, device model, device operating system, browser language and device type.
Location Information
. It includes non-precise location information (city, country, zip code) but may also include precise location information if you have actively enabled location services on your device or a Seller partner sends it to us in their bid request (only in case of an opt-in).
Website Usage Data
. This includes information we collect when you visit our Website about how you use the site. This includes information such as web page interactions, time spent on our pages and referral web pages.
Non-Cookie Identifiers
. This includes the local storage or cache in your browser to collect information about you as you browse the Internet.
Information we receive from third parties: We may also receive information from third parties at the instruction of advertising partners or for the benefit of our Seller Sites that provide user demographics, behaviors or interests, obfuscated user identifiers such as hashed email addresses, user preferences on the ad experience and other information that may help make the ads more relevant.
Cookies
. We use cookies, web beacons, mobile SDKs and other web tools ("Tools") to collect information regarding your behavior and usage patterns on our Website and on our Seller Sites. We use these Tools:
For Frequency Capping.
To inform us if an advertisement has been served to the same computer or browser before, and if so, when the advertisement was served. This allows us to ensure that
For Research and Fraud Prevention.
To conduct research and identify fraud and malicious activity.
For our Services.
When you visit one of the Seller Sites we work with, we may assign your computer one or more cookies which enable us and our Buyers to deliver targeted advertisements to you on the Seller Sites. This form of advertising is called "behavioral advertising" or "interest-based advertising". We use cookies (e.g., Google’s advertising cookies) for this purpose. We believe that such advertising is helpful because you will see ads that are relevant to your interests. However, if you would like to opt-out of these interest-based advertisements, please see the section titled "
Your Choices
" below. When you conduct a search or visit Seller Sites that do not engage in interest-based advertising, we may deliver advertising based on search results or the content (context) of the page where the advertising appears. This form of advertising, which is not personalized, is often called “contextual advertising.”
Further, while we do not collect or process sensitive personal information, and our Technology does not deliver targeted ads based on actual or known medical conditions of users, or the treatments they use, nor does it market prescription drugs, we do generate and serve ads for non-sensitive health-related advertising that may be of interest to End Users: diet and fitness; doctors; health care professionals; health conscious; health and medicine; health and well-being; interest in health insurance; and pregnancy and in some cases health advertising that is based on the content of the page on which such ads appear (e.g., we may include an ad for a dietary supplement that complements an article regarding weight loss).
B. For What Purposes Do We Use Your Information?
We use your information in the following ways:
Monitoring for Click-Fraud and Other Advertising Fraud
We collect information related to clicks, views, impressions, robotic mouse movement, non-human clicks, etc. and use it for fraud detection purposes.
Selecting and Delivering Advertising.
We use information about you to select and serve advertising on our Publisher Sites. We present advertisements tailored to the context in which the ad appears (the page or the search results) or the interests you have shown; inferring eligibility of users for interest, general geographic and demographic-based segments; creating online advertising models through lookalike modelling or similar research methodologies.
Improving our Services.
We combine information we collect from consumers with information we obtain from our Partners, ad networks, and/or other companies such as data providers, including our corporate affiliates in order to provide our services, conduct internal analysis in order to perform and improve our services.
Analytics.
Providing insights and reporting back to our Partners, including statistical reporting in connection with the activity on a website or mobile application, optimization of location of ad placement, ad performance, reach and frequency metrics, billing, and logging ads served on a particular day to a particular website or application; evaluating the probability and nature of connections between devices.
Frequency Capping.
Determining whether you have seen a particular advertisement before so as to avoid sending you duplicate advertisements.
Data Privacy.
We respond to data privacy questionnaires, data subject access requests (DSAR).
C. With Whom Do We Share Your Information?
Subject to the section titled "
Additional EU/UK Disclosures
"
,
we may share the information we collect about you with certain third parties in the following ways:
Service Providers.
We use third parties, , operational service providers and subcontractors (also called subprocessors) ("Vendors ") to operate and provide our services to Partners and to comply with legal and regulatory requirements. As necessary under this Privacy Policy, our Vendors are required to protect the information we provide to them in a manner that is consistent with this Privacy Policy. The services provided by Vendors include attribution, analytics, billing, fraud prevention, management of leads/campaigns, dispute resolution, cloud hosting, and technical support. When services are provided by Service Providers (processors or subprocessors) we contractually prohibit them from using any personal information except to provide services to us.
Buyers.
We may share your information with Buyers to help them make decisions regarding buying advertising inventory on Seller Sites or to analyze the effectiveness and performance of advertising campaigns via our Services, explore business opportunities, and perform audits/research.
Sellers.
We share information with our Sellers when we deliver ads on their Seller Sites. Sellers may use your information to make inferences about your preferences in order to serve more relevant advertising to you.
Legal, Government Contacts.
We provide information to third parties for legal process (e.g., in response to a subpoena or civil or criminal investigative demand, court order, or a request from law enforcement or other government agency); to establish or exercise our legal rights; to defend against legal claims; to protect the security and integrity of our assets and business operations; or as otherwise required by law. In addition, we may disclose your information when we believe it is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take other action regarding illegal activity, suspected fraud or other wrongdoing; to protect and defend the rights, property or safety of Media.net, our Partners, our users, our employees, or others; to comply with applicable law or cooperate with law enforcement; or to enforce the terms of service of our Website or other agreements or policies.
Acquisitions & Other Corporate Partners.
We may also provide information to third parties in connection with a substantial corporate transaction, such as the sale of our business, a divestiture, merger, consolidation, or asset sale, or in the unlikely event of bankruptcy.
We may aggregate data so that it is no longer identifiable. That data may be shared with third parties for their business purposes. In addition to the foregoing, we may share your information with anyone provided we have your express consent..
II. Privacy Practices for Partners
A. Information We Collect.
We ask for information about you when you contact us for information about our Services, or when you register to participate in Media.net’s program for use of Media.net Technology. We may also collect information about you when you use our Website or interfaces. Information we obtain from Partners includes:
Contact information
, which includes name, email and mailing address, and other information you may provide that allows us to contact you.
Government Identifiers
, which include your driver’s license number or other identifiers.
Financial Information
, which includes your bank account and other payment information required to collect or receive payments from you.
Online Identifiers
, which includes your IP address, device IDS, cookie identifiers, and lo-information.
Device Information
, which includes your browser and device type.
Location information
, which you may provide to us or we may generate based on your IP address.
Usage Data
, which includes your browsing or search history, web page interactions, referral web page, as well as information about how you use our Website.
Cookies
. We use cookies, web beacons, and other web tools ("Tools") to collect information regarding your behavior and usage patterns on our Website, on our mobile applications (to the extent downloaded to your mobile device). We may use Tools to help our Website function, to analyze your use of our Website and/or reporting of our Services, and to understand our Website visitors and how the Website may be improved.
For more information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
B. How Do We Use Your Information?
We use your information in the following ways:
Customer Service.
We respond to general customer inquiries, troubleshoot technical challenges, up-sell, cross-sell, and provide payment payout support.
Marketing.
We analyze publisher signups, affiliate signups, webinar signups and support our sales team. We may partner with third parties to collect information on our Website to deliver advertising that we believe may interest you based on your activity on the Websites. These third parties may set and access cookies on your computer or other device and may also use pixel tags, web logs, web beacons, or other similar technologies.
Providing our Services.
We combine information we collect from consumers with information we obtain from our Partners, ad networks, and/or other companies such as data providers, including our corporate affiliates in order to provide our services, conduct internal analysis in order to perform and improve our services.
Compliance/Security.
We verify signups through searching publisher email addresses through social media, perform website whois lookup to discover the domain name registration details, review IP addresses location. We also review the quality of traffic onSeller Sites. We review personal data protection online and offline threats on our infrastructure, network, networking equipment, computer systems, computer software, applications installed on the servers, access management, and mitigate the risks.
Data Privacy.
We respond, and assist our client in responding, to data privacy questionnaires, and data subject access requests (DSAR)
Legal Obligations.
We will use your information to comply with our legal obligations when we need to do so, including responding to requests from law enforcement; enforcing our terms and conditions and other legal rights; to protect our company and our employees, and to prevent or address suspicious, or potential illegal activity.
C. With Whom Do We Share Your Information?
Subject to the section titled "Additional EU/UK Disclosures," we share the information we collect from and about you with certain third parties in the following ways:
Service Providers.
We use third parties, Partners, operational service providers and subcontractors (also known as “subprocessors”) ("Vendors") to operate and provide our services to Partners and to comply with legal and regulatory requirements. As necessary under this Privacy Policy, our Vendors are required to protect the information we provide them in a manner that is consistent with this Privacy Policy. Service Providers include fraud prevention service providers and cloud hosting service providers. When services are provided by Service Providers (processors or subprocessors) we contractually prohibit them from using any personal information except to provide services to us.
Legal, Government Contacts.
We provide information to third parties for legal process (e.g., in response to a subpoena or civil or criminal investigative demand, court order, or a request from law enforcement or other government agency); to establish or exercise our legal rights; to defend against legal claims; to protect the security and integrity of our assets and business operations; or as otherwise required by law. In addition, we may disclose your information when we believe it is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take other action regarding illegal activity, suspected fraud or other wrongdoing; to protect and defend the rights, property or safety of Media.net, our Partners, our users, our employees, or others; to comply with applicable law or cooperate with law enforcement; or to enforce the terms of service of our Website or other agreements or policies.
Acquisitions & Other Corporate Partners.
We may also provide information to third parties in connection with a substantial corporate transaction, such as the sale of our business, a divestiture, merger, consolidation, or asset sale, or in the unlikely event of bankruptcy.
We sometimes aggregate data so that it is no longer identifiable. We share aggregated information with third parties for their business purposes.
III. Your Choices.
Your browser may give you the ability to adjust your settings to delete or disable cookies. Some mobile devices enable you to turn off or reset the mobile ad identifier. To opt out using these mechanisms, consult your device settings ("Opt out of Personalized Ads" on Android devices and "Limit Ad Tracking" on iOS devices).
To opt out of receiving interest-based advertising (including retargeting) from our Technology through the use of cookies in your current browser and for more information on what it means to opt out, please go to
https://www.media.net/optout/
. You can also opt-out of receiving personalized ads from us and other third-party advertisers and ad networks who are members of the Network Advertising Initiative ("NAI"). The NAI’s opt-out tool can be found here
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
. More information about system privacy controls and instructions for opting out via your mobile device can be found at
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
. You can find out more about cookies and opt-out from cookies on
www.aboutads.info/choices
in the U.S. and
www.youronlinechoices.com
in the EU/UK. Please note that if you use a different web browser, computer, clear, block, delete or restrict your cookies after opting out, you may need to repeat your choices.
Some of our Partners have their own opt-out mechanisms that are linked from their sites or their online-posted privacy policies. You should review the privacy policies of those companies for these opt-out links if you no longer wish to receive targeted advertising from a particular company, or multiple companies. Google is one of our Partners. To learn more about how Google uses information it collects and/or to access its privacy policy, click
here
.
IV. Rights for California Consumers.
The terms "Business Purpose(s)," "Personal Information," "Sell" (or "Sale"), "Service Provider(s)," and "Third Parties" have the meanings given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act, ("CCPA"). These term references and disclosures describe the rights of California Consumers and provide information about the way we collect and use the personal information of California Consumers.
A. Collection of Personal Information
Categories of Personal Information Collected.
Unique device identifiers such as Cookies, Mobile Ad IDs (IDFAs for iOS and Android Ad IDs), Timestamps, User Agent Strings, IP addresses; General location data that is no more specific than a postal code, and web addresses (also known as "URLs"); Precise Location Information; Internet Activity Information, such as the website URL or mobile app you are browsing, web pages, content, and advertisements you view and links you click on, and whether you open, forward, or click the links in emails we send to you; and your browsing history. For our Partners, we collect: Identifiers such as your name, IP address, email address, and other account information, Unique Device Identifiers, Professional or employment-related information, Internet or other network activity, and Geolocation Information.
How Do We Use Personal Information.
We use personal information to deliver and measure online advertising. For our Partners, we use personal information to market and provide our Services to you.
Categories of Sources from which Personal Information is Collected.
Websites, mobile applications, advertising services, technology platforms. For our Partners, we collect information from you directly and from your use of our Website and mobile applications.
B. Disclosure of Personal Information.
We share information as described above. This section also descrbes how we “sell” information, as that term is used in the CCPA. Categories of Personal Information Sold. Identifiers and inferences about website visitors.
Purposes for Selling or Personal Information.
This data is used by our Advertisers and Partners for more tailored advertising, marketing, measurement, analytics, and research.
Categories of Third Parties to whom Personal Information is Sold.
Advertisers and potential advertisers, , advertising agencies, marketers, technology platforms, Websites, and market research firms.
Categories of Third Parties to whom Personal Information was Disclosed (Sold or Shared) for a Business Purpose.
Advertisers, advertising agencies, marketers, technology platforms, Websites and market research firms.
C. California Consumer Rights & Options.
You have the right to access, correct, or delete Your Personal Information. We do not collect, use, sell, or share sensitive Personal Information, but if we ever do, you will have the right to tell us to limit its use. You may exercise your rights by submitting a privacy rights request
here
or by mailing us at
privacy@media.net
. You can opt out of sale or sharing of your personal information or exercise your "Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information" right via Media.net’s opt-out tool
here
, including by sending a GPC signal from your browser. We may set a non-unique cookie for the sole purpose of implementing your opt-out request. If you opt-out, you should not delete your cookies. If you delete your cookies after opting out, you will need to opt-out again. Please note that because most of the information we store can only identify a particular browser or device, we may not be able to provide you with copies of the personal information we hold if we cannot verify that it is yours. If you ask to delete your personal information, and we cannot determine which information is yours, we may treat your request as a request not to sell your information. We do not honor “Do Not Track” signals that are not officially recognized, but we will honor requests to opt out of sale sent from officially recognized global privacy controls. If an authorized agent submits a request on your behalf, we may require that the authorized agent provide written proof of their authority and we may separately verify your identity and confirm your request with you. If you have any questions about your rights or our disclosures, please contact our privacy officer per the details listed in the section titled
"
Contact Us
" below. We will never discriminate against you because you have exercised these rights.
D. California consumer rights requests metrics:
As a registered databroker in California, we are required to track the requests we receive from California consumers to exercise their rights. Below is our report on the requests we received during calendar year 2023, and our responses:
Requests to delete a consumer’s information:
Requests received: 1
Requests partly or completely fulfilled: 1
Requests denied: 0
Median fulfillment time: 10
Requests to opt out of sale or sharing of a consumer’s information:
Requests received: 221
Requests partly or completely fulfilled: 221
Requests denied: 0
Median fulfillment time: 1
Right to know (Right to know and access information collected, right to know what information is sold)
Requests received: 0
Requests partly or completely fulfilled: 0
Requests denied: 0
Median fulfillment time: NA
Requests to limit use of a consumer’s sensitive information: N/A
(We don’t collect sensitive information)
E. Rights of Consumers in Other U.S. States.
If you are a Virginia, Connecticut, Colorado, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Montana, Delaware, Iowa, Nebraska, New Hampshire or New Jersey consumer, you have the right to:
Confirm whether or not we are processing your personal information and access your personal information;
Correct inaccuracies in your personal data and the purposes for which we are processing it;
Delete your personal information;
Obtain a copy of personal data you have previously provided to us, or in some states, all the personal data we have obtained about you, in a form that allows it to be shared with another controller;
Opt out of targeted advertising;
Opt out of the sale of your personal information;
Opt out of profiling that would be used for significant decisions about you.
If and when global privacy controls or other universal opt-out mechanisms are approved and honoring them is required in your state, you will also have the right to opt-out of sale, targeting, or profiling, or all of these, using these browser-based controls.
We will not discriminate against you in any way for exercising these rights.
For certain requests, we may email you to confirm your identity. You can email us at
privacy@media.net
or make your request
here
.
V. Additional EU/UK Disclosures
A. Data controller. We are the data controller for all processing of l Personal Information collected through our Website. When we perform Services, we generally act as a data controller for the personal information we process, but we sometimes perform Services as a Processor for one of our customers. If you have a complaint, contact our privacy office per the details listed in the section titled "
Contact Us
"
below. You also have the right to contact the data protection authority in your country.
Our EU-GDPR Representative is:
Rickert Rechtsanwaltsgesellschaft mbH
- MediaNet -
Colmantstraße 15
53115 Bonn
Germany
art-27-rep-medianet@rickert.law
Our UK-GDPR Representative is:
Rickert Services Ltd UK
- MediaNet -
PO Box 1487
Peterborough
PE1 9XX
United Kingdom
art-27-rep-medianet@rickert-services.uk
B.
Legal Basis for our Processing of Your Personal Information.
Below are the types of lawful basis that we will rely on to process your Personal Information:
Consent Consent means your freely given, specific, informed agreement to processing, shown by an affirmative action you have taken to communicate that you agree to your personal information being processed.We rely on Consent as the legal process for placing Tools on your browser or device, and for using them to store information on your device. We also rely on Consent as the legal basis for providing personalized advertising. When we provide Services that facilitate the delivery of personalized advertising, including the use of a your behavior across web sites and over time, or the development of a profile, we also rely on Consent.If we provide Services that make it possible to deliver personalized content to you, we will rely on Consent as the legal basis for the data processing required.For Website analytics we sometimes rely on Consent, and sometimes legitimate interest, depending on the data collected, and legal basis used by Sellers and Buyers
Legitimate Interest means the interest of our business in conducting and managing our business to enable us to give you the best service/product and the best and most secure experience. We make sure we consider and balance any potential impact on you (both positive and negative) and your rights before we process your Personal Information for our legitimate interests. We do not use your Personal Information for activities where our interests are overridden by the impact on you (unless we have your consent or are otherwise required or permitted to by law). We also do not use your Personal Information where such interests are overridden by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
We sometimes rely on our legitimate interest to use limited information (such as the content you are currently viewing, or your general geographic area) to provide basic ads to you.  We do not believe that the use of this general information, which is not used to create a profile of you, presents substantial risks to you as a data subject.  Any risks are outweighed by the benefits all parties derive from using basic advertising to support the delivery of Content.
When a Seller relies on its legitimate interest to process limited personal information for the delivery of basic ads, instead of obtaining your consent to do so, we too rely on our legitimate interest to perform the services that make it possible to provide basic ads.  Similarly when a Seller uses limited personal information to select content, we too rely on our legitimate interest to do so.  In both of these cases there is little risk to your rights and freedoms based on the limited personal information used.
We rely on legitimate interest to determine how many times an advertisement has been presented to you so that you do not see it too often, and to detect fraud so that Sellers only pay for legitimate advertising views.  In both of these cases, the risk to the data subject based on the limited data used is smaller than the benefit that we, the Sellers, Buyers, and Partners, and you the data subject, derive from maintaining the usefulness and integrity of the advertising services we provide.  Similarly, we rely on our legitimate interest to measure the performance of advertising.  This too helps to ensure the quality and integrity of the advertising Services without adding any substantial risk to your rights and freedoms.
We rely on our legitimate interest to use the data we are processing when we perform Services to support, develop, and improve our Services.  This does not present any additional risk to You and it helps us provide high quality Services that benefit you and the Sellers, Buyers, and Partners who rely on us.
You can obtain further information about how we assess our legitimate interests against any potential impact on you in respect of specific activities by submitting a privacy rights request
here
or by contacting us at
privacy@media.net
Performance of Contract means processing your data where it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are a party or to take steps at your request before entering into such a contract.
We rely on this legal basis for processing when we process the business contact information of Partners and clients to which we provide Services.
Comply with a legal or regulatory obligation means processing your Personal Information where it is necessary for compliance with a legal or regulatory obligation that we are subject.
If we are required to provide personal information to a data protection authority or other legal authority, we do so in reliance on this legal basis for processing
C. Participation in the advertising industry Transparency and Consent Framework. We participate in the IAB Europe’s Transparency and Consent Framework (“TCF”), which allows you to better understand who is providing advertising services to you on the websites you visit, and gives you choices about who may process your personal information. We are a registered vendor (142) on the IAB Europe’s Global Vendor List (GVL).
D. Sharing of Personal Information. We share information as described
above
.
E. Additional EU/UK Privacy Rights. If we are relying on your consent to process your Personal Information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. You have the right to request that we correct or erase your personal information. You also have the right to object to some or all of our processing and to object to automated decision-making with significant or legal effects. You can exercise your rights at any time by submitting a privacy rights request
here
or by contacting us at
privacy@media.net
.
F. Modifications to this Privacy Policy. We may edit, amend, modify, and update our Privacy Policy at any time and from time to time, by posting updated text on or links to our Website. When we make material changes to our Privacy Policies or our privacy practices, we will notify you by posting a notice on our Website or providing a notice to you. We display the Effective Date at the top of our Privacy Policy so that you will know when there has been a change in its effective date. By using our Website or our Technology or any Publisher Site using our Technology after the effective date, you will have agreed and be deemed to have agreed to comply with and be legally bound by the updated Privacy Policies.
G. Cross border transfers. Our Website and technology infrastructure is primarily maintained in the United States. If you are visiting our Website or Seller Sites from the regions with laws governing data collection and use that may differ from those in the United States, please note that you may be transferring your information to the United States and to other countries around the world. By using our Website, you agree to export and use your information within the United States and in other countries as specified in this Privacy Policy. If you are situated in the EU/UK, whenever we transfer your Personal Data out of the EU/UK, we ensure appropriate and suitable safeguards are used to protect your Personal Information . Where we use certain service providers, or provide Services ourselves, we may use specific contracts including data processing agreements based on the EU/EEA Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure these safeguards are in place.
VI. Sensitive Information.
We ask that you not send us, and you not disclose, any sensitive personal information (e.g.,social security numbers, information related to racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religion or other beliefs, health, criminal background, or trade union membership) on or through our Website, or our Services or otherwise to us.
VII. Third Party Practices.
This Privacy Policy applies solely to our privacy practices, and not to the practices of other parties. We encourage you to review the privacy statements of every website that you visit to be sure you understand the terms and conditions that apply to you from each of them.
VIII. Data Retention.
We will only retain information relating to you for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements. To determine the appropriate retention period for such information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the information, the purposes for which we process your information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements. Unless contrary to applicable laws, except with respect to information about our Partners with whom we have an ongoing relationship, our policy is to retain the non-aggregated information we collect for up to 24 months, after which the data is either anonymized or deleted from our systems. And as permitted by law, we may continue to retain aggregated information. In some circumstances, if you are an EU/UK data subject, you can ask us to delete your Personal Data by submitting a privacy rights request
here
or by sending us an email to
privacy@media.net
. We use commercially reasonable procedures to protect the personal information that we collect. However, we cannot guarantee the security of our databases, nor can we guarantee that personal information you supply won’t be intercepted while being transmitted to us over the internet.
IX. Children.
Our Website is intended for an audience above the age of 18. Neither our Website nor our Technology / advertising services are developed for, intended for, or directed at, children, and we do not knowingly collect information from or about children under the age of 16 (or such other age as may be restricted under local law). If you believe your child has provided his or her information to us, please submit a privacy rights request
here
or contact us at
privacy@media.net
.
X. Contact Us.
If you have any questions relating to this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
privacy@media.net
or mail us at:
Privacy Officer
Media.net Advertising FZ-LLC
2701 Aurora Tower, Dubai Media City
Dubai 215028, UAE
Let’s talk about what Media.net can do for you!
Get in Touch
Sub-policy 20
https://smartadserver.com/end-user-privacy-policy:
End-Users Privacy Policy
Summary
Equativ (ex Smart AdServer) is a French company specializing in digital advertising. Our clients and supply partners (“
Supply Partners
”), in particular website publishers, mobile applications or ad monetization platforms partners, ask us to select and display ads on their environments, according to various criteria, such as your interests, your location, the type of device used, or the content of the page visited, etc.
We only process your personal data necessary for the personalization of the advertisements if you give us your consent (through the banners set up by the publishers). Your personal data  is protected according to security standards in compliance with applicable laws.
You will find on this page all the details on our operation and the various means to assert your rights.
1. Who are we?
Equativ (“
Equativ
”, “
our
”, “
us
”, “
we
”) is an ad monetization platform, Supply Side Platform (“
Platform
”) providing programmatic buyers with exclusive access to high quality premium publisher inventory, i.e. the websites you are visiting and/or services you are using. As an independent, publisher-focused platform, we help our Supply Partners monetize their digital inventories (“
Services
”) so that they can continue offering users (“
Users
”, “
you
”, “
your
”) content.
Our technology gathers User information to optimize the delivery of digital advertising to you. We use this information to effectively display ads on any connected devices you are using to deliver, tailor advertising to you, when permitted and for statistical reporting and analytics purposes, as explained below.
Equativ is located at 66 rue de la Chaussée d’Antin, 75009 Paris, France. If you have any questions regarding privacy, you can contact us at privacy@equativ.com.
The purpose of this Privacy Policy is to explain what information we gather, for which purposes, how we use that information and what we do to protect it in the context of the provision of our services to our Supply Partners. This policy provides details about choices you can make with regards to how we gather and use information about you (“
Personal Data
”). This Privacy Policy applies when we receive your Personal Data when navigating on websites, mobiles and/or applications of our Supply Partners using our Services and/or on any connected devices. Our network of Supply Partners includes a large variety of companies among which Google ; please refer to Google’s website in order to understand
how Google uses information from sites or apps that use their services
as well as
cookies and similar technologies used by Google
in their advertising products. For more information regarding the processing of your Personal Data when navigating on our corporate website please read our Corporate Privacy Policy
here
. For more information on the cookies used when navigating on our corporate website, please check our Cookies Policy
here
.
Equativ participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies.Our identification number within the Framework is ID45.
2. How do we collect data?
Equativ uses technologies like cookies, tags, and mobile SDKs to collect the data and store it on a User’s device.
Cookies are small text files that contain a string of characters, stored in the User’s device. They allow us to recognize and remember the user’s browser, preferences and other information.
The Equativ tag is a small piece of code that is inserted into a Client’s website source code, which allows them to have access and manage our services.
An SDK, or Software Development Kit, is the software used by our Supply Partners to integrate Equativ to their mobile application (iOS and Android).
Web beacons are used to help our Supply Partners understand how visitors interact with their websites. Pixel tags are transparent images, iFrames, or JavaScript that are placed on a site. The use of a pixel tag allows a website to measure the actions of the visitor opening the page that contains the tag.
3. What data do we process?
When navigating on our Client’s websites, mobiles and/or application and/or on any connected devices (including connected TV) we may collect:
– your IP address;
– cookie information, for example your unique browser ID (Equativ ID; universal identifier when applicable);
– technical information about the device: browser, operating system, screen size;
– information about the geographic location of the device when it accesses a website;
– pseudonymous ID of audience segmentation (if the website uses this type of system);
– information about other identifiers assigned to the device (IDFA, AAID);
– information about the user’s activity on the device, including web pages and mobile apps visited or used.
Please note that as part of our Services
we do not collect any information that could directly identify you
. This means we do not know who you are. We do not know your name, your address, your place of work, your date of birth, your email address, or your phone number. We do not collect sensitive information as defined under the General Data Protection Regulation  (such as your religious affiliation, political opinions or health details). We do not create segments and do not specifically target children under 13 years old or 16 years old respectively according to applicable laws
Under US Privacy laws, we may process sensitive personal information such as precise geolocation only in in-app environments.
4. For which purposes and on which legal grounds will Personal Data be processed?
a. Purposes
Equativ receives, collects or processes Personal Data for the following purposes:
– Store and/or access information on a device;
– Select basic ads;
– Select personalized ads;
– Measure ad performance;
– Develop and improve products;
– Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug;
– Technically deliver ads or content;
– Use precise geolocation data, where applicable.
b. Legal grounds
When we are operating as a data controller, meaning that we determine the purposes and the means of the processing, we rely on either: i) User consent, if required; or ii) our legitimate interest.
When we are operating as a data processor, we are processing the data on behalf of our Supply Partners based on their instructions. Therefore, they are accountable for the establishment of an appropriate legal basis for the processing of the data. You can find this information in their own Privacy Policy available on their website.
5. To whom do we provide your Personal Data? Who can have access to your Personal Data?
We may share information, including Personal Data, to our affiliates and with trusted third parties that provide services for Equativ, such as hosting and internet connectivity, Demand-Side Partners (DSP), third-party data providers or advertisers, and anti-fraud tools providers. When permitted we may also share data with trusted business partners in order to perform or enhance our products and services.
We may also disclose information if:
– we are required by national or international law or legislation to do so;
– we must comply with an authorized request or demand;
– it is necessary in order to defend our own rights or interests.
Finally, we may transfer your data to a successor entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change.
6. How long do we store the data?
The data we use to provide our Services is being kept up to thirteen months, depending on the cookie or tag storing it. For more details about the storage duration, please see the table below.
We may also store your personal data contained in our logs for up to 50 days.
7. Your GDPR privacy rights
When we are operating as a data controller, you can exercise your rights and address your request directly to Equativ. Please note that we process Personal Data on behalf of Publishers, which means that  in some cases, it may be appropriate for you to exercise your rights directly on the website of the concerned Publisher.
You may ask us at any time:
– to confirm your Personal Data is being processed and/or to provide you a copy of your Personal Data;
– to rectify your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or incomplete;
– to withdraw your consent;
– to erase your Personal Data, for instance if it is unlawfully processed or if you withdraw your consent;
– to opt out the process of any data;
– to restrict the processing of your Personal Data, (i) if the information is inaccurate, (ii) the processing is unlawful, (iii) you need us to retain the information after the retention for a legal claim, or (iv) you have objected to the processing and a verification of our legitimate interests is pending;
– to provide you with an electronic file of your Personal Data, or to transfer your Personal Data to a third party, if technically feasible (portability).
Before sending any requests, please note and consider that it is not feasible for us to provide Personal Data that is tied to your identity. Instead, you can provide us with your EquativID and/or mobile ID and we will be able to connect to this information with the Personal Data tied to this ID (see section:
How to find your advertising ID
below).
Your request should be addressed to privacy@equativ.com. We will respond within one month. If permitted under applicable legislation, we may extend the response period to two months if such is necessary due to the complexity and number of requests. We will notify and explain the reasons for any extension to you. If we deny your request, we will inform you of the reasons for such denial.
If you consider your rights have been infringed upon according to the current privacy regulation, or regarding the denial of a request, you may lodge a complaint towards your local competent supervisory authority.
How to find your advertising ID
How to find your EquativID on a browser:
You have the possibility to oppose the deposit of cookies and to have access to a list of your cookies by configuring your browser.
–
Chrome
: Follow the primary instructions under “
Delete cookies from a site
” section. Search for equativ.com. Click on it and search for the cookie named “
pid
”. You can find your ID number under “
Content
”.
–
Mozilla
: Follow the primary instructions under “
Delete cookies for a single site
”. Search for equativ.com. Search and click on the “
pid
” cookie. You can find your ID number under “
Content
”.
–
Opera
: Follow the instructions under Configuring cookie settings and “
Manage cookies
”. Search for equativ.com. Search and click on the “
pid
” cookie. You can find your ID number under “
Content
”.
–
Safari
: Follow the primary instruction under “
Remove stored cookies and data
”. Search for equativ.com. Search and click on the “
pid
” cookie. You can find your ID number under “
Content
” in the pid.
The links above will also guide you
for the management and erasure of cookies
within your browser.
How to find your ID on mobile:
– If you are using an iOS system (IDFA): for iOS devices, the advertising ID is hidden from users by default by Apple but can be retrieved with third-party apps. In order to find your Apple IDFA, a third party tool is required. There is wide selection of apps that can show a device’s IDFA to users
– Adjust Insights by Adjust
– Branch Device ID Finder, by Branch
– My Device Identifiers, by Kochava
– Singular Device Assist, by Singular Labs
– If you are using an Android system (AAID): for Android devices, open the Google Setting app on your device and click on “Ads”. Your AAID will be listed at the bottom of the screen.
8. Your Privacy Rights under U.S Privacy laws
This section of the Privacy Policy aims at providing information on the relevant U.S Privacy laws and particularly the rights therein (under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA), Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA), Colorado Privacy Act (CoPA), Connecticut Data Privacy Act (CTDPA), Utah Consumer Privacy Act  (UCPA)
When you are navigating on our Client’s websites and/or using their apps on your devices, we may collect Personal Information, notably via the use of cookies or other tracking technologies as a Third Party, Processor, or Controller/Business as the case may be.
For information on the categories of personal data or information we collect, the sources from which such data or information is collected, the purposes of collecting such data or information and with whom we may share those, please refer to the sections above.
Under the abovementioned Privacy laws you have the following rights:
US Privacy laws
Applicable Privacy Rights
CCPA
The Right to know
about the personal information we collect and how we use it. For more information please refer to the ‘what data do we process’ section above or contact us directly.
The Right to Delete.
Upon your request, we will delete the personal information we have collected about you ,subject to applicable legal exceptions.
The Right to Opt-Out of the Sale or Sharing of your personal information.
As we do not directly face End-Users, our client Publishers do, you will need to exercise such rights directly to such Publisher. You can also opt-out through the following link:
The Right to Correct
inaccurate personal information that we may have on you.
The Right to limit
the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information collected, where and if applicable.
The Right to Non-Discrimination for the exercise of a Consumer’s Privacy Rights.
We will not deny goods or services, charge you a different price, or provide a different level or quality of goods or services because you exercised your rights under the CCPA
.
VCDPA
The Right to Confirm
if we are actually processing your personal data and to
Access
such personal data.
The Right to Correct
inaccuracies in your personal data that we have collected taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing
The Right to Delete
personal data provided by you or obtained about you,  subject to applicable legal exceptions.
The Right to Obtain
copies of the personal data that you previously provided to us in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means.
The Right to Opt out
of the processing of personal data for purposes of targeted advertising or the sale of personal data or, where and if applicable, profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
CoPA
The Right of Access and to Confirm
whether the processing of your personal data concerning you.
The Right to Correct
any inaccuracies in your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of such personal data.
The Right to Delete
your personal data, subject to applicable legal exceptions.
The Right to Data Portability
. When exercising the right to access personal data you also have the right to obtain the personal data in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another entity without hindrance, provided such transfer shall not be required to reveal any trade secret. Please note that under Colorado Privacy law, you may exercise such right no more than two times per calendar year.
The Right to opt out
of targeted ads, the sale of their personal data, or, where and if applicable, profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects on you.
CTDPA
The Right to
Confirm
whether or not your personal data is being processed and
Access
such personal data, unless such confirmation or access would require us to reveal a trade secret.
The Right to
Correct
inaccuracies in your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing.
The Right to
Delete
personal data provided by, or obtained about you.
The Right to
Obtain
a copy of your personal data in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means, provided such controller shall not be required to reveal any trade secret.
The Right to
Opt out
of the processing of the personal data for purposes of targeted advertising, the sale of personal data, or, where and if applicable, profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects on you.
UCPA
The
Right to Confirm
the processing of your personal data and to
Access
your personal data.
The
Right to Delete
your personal data, provided legal exceptions.
The
Right to Obtain a copy
of your personal data, in a format that: (a) to the extent technically feasible, is portable; (b) to the extent practicable, is readily usable; and (c) allows you to transmit the data to another controller without impediment, where the processing is carried out by automated means.
The
Right to Opt out
of the processing of the consumer’s personal data for purposes of: targeted advertising or the sale of personal data.
Nothing in the exercise of such rights should be construed as a requirement for us to disclose any trade secret.
When we are operating as a Data controller or Business, you can exercise your rights and address your request directly to Equativ by contacting us at
privacy@equativ.com
Please note that we do not directly face End-Users, our client Publishers do, in such case, it may be appropriate for you to exercise your rights directly on the website of the concerned Publisher. For example, you can opt-out of the processing of your personal data or information for a sale, share or targeted advertising by clicking on the link “Do not sell or Share My Personal Information” or by directly contacting their privacy team.
To appeal our  decision regarding a request related to these rights, you may email us at p
rivacy@equativ.com
.
9. Transfer of Personal Data outside of the European Union
Personal Data may be transferred to our affiliates or a partner located outside the EU/EEA including to third-countries for which the European Commission has not adopted an adequacy decision yet. With these partners, we ensure that appropriate safeguards are implemented to ensure an adequate level of protection including but not limited to the signature of standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission.
10. Opt-out and withdrawing of consent (GPDR)
For the sake of transparency, Equativ has adopted a cookie opt-out policy, allowing each Internet user to opt out from our advertising network. This ensures that your browser will no longer be identified by our system. Please note that for us to acknowledge your desire to opt-out, one cookie will be placed on your device in order to ensure the performance of your opt-out. Moreover, this opt-out will only be available for the device on which it was created. If you wish to opt-out, click
here
. A blank page will open, confirming the opt-out process has been completed and Equativ will no longer place cookies on your computer.
You can withdraw your consent, as the case may be, at any time directly on the website.
You can also accept or reject some or all cookies (for example, blocking all third-party cookies) directly on your browser by adjusting your browser settings. However, please note that some websites may not be accessible or function properly if you decide to opt-out from all cookies. If you do not know how to do this, the links below set out information about how to change your browser settings for some of the most commonly used web browsers:
–
Chrome
–
Safari
–
Firefox
–
Internet Explorer
–
Microsoft Edge
For mobile devices you can also refer to the following links:
–
Chrome
–
Safari
11. How do we ensure the security of your Personal Data ?
In order to ensure and maintain the security of your Personal Data, we have implemented all technical and organizational measures at our disposal to prevent your data from being unintentionally and accidentally lost, used, altered, or made available to the public without your authorization.
Should such an event occur, we have implemented measures to react promptly and to inform you and the competent authorities when necessary.
12. Amendment of this Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to update this Privacy Policy from time to time in order to reflect any change to our products or services or to comply with changes in our legal and/or regulatory obligations. Please check this page for any updates.
13. More questions?
If you have questions about this Privacy Policy, you may e-mail us at privacy@equativ.com or contact our DPO at dpo@equativ.com.
Last update: 2024
Equativ uses cookies to improve the site, analyze site usage, and enhance your browsing experience. By clicking "Accept", you accept the storing of analytics cookies on your device. However you may visit Cookie Settings to provide a controlled consent. You can find out more about which cookies we are using or switch them off in
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Settings
Cookie settings
Close GDPR Cookie Settings
Privacy Overview
Necessary Cookies
Analytics Cookies
Functional Cookies
Cookie Policy
Powered by
GDPR Cookie Compliance
Privacy Overview
This website uses cookies to improve your experience while you navigate through the website. Out of these cookies, the cookies that are categorized as necessary are stored on your browser as they are essential for the working of basic functionalities of the website. We also use third-party cookies that help us analyze and understand how you use this website. These cookies will be stored in your browser only with your consent. You also have the option to opt-out of these cookies. But opting out of some of these cookies may have an effect on your browsing experience.
Necessary Cookies
Necessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. These cookies ensure basic functionalities and security features of the website, anonymously.
Enable or Disable Cookies
If you disable this cookie, we will not be able to save your preferences. This means that every time you visit this website you will need to enable or disable cookies again.
Analytics Cookies
This website uses Matomo to collect anonymous information such as the number of visitors to the site, and the most popular pages.
Keeping this cookie enabled helps us to improve our website.
Enable or Disable Cookies
Please enable Strictly Necessary Cookies first so that we can save your preferences!
Functional Cookies
This website uses the following additional cookies:
Cookie Policy
Enable or Disable Cookies
Please enable Strictly Necessary Cookies first so that we can save your preferences!
Cookie Policy
More information about our
Cookie Policy
Sub-policy 21
https://maze.co/privacy-policy/:
Privacy policy
Last updated: 22 January 2025
Table of Contents
1.
Maze approach to privacy
2.
Our role in relation to your personal information
3.
Personal information we collect about you and how we use it
4.
Cookies and similar technologies
5.
Information we share with third parties
6.
Marketing and advertising
7.
Storing and protecting your personal information
8.
Your rights in respect of your personal information
9.
Location of your personal information
10.
Notice on EU-US Data Privacy Framework and UK Extension
11.
Links to third party sites
12.
Changes to this policy
13.
Notice to you
14.
Children
15.
Complaints
16.
Contacting us
Annexes
1.
Maze approach to privacy
1.1
We operate a service which allows you to import, and validate your design using our website located at
https://maze.co
and our mobile application (the “
Service
”).
1.2
We appreciate your interest in our Service. Privacy protection is very important to us and we are committed to protecting you and respecting your privacy. This privacy policy sets out information about how we collect, store, process, transfer, share and use data that identifies or is associated with you when providing our Service (hereinafter “personal information”).
1.3
The Service is operated by
MAZE.DESIGN INC.
(“
Maze
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) and we act as a data controller in relation to the personal information we hold about you. Our registered address is 800 Menlo Ave, Suite 220, Menlo Park, CA 94025.
2.
Our role in relation to your personal information
2.1
We process two broad categories of personal information when you access the Service:
your personal information as a business customer (or potential business customer) of the Service, or as a user of our website or mobile application (hereinafter “
Customer Data
”); and
your personal information that we received from a business customer who signed you up as a tester/participant on the Service (hereinafter “
Participant Data
”).
2.2
For the purposes of data protection laws, we act as: (i) the controller of Customer Data, but as (ii) a processor of Participant Data (acting on behalf of the business customer who provided your personal information to us in the first place). A controller decides why and how to process personal information. A processor processes personal information on behalf of a controller based on the controller’s instructions.
3.
Personal information we collect about you and how we use it
Customer Data
3.1
We collect Customer Data about you when you voluntarily submit such data directly to us through our Service. This can include information you provide to us when you register with us, edit your profile, uploaded content, purchase services, correspond with us, respond to a survey, enter a promotion or use some other feature of our Service.
3.2
At various places on our site you may be requested to enter certain personal information. Personal information that must be provided in order to use the requested services will be indicated at the time of collection. If you choose not to provide this personal information, we may not be able to provide some or all of the features and functionalities of the Service to you or respond to your other requests. Other personal information that you are not required to provide in order to receive our services may be voluntarily given and you are free to decide not to give such personal information.
3.3
The annexes
sets out the categories of Customer Data we collect about you and how we use that information. The table also lists the legal basis which we rely on to process the personal information and the recipients of the personal information. Please also refer to the section titled
‘Cookies and similar technologies’
below.
3.4
We also automatically collect Customer Data indirectly about how you access and use the Service and information about the device you use to access the Service.
3.5
We may link or combine the Customer Data we collect directly from you and the Customer Data we collect automatically from you. This allows us to provide you with a personalised experience regardless of how you interact with us.
3.6
We may also link or combine the Customer Data we collect directly from you and other personal data we collect about you using publicly-accessible sources such as ZoomInfo, Clearbit or LinkedIn. All additional personal data collected from these third-party sources has been made public by you.
3.7
We may anonymise and aggregate any of the Customer Data we collect about you (so that it does not directly identify you). We may use such anonymised information for purposes that include testing our IT systems, research, data analysis, improving our site and developing new products and features.
Participant Data
3.8
We do not collect Participant Data for our own purposes. Instead, we receive such Participant Data about you from the business customer who signed you up as a participant on the Service, or collect it directly from you for the benefit of, and on instructions from, the business customer who signed you up as a participant on the Service. Maze allows Customers to make screen recordings of Participant activity on a web site or application that are part of a Maze (“Recording”). Customer is responsible for obtaining the necessary consents from and disclosing to Participants the information that Customer will collect.
3.9
Should you wish to obtain more information about the categories of Participant Data that we collect on behalf of, and pursuant to instructions from, the business customer who signed you up as a participant on the Service, and/or about the purposes for collecting such Participant Data, please contact them.
4.
Cookies and similar technologies
What are cookies?
We may collect information using ‘cookies’. Cookies are small data files stored on the hard drive of your computer or mobile device by a website or web application. We may use both session cookies (which expire once you close your web browser) and persistent cookies (which stay on your computer or mobile device until you delete them) to provide you with a more personal and interactive experience on our Service.
Cookies we use
Our Service uses the following types of cookies for the purposes set out below:
Essential cookies
Purpose:
These cookies are deemed as essential to provide you with the required services. Without these cookies, we are unable to provide operational services to you. We only use these cookies to provide you with those services.
Third-parties:
Stripe
Functional cookies
Purpose:
These cookies enable us to provide additional features of the service. The purpose of these cookies is to provide you with a more personal experience, and enhance your user experience while interacting with our services.
Third-parties:
Zendesk
Marketing cookies
Purpose:
These cookies enable us to provide a personalised experience and promote content that may likely be of interest to you. These cookies use information about your browsing history to group you with other users who have similar interests. Based on that information, and with our permission, third party advertisers may place cookies to enable them to show adverts which we think will be relevant to your interests while you are on third party websites.
Third-parties:
Google Tag Manager, Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, HighTouch
Analytics cookies
Purpose:
These cookies are used to collect information about traffic to our Service and how users use our Service. The information gathered via these cookies does not ‘directly’ identify any individual visitor. However, it may render such visitors ‘indirectly identifiable’. This is because the information collected is typically linked to a pseudonymous identifier associated with the device you use to access our Service.  The information collected is aggregated and anonymous. We use this information to help operate our Service more efficiently, to gather broad demographic information and to monitor the level of activity on our Service.
Third-parties:
Segment, Amplitude, Google Analytics, Hotjar, RescueMetrics
Social Media cookies
Purpose:
These cookies are used when you share information using a social media sharing button or ‘like’ button on our site or you link your account or engage with our content on or through a social networking website such as Facebook, Twitter or LinkedIn. The social network will record that you have done this.
Third-parties:
Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn
Disabling cookies
You can typically remove or reject cookies via your browser settings. In order to do this, follow the instructions provided by your browser (usually located within the ‘settings’, ‘help’ or ‘tools’ menu).  Many browsers are set to accept cookies until you change your settings.
If you do not accept our cookies, you may experience some inconvenience in your use of our Service. For example, we may not be able to recognise your computer or mobile device and you may need to log in every time you visit our Service.
Further information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your computer or mobile device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.com.uk.
In particular, you can disable cookies which remember your browsing habits and target advertising at you by visiting https://www.youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices. If you choose to remove targeted or advertising cookies, you will still see adverts but they may not be relevant to you. Even if you do choose to remove cookies by the companies listed at the above link, not all companies that serve online behavioral advertising are included in this list, and so you may still receive some cookies and tailored adverts from companies that are not listed.
5.
Information we share with third parties
5.1
We may share any of your personal information with the following parties (to the limited extent required in accordance with the uses set out in Annexes
1
and
2
):
(a) Companies in the same group of companies as us:
our subsidiaries (i.e. any organisation we own or control) or our holding company or ultimate holding company (i.e. any organisation that owns or controls us) and any subsidiaries they own. For the avoidance of doubt, this includes MAZE.DESIGN LIMITED, in relation to which section 10 of this privacy policy titled “
Notice on EU-US Data Privacy Framework and UK Extension
” will apply. These companies will only use your personal information in the same way as we can under this privacy policy.
(b) Service providers and advisors:
third parties who provide a service to us. For example, third party service providers that provide our IT infrastructure or help support it, help us to provide you with support in relation to the Service, process payments from you on our behalf, organise and host in-person and virtual events on our behalf, develop analytical information for us about our products and services and provide professional services such as legal and accountancy services. These third parties will only be allowed to use your personal information in accordance with our instructions and will be required to keep your information secure.
(c) Purchasers of our business:
personal information may be disclosed or transferred to buyers or prospective buyers of our business or any of our assets as part of any such sale. We will take all reasonable steps to ensure that such recipients will use your personal information in a way that is consistent with this privacy policy.
(d) Law enforcement, regulators and other parties for legal reasons:
third parties to whom we are under a legal obligation to disclose your personal information or to whom we need to disclose your personal information to protect our rights, property or safety or to protect the rights, property or safety of others. We may also disclose personal information to third parties to help detect and investigate illegal activities and breaches of any agreement we have with you.
5.2
We do not disclose information about identifiable individuals to anyone else except as set out above. We may provide third parties with aggregate statistical information and analytics about users of our Service but we will make sure no one can be identified from this information before we disclose it.
6.
Marketing and advertising
6.1
From time to time we may contact you with information about our products and services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email. For some marketing messages we may use Customer Data we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you. We do not use Participant Data we received about you for marketing purposes.
6.2
We will only send marketing messages to users who have chosen to receive them. We will ask you if you would like to receive these messages when we first collect your contact details. You can also change your marketing preference at a later date by following the instructions outlined below:
Click on the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our marketing emails.
If you have an online account with us, you might be able to opt-out of marketing emails, features updates through your account settings.
Email us at privacy@maze.design.
6.3
Please note that if you do opt-out of or do not grant consent to receiving marketing related messages from us, we may still send you non-marketing messages, such as communications relating to the provision of our Service.
6.4
Please rest assured that we will not sell your personal information to a third-party for commercial purposes.
7.
Storing and protecting your personal information
7.1	Retention period
: We will store Customer Data n we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes set out in
Annex 1
and
Annex 2
and in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests.
7.2 Security:
We implement appropriate and reasonable technical and organisational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change, or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored on our secure servers. We also limit access to your personal information to those employees and other staff who have a business need to have such access. We have put in place procedures to deal with any actual or suspected personal data breach. In the event of any such breach, we have systems in place to work with applicable regulators. In addition, in certain circumstances, we may notify you of breaches affecting your personal information where we are legally required to do so.
7.3 Phishing:
We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting your account ID, password, credit or debit card information or national identification numbers.
8.
Your rights in respect of your personal information
8.1
If you are resident in the United Kingdom or the European Economic Area, in accordance with applicable privacy law, you have the following rights in respect of your personal information that we hold:
(a)
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain:
(i)
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal information;
(ii)
information about the categories of personal information we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal information and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
(iii)
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal information; and
(iv)
a copy of the personal information we hold about you.
(b)
Right of portability
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal information you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal information to another person.
(c)	Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal information we hold about you.
(d)
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal information if the continued processing of that personal information is not justified.
(e)
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal information if the continued processing of the personal information in this way is not justified, such as where the accuracy of the personal information is contested by you.
(f)
Right to object
. You have a right, in some circumstances, to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests. There may, however, be compelling reasons for continuing to process your personal information, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case.
8.2
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this privacy policy. You may also review and edit the personal information you have submitted to us by logging into your account on our website. Please note that if you submit a request to exercise one of these rights in relation to Participant Data we hold about you, we will forward your request to the controller of such Participant Data (i.e. the business customer who signed you up as a participant on the Service) as they are responsible for responding to it.
8.3
We may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and ensure your right to access your personal information. This is a security measure to ensure that personal information is not disclosed to any person who has no right to receive it.
8.4
We will try to respond to all legitimate requests relating to Customer Data within 30 days. Occasionally it may take us longer if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
8.5
Residents in other jurisdictions may have similar rights to the above. If you would like to exercise one of these rights, please contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this privacy policy. We will comply with any request to the extent required under applicable law.
9.
Location of your personal information
9.1
Many of our service providers are based outside the United Kingdom or the European Economic Area, so their processing of your personal information will involve a transfer of data to countries based outside of that territory.
9.2
We are under a legal obligation to ensure that people to whom we provide your personal information hold it subject to appropriate safeguards and controls. Whenever we transfer your personal information out of the United Kingdom or the European Economic Area, we ensure a similar degree of protection is afforded to it by implementing measures which comply with applicable privacy law. To receive details of those measures, please contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this privacy policy.
10.
Notice on EU-US Data Privacy Framework and UK Extension
MAZE.DESIGN INC. (“
Maze
”) complies with (i) the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), and (ii) the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (collectively, the ”
Data Privacy Framework
”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Maze has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that Maze adheres to (i) the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the EU in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, and (ii) from the UK (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (collectively, the “
DPF Principles
”). If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF), and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
As described in the DPF Principles (
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/EU-US-Framework
), Maze is accountable for personal data that it receives and subsequently transfers to third parties. If third parties that process personal data on our behalf do so in a manner that does not comply with the DPF Principles, we are accountable, unless we prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. The types of third parties with which we may share your personal data are set out in section 5 of this privacy policy entitled “Information we share with third parties”. The categories of personal data Maze may receive, as well as the purposes for which Maze collects and uses the personal data, are set out in other sections of this privacy policy, including in
Annex 1
and
Annex 2
.
With respect to personal data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, Maze is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In certain situations, Maze may be required to disclose personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
You may have the right to access your personal data and request that we correct, amend, delete it if it is inaccurate or processed in violation of the Data Privacy Framework. These access rights may not apply in some cases, including where providing access is unreasonably burdensome or expensive under the circumstances or where it would violate the rights of a third party. To request access to, correction, amendment, or deletion of your personal data, submit a written request to the contact information provided below. We may request specific information from you to confirm your identity.
You may also choose to change personal data or deactivate your account by contacting us using the contact details below. You can also unsubscribe from our marketing communications by following the instructions or unsubscribe mechanism in our marketing e-mails.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, Maze commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal data. EEA and UK users with inquiries or complaints regarding this privacy policy should first contact us by email at privacy@maze.design, or please write to the following address:
MAZE.DESIGN INC.
800 Menlo Ave, Suite 220
Menlo Park, CA 94025
Maze has further committed to cooperate with the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA) with regard to unresolved Data Privacy Framework complaints concerning non-human resource data transferred from the EU.
Additionally, under certain conditions, you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted. These conditions are more fully described on the Data Privacy Framework website:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
We may amend this Notice on EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and UK Extension from time to time consistent with Data Privacy Framework requirements.
11.
Links to third party sites
Our Service may, from time to time, contain links to and from third party websites of our partner networks, advertisers, partner merchants, news publications, retailers and affiliates. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites have their own privacy policies and that we do not accept any responsibility or liability for their policies. Please check the individual policies before you submit any information to those websites.
12.
Changes to this policy
We may update this privacy policy from time to time and so you should review this policy periodically. When we change this privacy policy in a material way, we will update the “last modified” date at the top of this privacy policy. We may also notify you of any changes to this privacy policy via email if such changes are likely to have an important impact on your privacy, or when we are legally required to do so. Changes to this privacy policy are effective when they are posted on this page.
13.
Notice to you
If we need to provide you with information about something, whether for legal, marketing or other business related purposes, we will select what we believe is the best way to get in contact with you. We will usually do this through email or by placing a notice on our site. The fact that we may send notices to you will not stop you from being able to opt out of certain types of contact as described in this privacy policy.
14.
Children
The Service is not intended for children below the age of 18, and we do not knowingly collect data relating to such children.
15.
Complaints
15.1
If you would like to make a complaint regarding this privacy policy or our practices in relation to your personal information, please contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this privacy policy.
15.2
We will reply to your complaint as soon as we can.
15.3
If you feel that your complaint has not been adequately resolved, please note that applicable privacy law may give you the right to contact your local data protection supervisory authority. Further information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available at
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en.htm.
.
16.
Contacting us
Questions, comments and requests regarding this privacy policy are welcome and should be addressed to:
privacy@maze.design
.
Annexes
Annex 1: Personal information we collect
Annex 2 - Personal information collected automatically